Authors
Randy Parker
Number of Reviews
95

Title
Review for Scrooged (1988)
        What do you get when you cross A CHRISTMAS CAROL with GHOSTBUSTERS?
The answer: a confused and overblown comedy with an identity crisis, such
as director Richard Donner's SCROOGED.  Although SCROOGED aspires to be a
modern day version of Charles Dickens' classic tale, A CHRISTMAS CAROL, the
film seems as if it would rather be a GHOSTBUSTERS sequel.  The movie is
overwrought with big-budget special effects that look good but add nothing
to the story.
        SCROOGED stars Bill Murray as Frank Cross, the youngest network
president in television history.  Cross is a real S.O.B.; he is greedy,
mean-spirited, and merciless.  Following the general story line of Dickens'
novel, Cross encounters the Ghosts of Christmas Past, Present, and Future,
who give him a chance to reevaluate his life and change his ways.
        Murray's performance in SCROOGED is adequate, but nothing special.
He is fine when his role calls for humor.  In the film's dramatic scenes,
however, Murray fails to give his character emotional conviction.  Perhaps
Donner is at fault for not pushing SCROOGED far enough in any one
direction.  The movie never really decides whether it wants to be a
dramatic, yet comic, re-telling of A CHRISTMAS CAROL or an all-out
slapstick parody of it.  The film's ambivalence prevents it from completely
succeeding either dramatically or comically.  Although SCROOGED is fairly
entertaining and funny, it is also extremely uneven.  The drama, for the
most part, is unconvincing and never catches fire.  And throughout the
film, the extravagant (but unnecessary) special effects distract from the
story.
        While Murray may be somewhat disappointing in his comeback role,
the rest of the cast in SCROOGED is magnificent; in fact, the supporting
performances and the unending string of cameos are almost enough by
themselves to make the film worthwhile.  Robert Mitchum, Bobcat Goldthwait,
and David Johansen are among the many actors who help to enliven SCROOGED.
Carol Kane almost steals the entire movie in her 25 minute sequence as the
petite, but physically abusive, Ghost of Christmas Present.  The cameos in
SCROOGED come fast and furious--so stay on your toes.  SCROOGED is also
worthwhile for its witty parody of television.  The programming on Murray's
network yields some of the funniest moments in the entire movie.
        Overall, SCROOGED is a mixed bag.  It does contain several
rewarding performances and genuine laughs, but you have to pay for them by
sitting through the movie's failed drama, low humor, and pacing problems.
SCROOGED came close to winning me over, but ultimately its rewards just
weren't enough to compensate for its frustrations.

Title
Review for Immediate Family (1989)
        IMMEDIATE FAMILY contains one of the strangest sights of any movie
this year.  Yes, even stranger than the hair pieces in STAR TREK V.  Brace
yourselves for a shock: for the first time in his film career, James Woods
plays a sensitive, all-around nice guy.  I'm not kidding.  I had to
constantly remind myself I was watching Woods and not Alan Alda.  With his
warm performance, Woods has broken the mold and virtually reinvented his
on-screen persona.
        Woods stars opposite Glenn Close; together, they play a loving
husband and wife who can't conceive.  After years of fertility drugs, they
finally decide to give up on mother nature and pursue an open adoption,
which means they meet the natural mother before the baby is born.  Mary
Stuart Masterson plays the pregnant teenager who agrees to give up her
baby.  The movie examines the culture clash between the lower class
teenager from Cleveland and the Yuppie couple who live in post-card pretty
Seattle.
        IMMEDIATE FAMILY captures your heart, but only after fighting off
several flaws.  For one thing, just when the movie seems ready to end, the
real conflict finally kicks in.  Better late than never, I guess.  Second,
the lovey-dovey relationships are too much to take: it's like being trapped
in an elevator with someone who reeks of perfume.  The sweet aroma is
suffocating.  Third, the movie is utterly predictable; the "big surprises"
are anything but surprising.
        The good news is that director Jonathan Kaplan has elicited
memorable performances from his leads.  It comes as a shock to see Woods
expressing compassion rather than his usual hostility.  I never buy Close
in her glamorous DANGEROUS LIAISONS-type roles, but her character in
IMMEDIATE FAMILY suits her well.  I believed every minute of her
performance as a woman who desperately yearns to have children.  Close will
probably earn her umpteen millionth Oscar nomination, but it's Mary Stuart
Masterson who really deserves the honor.  Masterson is so down to earth and
so compelling that it's impossible not to feel for her.  Her performance
rings true at every juncture as the movie depicts the pain and confusion of
teen pregnancy.

Title
Review for Great Balls of Fire! (1989)
        The story of Jerry Lee Lewis is ripe with dramatic possibilities.
GREAT BALLS OF FIRE chooses not to explore them.  The movie could have been
a dramatic psychological character study, or it might have been a backstage
look at the music industry or at the history of rock 'n roll.  Instead
director/co-writer Jim McBride has taken the road of TUCKER and made a
movie that is all flash and no substance.  GREAT BALLS OF FIRE is no more
than a glossy, sanitized Hollywood Production of Lewis' life.
        The movie chronicles the early days of Lewis' career: his rise to
rock stardom, his controversial marriage, and his violent tantrums and
alcohol abuse.  In telling the story, McBride shows little subtlety or
nuance; he paints everything with wide brush strokes.  The entire movie is
larger than life, including Dennis Quaid's performance as the "Killer."
        Quaid displays charisma, flamboyance, and down-home charm in the
role.  His enthusiasm and cockiness are well suited to conveying the
electricity of Jerry Lee's music.  Thanks to Quaid's hyper-manic, physical
performance and strong stage presence, the concert scenes in GREAT BALLS OF
FIRE are exhilarating, even incendiary.  Before one concert, for example,
Lewis is beside himself because he has to open for Little Richard.  He
thinks he should get to headline the concert since "Great Balls of Fire" is
the number one song in the country.  Fueled by his anger, Lewis takes the
stage and delivers a rousing performance of "Great Balls."  He whips the
crowd into a frenzy by setting his piano afire at the song's climax.  As
Lewis leaves the stage, he boasts to Little Richard, "Follow that!"  Quaid
has succeeded in capturing the essence of Jerry Lee, the musician and
performer.
        On the down-side, Jerry Lee, the person, is nowhere to be found in
GREAT BALLS OF FIRE.  Neither Quaid's exaggerated one-note performance nor
McBride's script lets us into Lewis' head.  Just what makes this man tick,
besides music and 13 year old girls?  GREAT BALLS OF FIRE doesn't provide
any answers.  The movie is paper thin, altogether lacking complexity.  It
could learn a few things from SCANDAL, or better yet, LA BAMBA.
        GREAT BALLS is so superficial and so light-weight that we can never
take it seriously.  Consequently, the movie's few attempts at drama fail
miserably; they have neither credibility nor impact.  LA BAMBA, on the
other hand, overcame its cliched rags to riches story to offer some
exceptional performances and riveting domestic drama.  Esai Morales'
performance as Ritchie's jealous and troubled brother haunts me to this
day.  Lewis' life is at least as rich a source of dramatic material, but
GREAT BALLS OF FIRE carefully avoids developing any serious themes which
might disrupt its light tone.  Sure, the Killer's music is great, but it's
his personal problems which make him interesting, troubling, and
controversial.  Why even bother to make a film of Lewis' life if you're
going to ignore the cutting edges which make him an enigma?
        Winona Ryder (as Myra Lewis) manages to instill some depth into the
shallow story.  Ryder is captivating as she portrays the pain, confusion,
and excitement of not only marrying a pop idol but doing so at age 13.
Whether she's expressing Myra's wholesome innocence, her sexual awakening,
or her reckless abandon while spending Lewis' money, Ryder's screen
presence is magnetic, drawing us into the character.  Her look of fear and
bewilderment at her impromptu wedding ceremony is amusing but also
compelling.  But despite Ryder's efforts, the movie still left me with the
feeling that Myra has been shortchanged, her story and situation
underdeveloped.  GREAT BALL OF FIRE provides no more than a shallow
"Classics Illustrated" version of her life-story.
        Ultimately, GREAT BALLS OF FIRE isn't especially memorable, but I
have to admit that the movie is fun while it lasts.  It may be all style
and no substance, but what style!  The movie is intensely colorful, and it
succeeds in recreating the '50s, complete with classic clothes, cars, and
cold war.  I also appreciated Peter Cook's cameo as a British reporter and
Alec Baldwin's performance as Lewis' cousin and boyhood chum, Jimmy
Swaggart.  Swaggart's self-righteousness, moral indignation, and religious
rantings and ravings are deliciously ironic in light of his eventual fall
from grace.
        Without question, the highlight of the film is Lewis' music, which
he re-recorded for the film with Dennis Quaid lip-synching.  Lewis is in
top form; his passion and talent have not diminished over the years while
the technology of recording music has improved dramatically.  Consequently,
the songs in the movie actually sound better and are more exciting than the
originals.  I went into GREAT BALLS OF FIRE indifferent to Lewis' music and
I came out desperately eager to buy the soundtrack.  So even though GREAT
BALLS OF FIRE pales in comparison to such fine rock biographies as LA BAMBA
and THE BUDDY HOLLY STORY, I have to give the movie credit for getting the
music right.

Title
Review for Defending Your Life (1991)
        DEFENDING YOUR LIFE is an imaginative vision of the afterlife from
the twisted mind of writer-director Albert Brooks, who also stars in the
comedy.
        After dying in a car crash, on his birthday of all days, Brooks
wakes up in Judgement City, a satirical rendition of purgatory where higher
beings evaluate the lives of newly deceased earthlings.  Brooks has five
days to convince two judges that he's worthy of passing on to higher plains
of existence.  Enter Rip Torn as the slick lawyer who defends Brooks in
court against prosecutor Lee Grant.  During his "trial," Brooks must view
episodes of his life on a movie screen, and these scenes are both
hysterically funny and painfully poignant.  It's impossible to resist
chuckling (and cringing) at Brooks as he and Torn try to explain away his
cowardly behavior on earth.  Torn, in particular, is in vintage comic form,
and he walks away with the picture.
The movie also features Meryl Streep, appealing as the love-interest, and
Shirley MacLaine, who pops up in a hilarious cameo.  While the film is
uneven, many of its gags are priceless.  Take, for example, the food in
Judgement City: it's always the most delicious you've ever tasted ... and
it's also CALORIE-FREE--so chow down!

Title
Review for Field of Dreams (1989)
        FIELD OF DREAMS almost defies description.  Although it's about
baseball, it's not a baseball movie.  Although the film is extremely
spiritual, it's not about religion.  And although FIELD OF DREAMS is
melodramatic, it's not a tearjerker.  To really understand what FIELD OF
DREAMS is all about, you have to see it.
        In the film, Kevin Costner plays Ray Kinsella, a baseball fan, '60s
Berkeley graduate, and Iowa farmer.  One day as he is standing in the
middle of his expansive corn fields, Ray hears a voice; it tells him: "If
you build it, he will come."  Then Ray has a vision and somehow concludes
that if he builds a baseball field in the middle of his corn, Shoeless Joe
Jackson will arise from the dead to play ball once again.  And even though
it depletes his family's savings and his neighbors think he's crazy, Ray
clears away the corn and builds a baseball field, complete with bleachers
and flood lights.  "If you build it, he will come."  And lo and behold,
Shoeless Joe does come--bringing with him several of his dead teammates.
        And then Ray hears The Voice again; it tells him to "ease his
pain."  Ray thinks this means that he must travel to Boston to meet Terence
Mann, an influential and radical novelist from the '60s who has since
stopped writing and dropped out of society.  With great aplomb, James Earl
Jones plays the disillusioned author who joins forces with Ray and embarks
with him on a magical and spiritual journey.
        The cast in FIELD OF DREAMS is excellent, especially Kevin Costner
in the lead role.  Costner gives a quiet, subtle, and moving performance as
a man who before building the baseball field had done nothing crazy or
spontaneous in his entire life.  Costner gives Ray just the right mix of
enthusiasm and idealism to make us believe in his mystic visions and
swallow this wondrous fairy tale.
        Amy Madigan gives a fine supporting performance as Ray's feisty and
loving wife, who against her better judgement supports her husband's crazy
ideas.  In her most impressive scene, Madigan vehemently argues against
book burning at a P.T.A. meeting, displaying the sincere passion of a '60s
Berkeley radical.  Ray Liotta is appropriately eerie and awe-inspiring as
the ghost of Shoeless Joe, the legendary batter who was suspended from
baseball for his involvement in the 1919 Chicago "Black Sox" Scandal.  And
finally, Burt Lancaster is memorable in a small, but important, role as a
small town doctor whose professional baseball career was limited to only
one inning.
        FIELD OF DREAMS is a touching fairy tale full of life, wonder,
mystery, spirit, and humor.  It, for the most part, succeeds in capturing
our emotions and suspending our disbelief.  Ray Kinsella's spiritual quest
in pursuit of his dreams proves to be moving and miraculous.  But while
FIELD OF DREAMS generally avoids excessive melodrama, it unfortunately does
at times go overboard, and by the end it gets down-right sappy.  In
general, however, FIELD OF DREAMS is an emotionally satisfying fantasy--one
I can recommend to everyone but unromantic cynics.

Title
Review for Dead Bang (1989)
        DEAD-BANG, an action thriller starring Don Johnson, lives up to its
dumb title, or at least to half of it.  Although DEAD-BANG is definitely
dead, it is anything but a bang; in fact, they should have called this one
"Dead Bore."
        In the film, Johnson plays ... you guessed it ... a cop.  The role
must have been really challenging for Johnson since his character, Jerry
Beck, is a gritty Los Angeles homicide detective, a real stretch from the
slick vice detective Johnson portrayed on "Miami Vice."  A la Mel Gibson in
LETHAL WEAPON, Beck is an emotional wreck, complete with violent outbursts,
unscrupulous police methods, and a bleak outlook on life.  Beck's wife has
just divorced him, and she is cutting him off from their children.  She
will not even allow him to wish them "Merry Christmas" by telephone.  But
Beck's family and emotional problems take a back seat to the action and
thrills in DEAD-BANG.  Beck is investigating the brutal murders of a
shopkeeper and a cop.  His investigation starts in L.A. and finally
culminates and climaxes in Oklahoma, where he has a violent showdown with
the killers at a white supremacist camp.
        Virtually every aspect of DEAD-BANG is inept and ineffective.  The
plot is incoherent and full of holes.  The movie depicts Beck's
investigation so clumsily that you never see the connections between his
clues and his conclusions.  The action sequences in DEAD-BANG are strictly
third-rate, and the movie has absolutely no momentum or suspense.  I
certainly expected more from long-time director John Frankenheimer who
directed the classic political thriller, THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE--as well
as BLACK SUNDAY, SEVEN DAYS IN MAY, and THE FRENCH CONNECTION II.  In all
fairness to Frankenheimer, however, I should note that most of DEAD-BANG's
shortcomings seem to stem from its shabby script rather than from the
direction.
        DEAD-BANG tries to don a mask of social relevance by incorporating
themes of racism and white supremacy, but its efforts are nothing more than
token gestures and nothing less than insulting.  According to the movie's
production notes, DEAD-BANG is based on the real-life experiences of
still-active detective Jerry Beck.  You would never guess this from
watching DEAD-BANG, however, since the film totally lacks credibility; it
is utterly unconvincing and unbelievable.
        Most of the characters in DEAD-BANG are either atrociously acted,
underdeveloped, superfluous, or all of the above.  William Forsythe, for
example, is painfully bad as Arthur Kressler, a wholesome by-the-book FBI
agent who's offended by Beck's foul language and unorthodox methods.
Forsythe's lame performance and corny dialogue makes his character
unbearable.  DEAD-BANG marks the motion picture debut of Tim Reid ("WKRP In
Cincinnati" and "Frank's Place"), but his talents are completely wasted in
a cliched and contrived role; he plays the chief officer of a squadron of
black cops who help Beck to nail the villains.  The sole function of
Penelope Ann Miller's character is to give DEAD-BANG an excuse to include a
gratuitous love scene between characters about whom you could not care
less.  I guess the film's title refers to this love scene since it's
definitely a dead bang.
        The only real virtue of DEAD-BANG, believe it or not, is Don
Johnson, who tries to overcome the limitations of the movie's pitiful
script.  Johnson succeeds in giving his character a sarcastic sense of
humor and a hint of depth, and his pessimistic wisecracks occasionally
bring the film to life.  And I must admit that DEAD-BANG does have one or
two amusing moments.  The funniest scene has Johnson throwing-up all over a
criminal as he interrogates him.  But when barf is the highlight of a
movie, you know the movie's in trouble.  The other amusing scene involves a
psychological examination of Beck, in which he can't keep a straight face
because the psychiatrist resembles Woody Allen.  But two funny scenes and a
couple good wisecracks do not a movie make.

Title
Review for Betsy's Wedding (1990)
        One of my colleagues was surprised when I told her I was willing to
see BETSY'S WEDDING.  And she was shocked to hear that I actually liked it.
Her reaction was understandable when you consider that the film revolves
around Molly Ringwald, who hasn't made a worthwhile film since 1986.  But
the fact is, BETSY'S WEDDING is also an Alan Alda film.  And while Ringwald
has been making duds for the last four years, Alda has been involved with
several noteworthy projects, including CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS and A NEW
LIFE.
        Written and directed by Alda, BETSY'S WEDDING is a vibrant
slice-of-life, mixing a few dramatic moments into a big bowl of whimsical
humor.  Alda's comic elixir is smooth and refreshing--and a welcome change
of pace from the usual summer fare.
        As bride and groom, Molly Ringwald and Dylan Walsh are the pivotal
characters in the film, but they are by far the least interesting.  Walsh
is a nonentity, with all the screen presence of a door knob.  Ringwald is
simply unbearable and is easily the weakest link in the chain.  She looks
hideous with her short-cropped orange hair, red lip-stick and grotesque
outfits.  She's supposed to be a dress designer, but she looks more like a
clown.  And to make matters worse, Ringwald's performance matches her
appearance.
        Thankfully, Alda keeps Ringwald's screen time to a minimum; he is
far more interested in the colorful periphery characters.  The wedding is
just a device to bring together the bride's working-class, Italian family
and the groom's rich, gentile family.  Ringwald's folks are homey and
down-to-earth, with Alda as her free-spirited father, Madeline Kahn as her
practical mother, and Ally Sheedy as her lonely sister.  Walsh's clan, on
the other hand, is prim, proper and ostentatious.  When the two families
meet and mingle, the movie becomes a story of culture clash, or as one
character puts it, "money versus values."
        Ally Sheedy, in a wonderfully understated performance, is one of
the film's most pleasant surprises.  Sheedy expresses more with just her
eyes than Ringwald does with her entire body.  It's Anthony LaPaglia,
however, who seizes the spotlight.  LaPaglia plays Stevie Dee, a suave,
overly polite mafioso who is formally courting Sheedy with old-fashioned
chivalry.  LaPaglia's sincere but dim-witted character is a riot.  And
what's uncanny is that LaPaglia is a dead ringer for Robert De Niro, with a
little bit of Alec Baldwin thrown in for good measure.  LaPaglia seems to
have attended the De Niro school of gangster acting, and his inspired
performance is partly a tribute to his role-model and partly a rip-off.  I
don't know whether to say a star is born or a star is re-born, but I do
know that LaPaglia's over-the-top performance should not be missed.
        The scrumptious comic acting, however, extends well beyond Sheedy
and LaPaglia.  Joe Pesci, in particular, sinks his teeth into his role as
Alda's unscrupulous brother-in-law, a slum lord with mob ties, who is
cheating on his wife (Catherine O'Hara).  Alda, faced with challenge of
both directing and acting, somehow finds just the right comic touch as the
bride's financially-strapped father, a carpenter whose dreams are bigger
than his wallet.  The film adopts Alda's psychological point of view as he
tries to one: plan the wedding, and two: pay for it.
        As a filmmaker, Alda's style of humor is remarkably restrained and
tasteful.  And while he doesn't have the comic genius of a Woody Allen,
Alda does possess the inspiration to make movies which are ten times more
entertaining than the slop which usually passes for comedy.

Title
Review for Young Einstein (1988)
        YOUNG EINSTEIN is embarrassingly lame, but that didn't stop it from
becoming a phenomenon in Australia, where it became the third largest box
office hit of all time.  In the U.S., Warner Brothers is hoping the movie
will follow in the footsteps of Paul Hogan, INXS, and shrimp on the barby
to become the latest rage from down under.  Personally, I'm hoping
Americans everywhere will rise to the occasion and make YOUNG EINSTEIN a
box office bomb.
        YOUNG EINSTEIN sprang from the twisted mind of Yahoo Serious, who
not only wrote, produced, edited, and directed the film, but also starred
and did his own stunts.  His creation is about as stupid and contrived as
you'd expect from someone named Yahoo.
        The movie takes substantial historical liberties in recreating
Einstein's youth.  Whereas the scientist actually hailed from Germany, the
film finds him still living with his parents on Tasmania, a remote
Australian Island.  In addition to deriving the formula for energy and the
theory of relativity, Albert invents surfing, bubbles in beer, and the
electric guitar.  Yahoo plays Einstein as a naive and unrefined country
hick--a clown with an insatiable curiosity.  Although Yahoo's performance
is at first endearing, the one-dimensional characterization loses its
novelty faster than you can say E=mc2.
        Yahoo has created a charming family for Albert, and the scenes on
Tasmania are often clever.  But after the first twenty minutes, the movie
quickly plummets and degenerates into a poor excuse for a comedy.  YOUNG
EINSTEIN is hampered by its lethargic pace and inane plot.
        Yahoo must be an MTV addict because his movie features an
omnipresent soundtrack; unfortunately, the music is altogether gratuitous
and quickly becomes overbearing.  Almost every other scene includes a
blaring rock song that leaves you wondering whether you are watching a
movie or a music video.  The instrumental score, on the other hand, is
generally playful; Yahoo uses such classics as the "1812 Overture" and the
theme from THE GOOD, THE BAD AND THE UGLY to great comic effect.
        Halfway through YOUNG EINSTEIN, I knew for sure the movie was a
stinker.  But it wasn't until the very end that I finally put my finger on
why: the comedy takes its roots not from whimsical film fantasies (such as
YOUNG SHERLOCK HOLMES) but from cheesy prime-time sitcoms.  In fact, YOUNG
EINSTEIN might have been more at home on network television, where its
sophomoric humor wouldn't raise any eyebrows.

Title
Review for Pacific Heights (1990)
        With PACIFIC HEIGHTS, screenwriter Daniel Pyne has shot himself in
the foot by destroying a promising premise with two frustratingly idiotic
characters.  Melanie Griffith and Matthew Modine play a cute (but fatally
dumb) couple who buy a decrepit Victorian house in Pacific Heights and sink
all of their savings into restoring it.  However, the only way they can
afford their dream house, which is located in San Francisco's ritziest
neighborhood, is to rent out the rooms on the ground floor.  A devious con
man (Michael Keaton) maneuvers his way into one of the apartments and sets
into motion a fiendish plot to ruin their lives, their home, and their
credit rating.
        PACIFIC HEIGHTS blows its chance to be a stirring and compelling
psychological thriller.  Keaton, playing a frighteningly sinister
sociopath, holds up his end of the deal with a penetrating performance.
Guilty of excessively self-conscious direction, director John Schlesinger
lets the movie slip away from him.  He doesn't receive any help from Pyne's
hopelessly inept screenplay.  Griffith and ESPECIALLY Modine are so
excruciatingly stupid that you quickly lose all sympathy for them, even
though their predicament is tragic.  It gets to the point where you even
root against them.  The young couple makes one mistake after another and
blindly walks into traps that you can see from miles away.  If the
protagonists showed even a shred of intelligence, Keaton's scheme would
collapse like a house of straw in a tornado.  PACIFIC HEIGHTS is a
resounding disappointment.

Title
Review for Tango & Cash (1989)
        After seeing BLAZE and DRIVING MISS DAISY, I was ready for some
mindless fun--oh, maybe something like TANGO & CASH.  Maybe not!  Mindless
fun is one thing, but brain-dead slop is another matter altogether.  TANGO
& CASH has "lowest common denominator" written all over it.
        The movie stars Sylvester Stallone and Kurt Russell as rival
undercover cops in L.A.  Russell plays Cash, a reckless slob who dresses in
jeans and tee shirts.  Stallone plays Tango, a wealthy investor who works
on the force strictly for the thrill of it; he doesn't need the money.  In
an effort to change his image, Stallone goes for a yuppie, GQ look in the
film, wearing spectacles and three piece suits.  The two detectives
reluctantly become partners after they are framed for murder and have to
break out of prison to clear their names.
        TANGO & CASH is unbearably noisy.  For starters, there's Harold
Faltermeyer's annoying synthesized score, which gets old after four notes.
To make matters worse, the filmmakers seem to think that when it comes to
loud explosions and screeching cars, the more the merrier.  In fact, the
movie begins with not one but two car chases.  There's nothing like a good
old car chase to introduce the characters in a movie.
        Screenwriter Randy Feldman's brain must have gone to mush from
watching too many cop shows on TV.  His shockingly stupid screenplay
undermines anything and everything the movie has going for it, such as
Stallone's efforts to convince you that Tango is an intellectual.  In a
movie with the IQ level of an amoeba, even a great actor is going to have
trouble looking intelligent--and Stallone is no Lawrence Olivier.  It's
hard to imagine anyone reading Feldman's script and thinking, "I want to be
in this movie."
        The film's plot doesn't have one original bone in its body,
and--again--you have to point your finger at the screenwriting.  Feldman's
story line succumbs to every crime thriller cliche in the book, making
TANGO & CASH altogether generic and predictable.  They simply could have
called it "Action Movie."  Every character, every twist and turn, is stolen
from television or from other movies.  Adding insult to injury, TANGO &
CASH is about as believable as a "Road Runner" cartoon.  Action movies
don't have to be realistic, but they should absorb you enough so that
you're not thinking about the lack of realism.
        The only artistic aspect of TANGO & CASH is the cinematography.
There are some spectacular shots, especially during the rainy nighttime
prison break in which Tango and Cash slide to safety on electrical wires.
        The film's main draw is the chemistry between Stallone and Russell.
Unfortunately, their relationship rarely progresses past macho competition
as they endlessly bicker about who packs more meat in his pants.  The
dialogue consists of nothing but one-liners, and consequently the attempts
at character development are embarrassing.  It's a shame because with a
workable screenplay, Russell and Stallone could have turned TANGO & CASH
into a charming "Lethal Weaponesque" adventure.
        TANGO & CASH tries to maintain a light tone, and you do laugh about
once every five minutes.  Seeing Russell in drag is the movie's funniest
moment, but you probably already have seen it in the commercials.
Furthermore, the light tone does not sit well against the relentlessly
brutal violence.  Machine guns and torture generally don't mix well with
comedy.
        Jack Palance appears in TANGO & CASH doing what he does best:
playing a sleazy, conniving villain.  His character, however, is
run-of-the-mill, except for his strange obsession with mice.  Like many
movie villains, Palance likes to play games.  In fact, he sets a
ridiculously elaborate trap for Tango and Cash, a trap which sends the two
detectives to prison so they can be beaten and electrocuted by some meanies
in the boiler room.  You have to wonder why Palance doesn't just shoot the
detectives in the head!  The story would crumble if any of the characters
were to do anything intelligent.
        Teri Hatcher plays Stallone's sister and Russell's love-interest,
and she is just as pretty as can be.  But regrettably, Hatcher's acting is
not on par with her exceptional beauty.  Every time she opens her mouth,
you cringe; corny dialogue and atrocious acting are always a fatal
combination.
        There's really very little, if anything, to recommend in the film.
And, more to the point, TANGO definitely isn't worth a penny of your
cash--so don't bother.

Title
Review for Dead Poets Society (1989)
        DEAD POETS SOCIETY, "starring" Robin Williams, is anything but a
comedy.  While the film does have plenty of laughs, it wears the trappings
not of a comedy, but of a Greek or Shakespearean tragedy.  DEAD POETS
SOCIETY is at times quite serious and somber, and it's also without
question the finest film of the year.  Its riveting, gut wrenching drama
had me on the edge of my seat and glued to the screen.
        DEAD POETS SOCIETY is set in 1959 at Welton Academy in Vermont, a
private college prep school for boys where discipline almost has become an
end in and of itself.  The faculty has just one goal: to grind out future
lawyers, doctors, and scientists.  But one voice stands out amid the
school's rigid, narrow-minded administration; it belongs to Professor John
Keating, a Welton alumnus who has returned to the academy to teach English.
        Unlike his conservative colleagues, Keating employs decidedly
unorthodox teaching methods and strives to teach more than just his subject
matter, which is poetry.  His goal is to inspire his students to suck the
bone of life to the marrow, to seize the day and make their lives
extraordinary.  In Keating's class, you learn passion, courage,
romanticism, and--of course--poetry.  You pass if you avoid conformity and
find your own voice, and you fail if you neglect to live life to the
fullest.
        Robin Williams is nothing short of brilliant as Keating.  In the
classroom, he cuts loose and shows his usual comic flair with antics like
impersonating John Wayne while reading "Macbeth" aloud to his students and
conducting discussions as if the class were a game show.  But Williams is
most impressive in the quiet, dramatic scenes which require a knowing
glance or a subtle flash of sorrow.  Once again, Williams deserves
recognition and respect for his prowess at straight drama; he has matched
or surpassed his fine work in GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM, MOSCOW ON THE HUDSON,
and THE WORLD ACCORDING TO GARP.
        DEAD POETS SOCIETY, however, is not a Robin Williams vehicle.  In
fact, Williams is the first to admit that the movie doesn't even revolve
around his character: "I'm not carrying this film and I don't feel
pressured that the whole movie rests on me.  The real story of the film is
the boys.  I come in and I'm a catalyst, but how they react and their
tribute back is the power." (from the press kit)  Indeed, most of the young
actors in the large, ensemble cast of unknowns and newcomers have at least
as much screen time as does Williams.  The movie follows a handful of
Keating's students as they get swept away by their teacher's enthusiastic
spirit.  They decide to reorganize "The Dead Poets Society," a secret club
which used to meet in a cave (when Keating attended Welton) to experience
inspiration through poetry--their own and that of the greats: Whitman,
Keats, Thoreau, and so on.
        Broadway stage actor Robert Sean Leonard has perhaps the meatiest
role in the film.  He plays Neil Perry, a charismatic young man whose
membership in the society leads him to discover his passion for acting.
But unfortunately, his domineering, unyielding father stands in the way of
Neil's dreams.  Mr. Perry wants his son to go to Harvard medical school and
forbids him to engage in extracurricular activities (such as acting) which
might interfere with his studies.  Mr. Perry is played by Kurtwood Smith,
who seems to specialize in uptight, anal retentive characters (he was the
sadistic criminal in ROBOCOP and the dirty D.A. in TRUE BELIEVER).  Neil's
conflict with his father is infuriating, tragic, and in some ways, the
heart and soul of the movie.
        Director Peter Weir has elicited exceptional performances from his
entire cast.  Ethan Hawke is a natural as Neil's shy and inhibited
roommate, Todd, who suffers from low self-esteem.  Under Keating's
tutelage, Todd finally learns to express himself and to cultivate a sense
of self-worth.  Josh Charles is charming and endearing in a down-to-earth
John Cusack sort of way as Knox Overstreet, the club's resident tormented,
love-struck romantic.  The "Dead Poets Society" inspires Knox to find the
courage to declare his love to a cute cheerleader who attends the local
public high school.
        Gale Hansen, Dylan Kussman, Allelon Ruggiero, and James Waterston
(actor Sam Waterston's son) round out the cast as the other members of the
clandestine club.  And while the film doesn't fully develop every
character, each one seems complex and genuine, nonetheless.  These students
are much more than just stock characters.  In a radical departure from his
role as Dr. Auschlander on "St. Elsewhere," Norman Lloyd evokes fear and
contempt as Welton Academy's austere headmaster, Mr. Nolan.  His stiff,
uncompromising manner reflects the school's oppressive teaching
philosophy--a philosophy based on the four pillars of faith: tradition,
honor, excellence, and discipline.  While the students admire Professor
Keating's unconventional style, Mr. Nolan and the faculty react to it with
shock and disapproval.
        Perhaps the individual most responsible for DEAD POET SOCIETY's
impact is Australian director Peter Weir (WITNESS, THE YEAR OF LIVING
DANGEROUSLY, MOSQUITO COAST, GALLIPOLI).  With the help of Oscar-winning
cinematographer John Seale (RAIN MAN, GORILLAS IN THE MIST), Weir has used
the medium to its fullest.  The director's imaginative camera work and
Seale's breathtaking cinematography make the film absorbing and
exhilarating.  Weir and company shot DEAD POETS SOCIETY almost entirely on
location at St. Andrew's School in Delaware, and they have made good use of
the school's photogenic qualities, such as its 2,000 acres of beautiful
farmland and gloomy stone architecture.  Complementing the film's superb
direction and acting is Tom Schulman's incredibly literate script, which is
based in part on his own experiences at private school.
        DEAD POETS SOCIETY is virtually flawless.  As you watch the movie,
you keep expecting it to make some fatal blunder: to become melodramatic,
to succumb to predictable Hollywood cliches, or to milk an easy laugh.  But
DEAD POETS SOCIETY avoids these pitfalls.  Every time you think you know
where the film is headed, it surprises you by going in an altogether
unforeseen direction.  Even Academy Award-winning composer Maurice Jarre's
score is immaculate; it is rousing without being overbearing or
distracting.
        And I should warn you that DEAD POETS SOCIETY will make many of you
cry or come damn close.  If you want to see a crazy Robin Williams comedy,
go rent POPEYE, because DEAD POETS SOCIETY is for people looking for an
intellectually stimulating and emotionally involving cinematic experience.

Title
Review for Casualties of War (1989)
        "THE ACCUSED in Vietnam."  You have to wonder if CASUALTIES OF WAR
was sold on that high-concept pitch.  Brian De Palma's shocking war drama
is based on a horrifying true incident, in which a handful of soldiers
abducted a teen-age Vietnamese girl and dragged her on a long-range
reconnaissance mission.  In short, they kidnapped, raped, and murdered her,
treating her like a piece of meat.
        Unlike THE ACCUSED, however, CASUALTIES OF WAR doesn't take the
victim's point of view.  Rather, it tells story of Private Eriksson, the
only soldier in the platoon who has the guts and conscience to vehemently
protest the violent crime.
        Michael J. Fox turns in an impressive performance as the naive and
idealistic newcomer, who after only three weeks in Vietnam, still thinks
the war is just a game.  That is, until he witnesses the brutal rape, which
he is powerless to prevent.  Eriksson's moments of moral outrage and of
tenderness with the rape victim are heartfelt and stirring, which
unfortunately can't be said of anything else in the movie.
        Except for Thuy Thu Le, who will break your heart as the victim,
the supporting actors get caught in a cross fire of cliches.  Surprise,
surprise, Sean Penn plays the racist and psychotic sergeant who instigates
the atrocity.  In nearly every film he's made, Penn has played an arrogant
tough guy, and frankly, it's getting boring.  Most of the characters,
including Penn's, come across as unbelievable stereotypes.
        A clumsy and heavy-handed screenplay, which telegraphs the big
moments, also bogs down the film.  According to the New York Times,
screenwriter David Rabe is so unhappy with the way his words were
translated to the screen that he's trying to disassociate himself from the
film.  Rabe objects to the simplistic dialogue and thinly drawn
relationships, and so do I.
        On the plus side, CASUALTIES OF WAR regains some solid footing from
Brian De Palma's confident direction, which is unusually understated and
for once doesn't call attention to itself.  De Palma is careful not to
allow the film to become sensational or melodramatic; this is no
MISSISSIPPI BURNING.
        Ultimately, CASUALTIES OF WAR fights a losing battle because it
fails to justify the repugnant violence.  The movie has very little payoff:
it offers few, if any, new insights into Vietnam.  We already knew that war
is hell and can turn men into monsters.  No kidding!  De Palma needs
something more enlightening to underscore such a grim, disturbing film.  As
is, CASUALTIES OF WAR may leave you asking: is this movie really necessary?

Title
Review for Total Recall (1990)
        The Arnold Schwarzenegger thriller TOTAL RECALL explodes onto the
screen with extravagant action, eye-popping special effects, spectacular
sets, and gallons and gallons and gallons of blood.  The film is literally
an assault on the senses, and yet, it is much more than a mere roller
coaster ride.  TOTAL RECALL is also an intriguing mystery, a throwback to
the film noir tradition where nothing is as it appears.
        TOTAL RECALL asks the eternal question: is it live or is it
Memorex?  The movie is set in the year 2084; Mankind has developed
"recall," a technology for implanting memories into a person's brain.  For
example, if you can't afford a vacation to Saturn, you can get the next
best thing: the MEMORY of a vacation to Saturn.  In the film,
Schwarzenegger plays a construction worker who is haunted by nightmares
about Mars, which in the 21st century is a politically unstable mining
colony.  Schwarzenegger has never been to Mars so he wonders where these
nightmares are coming from: are they just dreams or are they partially
erased memories bubbling into his subconscious?  He travels to Mars to
unravel the mystery.
        Like ALIENS, DIE HARD, and THE TERMINATOR, TOTAL RECALL rarely
surfaces for air once it plunges into the action.  ROBOCOP director Paul
Verhoeven has achieved the ultimate in wham-bam, rock 'em-sock 'em,
rip-roaring movie-making.  TOTAL RECALL is a violent and gory tour de
force, a virtual bloodbath with stomach turning makeup and special effects.
Fortunately, the film has a captivating story line which offsets the
gratuitous gore.  The elaborate and intricate plot is full of double
crosses, triple crosses, and even quadruple crosses, with mind games
galore.
        In the tradition of BLADE RUNNER and BRAZIL, TOTAL RECALL offers a
vivid vision of the future.  Verhoeven creates an entire society on Mars,
complete with a sleazy red-light district.  The ornate sets reflect both a
fertile imagination and a loving eye for detail.
        As for the acting, Schwarzenegger is in his element, reaffirming
his status as today's premier action hero.  The rest of the cast, on the
other hand, is somewhat pedestrian, except for Sharon Stone who makes for a
deliciously bitchy villain.  Unfortunately, TOTAL RECALL veers out of
control at the end, providing science fiction which is heavy on fiction and
light on science.
        When all is said and done, however, TOTAL RECALL sets a new
standard for action which should be difficult, if not impossible, to beat.

Title
Review for Twins (1988)
        TWINS, directed by Ivan Reitman and starring Arnold Schwarzenegger
and Danny DeVito, is the epitome of high-concept, disposable entertainment.
        In this check-your-brain-in-at-the-door movie, Schwarzenegger and
DeVito are fraternal twins, the result of a genetic engineering experiment
gone awry.  Schwarzenegger as Julius is the twin who received all the
"good" genes.  Raised by a scientist on an isolated tropical island, Julius
is intelligent, well-educated, physically fit, and good-natured, but he
lacks experience in the real world.  DeVito as Vincent is the twin who
received the "leftover" genes.  Raised in an orphanage in L.A., he is a
good-for-nothing car thief and general hoodlum.  Separated at birth, the
two brothers finally meet for the first time after Julius leaves his
island-home to track down Vincent in L.A.
        Given the brilliant casting and talent involved, TWINS has very
little ambition.  Although the movie is consistently entertaining, it never
really rises above the level of high-concept formula. TWINS is far too
willing to milk easy laughs from the striking dissimilarity between the
twins and far too reluctant to develop its characters.  The strength and
heart of TWINS is the relationship between the two brothers, who grow to
love and respect one another.  Unfortunately, the film's action-oriented
subplots distract from the strong chemistry that develops between Julius
and Vincent.
        The most pleasant surprise in TWINS is Schwarzenegger's knack for
comedy.  His performance as a fish out of water unfamiliar with American
culture is convincing and endearing.  His social ineptitude and
inexperience produce the movie's funniest moments.
        DeVito, on the other hand, is exactly what you'd expect.  He plays
the standard loud-mouth, smart-alec character that we've come to know and
hate.  This incarnation of the character is not much different from his
past roles; he's as obnoxious, immature, and irritating as ever.  Kelly
Preston also deserves mention; she gives TWINS a healthy dose of
pulse-raising sizzle as the sexy and stunning beauty who takes interest in
Julius.
        Fortunately, despite all its predictable and uninspired humor,
TWINS delivers a lot more fun and entertainment than you might expect.

Title
Review for Nuns on the Run (1990)
        There are only a few contemporary actors who can make fans laugh
simply by appearing on screen.  These actors don't have to do anything
funny; just looking at them brings on the giggles.  Woody Allen and John
Cleese are prime examples, and if you ask me, so is Eric Idle, who--unlike
Cleese--has been woefully underutilized by filmmakers since Monty Python
disbanded.
        Finally, seven years after MEANING OF LIFE, Idle has a starring
role (opposite Robbie Coltrane) in NUNS ON THE RUN.  NUNS, unfortunately,
is a mindless, unoriginal caper comedy, but thanks to Idle's elastic face
and silly expressions, the movie is thoroughly entertaining.  We're talking
dumb but fun.
        Idle and Coltrane play aging crooks who are looking to go straight.
As the title suggests, they end up hiding in a convent, disguised as nuns.
Idle, who is no stranger to appearing in drag, brings his customary flair
to the role.  Coltrane, as Idle's partner in crime, plays his part well,
but he doesn't have Idle's comic pizazz.  Camille Coduri, who plays Idle's
love-interest, is adorable in a Goldie Hawn sort of way.
        Writer-director Jonathan Lynn throws gag after gag at the screen,
and only some of them stick.  The movie's appeal derives more from the
comic performances than from Lynn's uneven screenplay, which relies too
much on cheap, physical humor.  NUNS ON THE RUN is no FISH CALLED WANDA,
but it's nearly impossible to resist Eric Idle as a nun.

Title
Review for Turner & Hooch (1989)
        Tom Hanks has seemed determined lately to flush his career down the
toilet.  In his previous movie, THE 'BURBS, he played the only normal guy
on his block.  The character was a dead bore and a waste of Hanks' comic
talent.  In TURNER & HOOCH, Hanks is stuck in another mundane role, playing
straight man to a slobbering, butt-ugly canine.  Yes, that's right, Hanks'
co-star is a dog and so is the movie.
        Hanks plays an obsessively fastidious detective whose
highly-organized life is turned upside down when he teams up with a dog to
solve a murder.  The dog, Hooch, is a homely mutt with an attitude problem:
he's mean, he's grumpy, and he slobbers like Niagara falls.  The movie is
supposed to show how Hooch teaches the uptight detective how to be more
easy going.  Heck, the dog even helps Turner get laid.
        TURNER & HOOCH is too light-hearted to be an effective crime
thriller.  It's not funny enough to be a good comedy.  And it's too
contrived to stir up any serious drama or character development.  In order
to get easy laughs, the script caters to the lowest common denominator,
which in this case is saliva.  Nearly every scene includes a drool gag, and
in my book, resorting to slobber for laughs is about as low as a comedy can
sink; we're talking a level of sophistication on par with vomit and snot
jokes.  But TURNER & HOOCH doesn't have the decency to stop at drooling;
showing no mercy, it even inflicts the dreaded fart joke on us.  The movie
never really decides what road it wants to take: in one scene it gives us
the flatulence gag, in the next a suspenseful shootout, and at the end a
shameless, tear-jerking finale.
        Hanks is at his best when he plays off-beat characters, like the
12-year-old in BIG and the narcissistic comedian in PUNCHLINE.  Movies like
THE 'BURBS and TURNER & HOOCH should be burned for failing to tap Hanks'
immense comic potential, let alone his capacity for drama.  Unfortunately,
in TURNER & HOOCH we get to see only fleeting moments of the actor's comic
genius.
        On the other hand, as Hooch,  Beasley delivers a riveting,
Oscar-calibre performance; I'd definitely nominate him for best dog in a
major motion picture.  As one audience member exclaimed: "That dog's so
ugly it's cute!"  I must admit Beasley does possess an incredibly
expressive face, and he's perhaps the finest actor in the movie.
        Actually, in all seriousness, that honor probably goes to Mare
Winningham as the veterinarian who becomes Hanks' love-interest.  What
little screen time she has is precious; she turns in a credible performance
in a forgettable film.
        TURNER & HOOCH might have created more sparks if it had been from
the dog's point of view or, better yet, if Turner and Hooch had switched
minds halfway through the movie.  Now that might have been funny: Tom Hanks
mimicking a canine.  The mind-switching doggie movie--it's never been done
before!

Title
Review for Talk Radio (1988)
        When I saw BETRAYED, I thought the most interesting part of the
movie was its opening sequence, which portrayed the 1984 assassination of
Denver shock-radio jock Alan Berg.  I remember thinking at the time that
someone should make an entire film about Berg.  Director Oliver Stone
obviously agreed and the result is TALK RADIO.
        TALK RADIO is adapted from Eric Bogosian's play of the same name,
which in turn was based on Stephen Singular's book "Talked to Death: The
Life and Murder of Alan Berg."  TALK RADIO's rendition of Berg is Barry
Champlain, an all-night talk-show host who likes to insult and abuse his
callers and attack their right-wing views.  His listeners call to discuss
topics ranging from sticking your hand in the garbage disposal to denying
the existence of the holocaust.  TALK RADIO chronicles the last four days
of Champlain's life, during which his boss is attempting to cut a deal for
the national syndication of his show.  With a corporate big-wig observing
him, Champlain is expected to be on his best behavior--a chore he finds
extremely difficult.  Nearly all of the film is set in the KGAB broadcast
studio with Champlain on the air taking phone calls.
        TALK RADIO is a directorial triumph for Stone; he makes watching a
talk show for two hours absorbing, thought-provoking, and visually
stimulating.  The camera work, editing, and close-ups of Champlain raving
into the microphone give TALK RADIO a strong sense of claustrophobia and
in-your-face intensity.  Stone has elicited an Oscar-calibre performance
from Eric Bogosian, who plays the tormented, angry, and self-destructive
Champlain.  Some of his broadcasts in the film are so inflammatory and
passionate that they bring you to the edge of your seat.  TALK RADIO is a
gripping, close-range character study of a troubled man on the verge of an
emotional breakdown.  Stone also succeeds in tapping the talents of the
film's excellent supporting cast, which includes Ellen Greene as
Champlain's ex-wife and Alec Baldwin as KGAB's general manager.
        My only criticism of TALK RADIO is that some of the issues it
raises get lost under a blanket of ambiguity.  The film addresses such
matters as racism, anti-semitism, freedom of speech, and the role of
media--especially radio--in our lives.  But I never quite could fathom the
exact point of the film, or the meaning of Champlain's life and death.
Bogosian's electrifying performance and Stone's masterful direction,
however, more than compensate for this shortcoming.

Title
Review for Life Stinks (1991)
        In his first movie since 1987's disappointing SPACEBALLS, Mel
Brooks takes a sympathetic look at America's homeless, a surprisingly sober
subject matter for the usually zany comedian.  However, even with its
solemn theme, LIFE STINKS is still your basic Mel Brooks-comedy, which is
to say that it's abundantly funny and immensely entertaining.
        In addition to writing and directing, Brooks stars as an
egotistical billionaire who wagers that he can live on the streets of L.A.
for 30 days without money and without revealing his true identity.  Brooks
steers the movie mostly towards laughs, but he also gives it heart and
soul, especially when presenting the homeless.
        Leslie Ann Warren, in particular, sparkles as the romantic interest
(a crazy bag lady who's wary of men), bringing a tough grittiness to the
role.  The movie's Achilles' heel: it sometimes gets so ludicrous that you
can't take its serious moments seriously.  With a slightly sharper edge,
Brooks could have carved out some memorable social commentary to sprinkle
on top of his irreverent humor.

Title
Review for Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me (1992)
        When I arrived in Paris in June, 1992, I was surprised to find
France plastered with posters TWIN PEAKS: FIRE WALK WITH ME, since the
movie wasn't scheduled to open in the U.S. until late August.  Happily, the
film--the prequel to David Lynch's cult television series--was playing in a
fancy, THX theater.  Unfortunately, the theater was far more impressive
than the movie, which absolutely stinks, much like a French lavatory.
Worse, actually.
        FIRE WALK WITH ME (directed by Lynch) will be completely
incomprehensible to anyone who has not seen the TV series or read "Laura
Palmer's Secret Diary."  For "Twin Peaks" junkies, like me, the movie is
only marginally improved.  The plot is jumbled and illogical, not to
mention excruciatingly sluggish.  The first 30 minutes, which have almost
nothing to do with the main story line, feature Chris Isaak and Kiefer
Sutherland as FBI agents investigating a murder in Portland, Oregon.  The
movie then stops in Philadelphia for a nonsensical cameo by David Bowie and
a BRIEF appearance by Kyle MacLachlan as Dale Cooper.  Lynch then drops
this plot strand altogether and abruptly shifts the setting to Twin Peaks,
Washington--one year later.
        Ah, Twin Peaks: "familiar territory," you think to yourself as
Angelo Badalamenti's distinctive musical score chimes in.  Wrong!  The
movie proves that you really can't go home again, or at least Lynch can't.
Only about a quarter of the characters from the TV series appear in the
movie: Leland Palmer, Bobby Briggs, James, Shelly, Leo, the log lady and a
few others--mostly in meaningless cameos.  The rest of the "Twin Peaks"
cast is nowhere to be seen, and consequently, Lynch fails to recreate the
spirit and flavor of TV's most enigmatic town.  Cast members Michael
Ontkean, Sherilyn Fenn, Piper Laurie, and Richard Beymer are sorely missed,
not to mention Lara Flynn Boyle, who has been replaced by lackluster Moira
Kelly in the crucial role of Donna.
        The movie concentrates solely on Laura Palmer (Sheryl Lee) as she
suffers through drug abuse, prostitution, and incest, during her miserable
last seven days on Earth.  The night of Laura's death, which is truly
terrifying, is the film's only remotely effective sequence.  We finally get
to see exactly what happened to Laura after she jumped off James'
motorcycle and ran into the woods at that lonely traffic light in the
middle of nowhere.  Her murder unfolds just as Agent Cooper reconstructed
it in the TV series, which is gratifying for faithful "Twin Peaks" viewers.
But it's an awfully small reward for sitting through a painfully awful
movie.

Title
Review for Punchline (1988)
        With the blockbuster comedy BIG, Tom Hanks firmly established
himself as one of the elite comic actors in Hollywood.  In PUNCHLINE,
Hanks, in an untypically serious and dramatic role, gives unquestionably
his finest performance to date and demonstrates that his acting abilities
extend well beyond comedy.  Hanks plays down and out stand-up comic Steve
Gold.  Flat broke and having dropped out of medical school, Steve is a
fledgling comedian and one of the regulars at "The Gas Station," a New York
comedy club.  Night after night, he and several other comics perform at the
club for dismal pay in the hopes of getting a big break--that is, being
discovered by a casting agent and getting a shot at network television and
stardom.
        Hanks shows incredible dramatic range in a deeply textured
performance.  Evoking everything from pathos to contempt, Steve is complex,
self-destructive, and emotionally disturbed.  In some ways, comedian Steve
Gold is, believe it or not, even more immature than the 12-year-old Hanks
played in BIG.  Steve is usually cold and mean-spirited to others, but
occasionally he can be kind and warm-hearted as well, if it serves his
purposes.  For example, when another comic, played by Sally Fields, asks
him for advice on her jokes, initially he is very friendly and helpful, but
he immediately turns cold and vicious upon learning that she cannot pay him
right away for his services.  Despite these character flaws, or perhaps
because of them, Steve is a great comic; he uses his personal bitterness
and anger to fuel his comedy.  From his displays of rage and anger to his
quiet moments of pain and suffering, Hanks is enthralling throughout
PUNCHLINE.
        Although she must compete with Hanks' impressive performance,
Fields is quite effective and holds her own as Lilah, a housewife who
yearns to make people laugh.  Lilah eventually becomes Steve's protege and
friend.  He gives her pointers and drags her to some of his gigs.  In one
hilarious scene, Lilah observes Steve as he performs in a hospital to an
audience of doctors, nurses, and patients.  As friends, as rivals, and as
almost-lovers, the chemistry between Steve and Lilah is strong.  With
Steve's help, Lilah learns to abandon her generic jokes and to use her
family life as a rich source of humorous material.
        Although PUNCHLINE provides some behind-the-scenes glances at
stand-up comedy, its prime emphasis is on Steve's emotional problems and on
Lilah's conflicts with her family.  Throughout the film, Lilah's
husband--John Goodman in a magnificent supporting role--opposes her comedy
career.  He thinks that she is neglecting her family and abandoning her
responsibilities as mother and wife.  Like all of the major characters in
PUNCHLINE, however, Goodman's is complex and dynamic, and the film avoids
stereotyping him as a callous villain.  He is never motivated by anything
other than his love for Lilah and their two daughters.
        Director David Seltzer brings sensitivity and authenticity to the
scenes involving Lilah's family; these scenes effectively portray the
turmoil that Lilah's comedy career has created at home.  For instance,
after returning home from watching Steve perform at the hospital, Lilah
frantically tries to get dressed and prepare a dinner for company in 5
minutes flat.  Lilah's home life also serves to underscore Steve's
loneliness and solitude; whereas she always can rely on her family's love
and support, he is estranged from his family and has only comedy to sustain
him.
        PUNCHLINE, like TERMS OF ENDEARMENT, is a film that successfully
walks a fine line between comedy and drama.  Seltzer always captures just
the right balance with his delicate and deft manipulation of the movie's
tone.  In addition to delivering big laughs both on and off the comedy
stage, PUNCHLINE provides powerful moments of human drama.  Several scenes
in the film, such as the almost-too-pat ending and the domestic scenes,
easily could have been contrived and superficial.  However, under Seltzer's
steady direction and with the support of the fine acting and screenplay,
these scenes are sincere and heartfelt.
        As a long time stand-up comedy aficionado, I was naturally curious
to see whether Hanks and Fields could perform comedy convincingly on stage.
In the film, the two actors come across not only as genuine stand-up
comedians, but as fairly good ones.  At least part of the credit for this
goes to San Francisco comic Barry Sobel who coached Hanks in his role and
who has a small part in the film.
        I do have a few minor criticisms of the movie.  For instance,
Lilah's one night transformation from nervous and awkward housewife to
polished comedienne is too rapid to be believable.  And a scene in which
Hanks bombs on stage because of an emotional crisis doesn't ring true.
        Even if you don't like the cast or the subject matter, PUNCHLINE is
a must see simply for Tom Hanks' parody of the Gene Kelly "Singing in the
Rain" dance number.

Title
Review for Cousins (1989)
        The dramatic comedy COUSINS has all the necessary ingredients: a
witty and whimsical script, inspired performances, a great sense of humor,
a large and wonderful cast, and the beautiful scenery of Vancouver.  It's a
movie of weddings, marriage, family, infidelity, and--oh yes--love.
        Like 3 MEN AND A BABY, COUSINS is an Americanized version of a
French film: 1975's COUSIN, COUSINE.  The plot is complicated, but it goes
something like this.  Larry and Tom are cousins, each of whom is
not-so-happily-married.  Tom starts an affair with Larry's wife, Tish, and
to get even, Larry and Tom's wife, Maria, pretend to have an affair of
their own.  Soon the pretending turns to love and COUSINS is off and
running.
        COUSINS is populated by a wide assortment of interesting characters
and caricatures.  The acting is first rate down to even the smallest
supporting role, and virtually every performance deserves mention.  Ted
Danson (in his first starring film role) finally gets to play a character
with some depth and sensitivity.  While Larry may be confident and charming
like Sam Malone on "Cheers," he is also complex and vulnerable, with more
between his ears than empty space.  As Maria, Isabella Rossellini is a joy
to watch; she is shy, sensuous, and immensely alluring.  Sean Young is
perfectly cast as Larry's picture perfect wife, Tish, a superficial and
trendy make-up consultant.  Keith Coogan, from ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING,
is wonderfully weird and eccentric as Larry's rebellious son, Mitch.  And
finally, Lloyd Bridges in a tour de force performance is Mitch's
rambunctious grandfather; he provides some of COUSINS' best lines and
laughs.
        Like MOONSTRUCK, COUSINS is a mix of drama and comedy.  The film is
larger than life and has a keen sense of the absurd.  It understands human
nature extremely well and milks it for every possible laugh and heart-tug.
How often do you see a movie where you believe that two characters truly
and sincerely care for and love each other, as friends and as lovers?
Well, to its credit, COUSINS is just such a movie.  Let's hope the French
continue to provide us with the inspiration to make films like COUSINS

Title
Review for Yaaba (1989)
        Set and filmed in Africa, YAABA is an enchanting slice of life
which doesn't cater in any way to American audiences.  The movie, which won
the International Critics Award at the 1989 Cannes Film Festival, takes us
into the world of Bila, a rambunctious boy living in a small village.  You
could think of Bila as an African Huck Finn.  He is the village
rascal--good natured but always getting into trouble, usually with his
stern father.  Bila gets in especially hot water when he befriends Sana, an
old woman whom the villagers have shunned as a witch.  Sana lives by
herself away from the village, but Bila brings her food and keeps her
company; he affectionately calls her Yaaba, or grandmother.  When he's not
visiting Sana, Bila either plays with his flirtatious friend Nopoko or
fights with the other boys in the village.
        The movie's charm lies not in its plot, which is virtually
nonexistent, but in its wonderful characters.  YAABA is set in an exotic
culture, but the personalities within the culture are universal.  There's
the town drunk, the kind mother, the bitchy wife, and various other human
archetypes.  YAABA is a unique opportunity to visit Africa without having
to spend your life savings on air-fare.

Title
Review for Another Woman (1988)
   Two unfortunate trends have reared their ugly heads in Woody Allen's
recent movies: the first is a shift away from comedy, Allen's forte, and
toward drama, and the second is Allen's reluctance to appear on-screen. 
ANOTHER WOMAN suffers from both of these problems.
   Told through flashbacks, dreams, and first person narration, ANOTHER
WOMAN is a somber and humorless psychological character study of a 50-year
old woman.  Gena Rowlands plays the cerebral and emotionally reserved
philosophy professor undergoing a mid-life crisis.  In the film, she has
rented an apartment so she can work undisturbed on a new book.  The
apartment turns out to be adjacent to a psychiatrist's office, and through
a vent she can overhear his therapy sessions.  As Rowlands tries to write
her book, she becomes infatuated with eavesdropping on one of her
neighbor's depressed patients, played by ... you guessed it ... Mia
Farrow.  Listening to Farrow's emotional problems leads Rowlands to
question her own life: her marriages, her childhood, her cold personality,
and so forth.  In short, she has a major mid-life crisis.
   Rowlands gives a solid performance and is convincing as a woman
incapable of expressing either warmth or passion, but, unfortunately, her
character is not very likeable.  Rowlands appears in nearly every frame of
ANOTHER WOMAN, and in not one of these frames do you ever really care
about her.  If Allen wants us to invest our emotions in this character, he
needs to expose her charismatic side in addition to her repressed side.
   The movie has a fine (and sizeable) supporting cast--including Martha
Plimpton, David Ogden Stiers, and the late John Houseman in his final
role.  Betty Buckley instills a refreshing breath of life into the film
during her one minute cameo appearance.  However, Gene Hackman gives the
most engaging performance in the film (as Rowlands' unsuccessful suitor),
but his screen time is limited to only two scenes.  Allen keeps the movie
focussed exclusively on Rowlands and does not develop any of the other
characters; their sole purpose is to motivate Rowlands' introspective
reevaluation of her life.
   Although ANOTHER WOMAN is well-crafted and never boring, I had to ask
myself during the film: "Is this all there is?"  Allen's psychological
character study of this confused woman does not seem especially
enlightening or insightful.  Perhaps you have to be a 50-year-old in a
mid-life crisis to fully appreciate ANOTHER WOMAN.  Then again, you didn't
have to wake up 200 years into the future to appreciate SLEEPER.  Although
ANOTHER WOMAN may be Allen's most successful attempt at pure drama to
date, I can recommend it only to die hard fans who take pride in having
seen every film he has ever made.

Title
Review for Back to the Future Part III (1990)
        BACK TO THE FUTURE II ended with Doc Brown and Marty McFly buried
up to their necks in time-travel mayhem.  The fun of BACK TO THE FUTURE III
should have been watching Marty and Doc solve all the paradoxes they
created in part two.  But unfortunately, director Robert Zemeckis and
screenwriter Bob Gale somehow got sidetracked with the idea of making a
Western.
        Virtually all of BACK TO THE FUTURE III is set in the Wild West
circa 1885 so you have to judge the film _first_ as a Western and _then_ as
a time-travel movie.  As a Western, BACK TO THE FUTURE III is as flat as a
pancake.  The plot is merely a sequence of ho-hum cliches, from the big
showdown to a train hijacking.  They say the Western is dead; Back to the
Future III seems determined to prove it.
        Worse yet, the movie doesn't seem to care if its story line is
consistent with the first two films.  Parts one and two were meticulously
thought-out in terms of the dangers of time travel.  Part three, on the
other hand, shows blatant disregard for the time continuum.  The filmmakers
sweep all of the dangling plot strands from part two under the rug and then
expect you to forget about them.  You're supposed to believe that in one
fell swoop, Marty and Doc fix all of the paradoxes in all four of the time
periods.
        BACK TO THE FUTURE III is the only installment in the series that
wastes the supporting cast.  Thomas Wilson sparkled in the last movie as
the various versions of Biff, but here he gives a tiresome, one-note
performance as "Mad Dog" Tannen, Biff's ill-tempered, Wild West ancestor.
Lea Thompson, who always has been so charming as Marty's mother, has two
meaningless scenes as his Great Great Grandmother.  Mary Steenburgen has
the unenviable task of bringing to life a half-baked love affair with
Christopher Lloyd, who, according to the New York Times, receives his first
ever screen kiss in BACK TO THE FUTURE III.
        There's a sense of complacency about part three; it seems as if the
filmmakers just phoned the movie in after they came up with the Wild West
gimmick.  The film lacks the creative flair and whimsical imagination that
has made the series so much fun.  Even Bill and Ted's adventure was more
excellent than BACK TO THE FUTURE III.

Title
Review for Skin Deep (1989)
     One of my favorite songs by the Stranglers includes the lyric,
"You'd better watch out for the skin deep."  I'd like to extend the same
warning: watch out for SKIN DEEP, but whatever you do don't watch SKIN
DEEP.
     SKIN DEEP is a tedious and uneven comedy written and directed by
Blake Edwards.  John Ritter stars as Zach, a dried up writer and insatiable
womanizer with a big-time drinking problem.  I never saw Edwards' comedy
THE MAN WHO LOVED WOMEN, but I have to wonder whether SKIN DEEP is a
remake.  You see, to put it mildly, Zach goes to bed with just about each
and every woman he meets.  As the movie opens, Zach's wife, Alex, catches
him with not only his mistress but also his mistress' hairdresser.  Like
any sensible wife, Alex kicks Zach out of the house and divorces him.  In
response, Zach goes on a spiritual journey of drinking, womanizing,
psychotherapy, and self-discovery.  If you're turned on by the idea of
watching Ritter drink, get arrested, have sex, drink, crash his Mercedes,
have more sex, drink, get arrested again, drink, and sing horrendously at
the piano, then SKIN DEEP should be right up your alley.
     SKIN DEEP makes the fatal mistake of inflicting on us unbelievable
and unsympathetic characters.  Zach is a rich, '80s L.A. version of
Ritter's Jack Tripper character from "Three's Company."  Like Jack, Zach is
clumsy and inept; he's the type of guy whose bad aim makes him accidently
squirt breath freshener into his eye.  Zach is supposed to be charming and
charismatic, but I failed to see even one redeeming virtue in him.
Consequently, I never felt the least bit of sympathy or pity for the
philandering alcoholic during his moments of crisis.  In fact, when Zach
crashes his ex-wife's wedding in a desperate attempt to stop her from
remarrying, I actually rooted for her to go through with the ceremony.
     To add insult to injury, Edwards gives his large supporting cast
nothing but stereotypes with which to work.  For instance, Vincent
Gardenia's talents are wasted in his role as the fatherly bartender.  Of
all the women in the film--and there are many--Alyson Reed, alone, stands
out as Zach's wife; Reed brings intelligence and sensitivity to the role.
     Because we don't care the slightest bit about anyone in SKIN DEEP,
the film's few feeble attempts at drama inevitably fail.  The comedy in
SKIN DEEP doesn't fare much better.  Most of the jokes are dumb,
predictable, and sitcomish.  About every ten minutes, however, Edwards does
manage to come up with a good line or a novel sight-gag, the most effective
of which involves a pair of "dueling" condoms.  Overall, the laughs in SKIN
DEEP are just too infrequent and the characters just too shallow for the
film to stay afloat.
     My final criticism of the film lies in its glamorous depiction of
alcohol and alcoholism.  Zach's excessive drinking is clearly ruining his
life, but nevertheless it seems to give him more pleasure than pain.
Zach's drinking binges never have any truly serious or lasting
consequences.  If he crashes his Mercedes, he gets a new one.  If he gets
arrested, his lawyer bails him out of jail.  If his wife leaves him, she
will eventually decide to give him a second chance if he'll clean up his
act.  The tone in SKIN DEEP is all wrong; Edwards treats a very serious
issue far too lightly, making a joke out of a problem that is no joking
matter.  Perhaps Edwards should have studied Dudley Moore in ARTHUR or,
better yet, Michael Keaton in CLEAN AND SOBER before making SKIN DEEP.

Title
Review for Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles (1990)
        "Teenage mutant ninja turtles."  It's nearly impossible to say it
with a straight face; the concept is inherently funny.  Unfortunately,
watching the mutant turtles is not nearly as much fun as talking about
them.
        TEENAGE MUTANT NINJA TURTLES is not, thank goodness, another HOWARD
THE DUCK, but then again, it's not BATMAN or SUPERMAN either.  TURTLES is a
strange and ultimately unsatisfying mixture of whimsical humor, gritty
action, cute puppetry, and somber violence.  The movie just never finds its
niche.
        For those of you unfamiliar with the ninja turtle legacy, some
background history is in order.  The Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles first
appeared in a black and white underground comic book by Kevin Eastman and
Peter Laird.  Then, the turtles went mainstream and got their own Saturday
morning cartoon program and a second line of comic books, this one in color
and aimed at children.  TEENAGE MUTANT NINJA TURTLES is the live-action
film adaptation.
        The protagonists are four teenage turtles who as babies were
exposed to some radioactive slime which caused them to mutate.  They each
grew to the size of a human, learned to love pizza, and gained the ability
to walk upright and to talk in surfer jargon.  Like, gnarly man, these
dudes sound like Bill and Ted (from EXCELLENT ADVENTURE) and Spicoli (from
FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH).  Every other word they utter is something
like "cowabunga," "excellent," or "radical."  The turtles were raised by
Splinter, a mutant Japanese rat, who taught them the art of ninjitsu and
gave them names: Raphael, Leonardo, Michaelangelo, and Donatello.
        The film is set in New York and tells the story of the turtles'
battle against The Shredder, an evil crime lord who is training the city's
teenagers as ninja thieves.  The turtles team up with a pretty TV news
reporter (Judith Hoag) and a renegade street vigilante (Elias Koteas) to
rid New York of The Shredder and his goons.
        Sound like BATMAN?  Well, the movie also LOOKS like BATMAN.
TEENAGE MUTANT NINJA TURTLES is surprisingly gloomy and grim.  Its dark
film noir production design brings to mind both BATMAN and BLADE RUNNER.
So does the violence.  TURTLES is far too intense and frightening for young
children.  The film, however, is too juvenile for adults.  That leaves
teenagers and pre-teenagers as the only people on the planet who may have
an appetite for TURTLES.
        Ralph, Mikey, Leo, and Don are brought to life by puppet-master Jim
Henson, who claims that the creatures are the most advanced he has ever
created.  To get an idea of what they look like, imagine Arnold
Schwarzenegger in a Kermit the Frog costume, with a shell on his back.  The
turtles look okay, but they certainly don't live up to the magnificent
creatures from THE DARK CRYSTAL and LABYRINTH.  Furthermore, the four
turtles are virtually identical; it's hard to distinguish them as
individual characters.  Only Raphael, the temperamental, independent loner,
stands out as a distinct personality.
        Unfortunately, the human characters are just as artificial and
rubbery.  Hoag is kind of stiff as the TV reporter, but then again she is
not exactly performing Shakespeare.  Koteas, who comes off as a hybrid of
Mel Gibson, Robert De Niro, and Sean Penn, does what he can with his
cliched role as the dumb street-fighter.  The Shredder (James Saito) is a
shameless Darth Vader rip-off, complete with helmet and raspy, sinister
voice.
        Most of the movie is condescending, but thankfully, every so often
a clever sense of humor creeps into the story.  Screenwriters Todd Langen
and Bobby Herbeck come up with several snappy one-liners.  My favorite: one
of the turtles has just seen the movie CRITTERS and he mutters, "Where do
they come up with this stuff?"  Where indeed!

Title
Review for Tapeheads (1988)
        This definitely is not SPINAL TAP!  I am referring to the movie
TAPEHEADS, which tries to do for music videos what THIS IS SPINAL TAP did
for heavy metal: that is, provide a biting satire of the industry.  The
movie stars John Cusack and Tim Robbins as two good-for-nothing security
guards, who after losing their jobs, head for L.A. to try their hand at
making rock videos.  They call themselves the "Video Aces" and turn a
run-down loft in a seedy area of town into a production studio.  TAPEHEADS
traces Robbins and Cusack's improbable rise to fame.
        Despite its promising premise, TAPEHEADS falls far short of
reaching the brilliant level of parody that Rob Reiner achieved in SPINAL
TAP.  Bill Fishman, who directed TAPEHEADS, is a respected rock video
director best known for his work with the Ramones, Suicidal Tendencies, and
George Clinton.  However, TAPEHEADS is Fishman's first feature film, and
the movie reflects his lack of experience.  Under Fishman's direction,
TAPEHEADS often loses focus and coherence just when the satire is building
momentum.  Several other faults mar the movie as well, including a weak
script and poor acting.
        Cusack, who was exceptional as Buck Weaver in EIGHT MEN OUT, is
untypically mediocre and extremely disappointing in TAPEHEADS.  His
performance as an aggressive scam artist feels forced; Cusack's likeable
demeanor is not well suited to his unsympathetic role.  As Cusack's meek
video-whiz sidekick, Robbins (BULL DURHAM) is adequate.  His character is
more interesting and likeable than Cusack's, but Cusack overshadows him in
the film.  And to top things off, I was constantly distracted by Robbins'
uncanny resemblance to David Letterman; throughout TAPEHEADS, I constantly
expected to see some stupid pet tricks or a cameo by Paul Schaffer.
        The movie is also plagued by a stupid and unnecessary subplot about
a presidential candidate, a videocassette of him engaging in kinky sex, and
blackmail.  TAPEHEADS is desperately in need of more focus, stronger
protagonists, and above all a director, like Rob Reiner, behind the camera
who can maintain a subtle yet pointed satirical tone.
        Despite its numerous shortcomings, TAPEHEADS is not without its
merits.  The movie has an off-beat, quirky sense of humor and contains
several inventive scenes that succeed in humorously satirizing the music
video industry.  For example, the Video Aces film a hysterically funny
commercial in which the owner of a chicken and waffle fast food restaurant
struts around in gold chains and does a Run DMC-style rap.  He pays the
Aces for their services in buckets ... of chicken, that is.
        TAPEHEADS does a good job of mocking everything from rock videos to
TV newscasts to commercials for presidential candidates; unfortunately,
these biting parodies of television are few and far between.  The movie is
full of great cameos including Weird Al Yankovic, Ted Nugent, Bobcat
Goldthwait, Mike Nesmith, Martha Quinn, and Lyle Alzado.  The eccentric
soundtrack is also a lot of fun; it features actual bands like Devo and
Fishbone and fictitious ones like the Blender Children and a '60s soul duo
called the Swanky Modes.  However, in the balance--despite these few bright
spots--TAPEHEADS has just too many shortcomings for me to recommend it; see
SPINAL TAP again instead.

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 2 (1989)
        With LETHAL WEAPON 2, Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, and director
Richard Donner have created a Hollywood rarity: a worthwhile sequel.
Although the movie doesn't quite live up to part one, it does succeed in
recreating the slick mix of humor, action, and character that made the
original a superior crime thriller and a $70 million hit at the box office.
Gibson and Glover are still teamed together as partners, bickering and
teasing one another like a long married husband and wife.  Gibson has
remained wild, daring, and cool under pressure, and Glover, as always,
finds himself reluctantly agreeing to his partner's crazy plans.  However,
since the first film, Gibson has become more stable; we no longer question
his will to live or fear that he's on the verge of exploding.  The
charismatic performances by Gibson and Glover help distinguish LETHAL
WEAPON 2 from other cop films.
        The movie finds the two detectives chasing down vicious drug
dealers while at the same time protecting the man whose testimony is
crucial to the investigation.  The plot is pedestrian and full of holes,
but who cares when we're having so much fun?  As the key witness in the
investigation, Joe Pesci delivers an inspired comic performance with his
grating personality and nasal-voice.  Between Pesci's constant whining and
Gibson and Glover's playful rapport, the movie has plenty of laughs.
        The two leads play off each other especially well when Gibson
discovers that Glover has spent the night sitting on the toilet ... and for
good reason.  The villains have boobytrapped it with explosives.  Glover
dare not stand up, let alone flush.  In another clever scene, Glover
creates a diversion for Gibson at the South African Consulate by pretending
he wants to emigrate to South Africa.  "But you're BLACK!" responds the
horrified immigration official.  "I want to join my brothers in their
struggle against oppression!" Glover snaps back as he starts a big
commotion to distract the security guards.  Equally amusing is Gibson
returning home to his messy trailer and discovering (much to his dismay)
Pesci vacuuming and neatening up.
        LETHAL WEAPON 2 has one car chase too many, but otherwise it's an
exhilarating roller coaster ride of action and suspense.  The movie
maintains a high level of intensity from beginning to end.  The brutal
violence doesn't always mesh with the humor, but for the most part they
exist harmoniously side by side.  LETHAL WEAPON 2 has a large body count,
but it pushes all the right buttons to make us accept, and even root for,
the violence.
        Screenwriters Shane Black and Jeffrey Boam have blessed the movie
with despicable villains who are worthy of a James Bond film.  Joss Ackland
plays the Minister of the South African Consulate--a cold, murderous
criminal who hides behind his diplomatic immunity.  As his right-hand man,
Derrick O'Connor is equally deplorable, a heartless killer in his own
right.  These villains need not have been South Africans (in fact, the
movie could have done without its underdeveloped political undertones), but
their politics makes them all the more creepy.
        The only area where Donner and his cast come up short is in their
attempts to give the movie some substance and the characters some depth.
The film tries to develop Gibson's character, but its efforts are
superficial.  For example, to show that he has regained his ability to
love, the film throws in a superfluous affair between Gibson and Patsy
Kensit.  Their encounter is just window dressing, a feeble attempt at
character development.  Glover fares no better; his character development
is limited to one small plot strand about his daughter appearing in a
condom commercial.  The filmmakers should have known better than to worry
about making the characters complex; the movie is already overflowing with
big laughs and rousing action.

Title
Review for She-Devil (1989)
        Revenge may be ugly, but it sure is a lot of fun in SHE-DEVIL.  In
the casting coup of the year, Meryl Streep plays the comic role, a
glamorous romance novelist, and Roseanne Barr plays the serious part, an
anything-but-glamorous housewife.  The link between these two women is Ed
Begley, Jr., who plays Barr's husband.  He's having an affair with Streep
... and with his secretary.  So Barr does what any sensible housewife would
do: she seeks REVENGE--sweet, bloody, vicious revenge!  Her goal is to
systematically ruin Begley's life.
        SHE-DEVIL is the blackest comedy I've seen since HEATHERS.  And
like HEATHERS, the movie is a fantasy; you're expected to take the
outlandish story with a grain of salt.  Director Susan Seidelman isn't
concerned with giving us something to chew on; she's more intent on giving
us a good time--and she does!  SHE-DEVIL is a thoroughly enjoyable affair.
        The movie stands out for its visual style.  Seidelman makes
extraordinarily good use of the movie camera.  For example, the slow-mo of
Barr tripping in high heels is hysterical--so is the silent movie parody of
Barr and Linda Hunt fixing up an old warehouse.  Seidelman's tour de force
direction is almost as memorable as the performances.
        What can you say about Streep that hasn't already been said?  Well,
for one, she makes a great dizzy blonde.  Streep has played all sorts of
roles before, but never one quite like this.  It's jolting to see her act
air-headed, ultra-feminine, and super-flirtatious.  Streep is known as the
greatest dramatic actresses of our time; SHE-DEVIL gives her the chance to
show-off her knack for comedy.  She emerges as a wonderfully gifted comic
actress, turning a potentially generic role into something truly special
... and funny.
        Barr is not Streep's equal, but even so, she holds her own against
her more experienced co-star.  Barr makes you feel sorry for her klutzy,
unattractive character: you can't help but root for the rejected housewife
as she carries out her revenge.  Barr shows a surprisingly natural screen
presence in her film debut.
        SHE-DEVIL is essentially light-weight fluff, but you hardly notice
because you're too busy appreciating the performances, the direction, and
the humor.

Title
Review for Paperhouse (1988)
        PAPERHOUSE is probably one of those movies you've never heard of,
which is a shame because it's a gem.  The film was released in 1989 to a
handful of rave reviews, but it failed to find an audience and quickly
disappeared from the theaters.  It is now available on videocassette.  I
rented it expecting a solid little thriller; I did not expect to be swept
away--to be deeply moved, disturbed, and frightened.  PAPERHOUSE was,
without question, one of 1989's most striking and haunting films.  I'm
kicking myself for having missed the movie in the theater where it would
have had even greater visual and emotional impact.
        The movie (based on the novel MARIANNE DREAMS by Catherine Storr)
revolves around Anna, a precocious 11-year old played by Charlotte Burke.
Anna is a bratty troublemaker, miserable to everyone around her.  She gives
her teacher hell, she lies, and she is crabby to her mother (Glenne
Headly).  Then again, Anna has good reason to be bitter: she doesn't get
enough attention from her working mother and her father is never around
because his job keeps him away from home.
        PAPERHOUSE begins on Anna's eleventh birthday, and it's not a good
one.  First she gets detention at school, and then she comes down with a
glandular illness and starts running a fever and having fainting spells.
Happy birthday!  Anna's doctor orders her to stay in bed for at least a
week, a fate worth than death for a hyperactive eleven-year-old.  Anna
fills the time by drawing pictures.  In particular, she creates a drawing
of a house in a field with a boy looking out the second story window.
Then, a strange thing happens: every time Anna sleeps or faints, she has
vivid dreams of the house and boy in her drawing.  Anna soon discovers that
any change she makes to the drawing creates a corresponding change in her
dream world.
        In her dreams, Anna befriends Marc, the boy in the window, who
turns out to be paralyzed from the waist down.  The movie really plunges
into the twilight zone when Anna discovers that her doctor has a patient
named Marc who suffers from cerebral palsy; he is paralyzed from the waist
down!  In short, Anna knows Marc from her dreams despite having never met
him in her waking life.  The film is an eerie love story between a boy and
a girl who know each other only in their dreams.
        PAPERHOUSE is much more sophisticated and provocative than any of
the NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET films.  Director Bernard Rose and screenwriter
Matthew Jacobs realize that the most frightening horror lies not in special
effects but in the subconscious mind.  PAPERHOUSE dives into Anna's psyche,
exploring, among other things, her resentment toward her father and her
budding sexuality.  But at the same time, the character of Marc (Elliott
Spiers) gives the film a supernatural twist.  Marc, like Anna, exists in
both the dream world and the real world, which suggests that there is some
sort of weird psychic connection between the two, even though they have
never met.  The filmmakers wisely leave the fantastical elements of the
movie unexplained.  PAPERHOUSE walks a delicate line between psychological
drama and supernatural horror.  The ending, which easily could have ruined
the movie, is strangely satisfying: on one hand, it answers all of our
questions--on the other hand, it answers none of them.
        Three key ingredients make the movie effective.  First and
foremost, there is Burke's extraordinary performance as Anna.  Although
Spiers (as Marc) and Headly (as Anna's mother) are outstanding, PAPERHOUSE
is really Burke's show.  Her acting is invisible, or seamless.  That is, we
are never conscious of a performance; all we see is a fully realized
character.  Second, there is the stunning production design which brings
Anna's dream world to life.  The dream house is dark, dank, and depressing.
A sense of dread lurks in the air, and it makes you want to flee.  Third,
there is the flawless direction by Rose, whose experience as a music video
director evidently prepared him well for the visual challenge of making
PAPERHOUSE, his directorial debut.
        PAPERHOUSE is hard to shake once it catches you in its grip.  It is
a truly imaginative creation, and it just may be the scariest film since
THE LADY IN WHITE, which is another overlooked treasure also available on
home video.

Title
Review for Heathers (1989)
        What can you say about a movie that satirizes teen suicide?  Well,
you'd probably call it sick, demented, and perverse.  And while the black
comedy HEATHERS is all these things, it's also outrageously funny and
refreshingly off-beat.
        HEATHERS stars Winona Ryder as Veronica, and as the film begins,
she's in basic training ... training to be arrogant, bitchy, and most
important, popular.  Her mentor is Heather, or make that the Heathers as
there are three of them: Heather 1, Heather 2, and Heather 3.  These
preppie Diet Coke heads are the social elite of Westerburg High; they enjoy
the ultimate social power of deciding who is in and who is out.
        Even though Veronica aspires to be popular, her brains,
sensitivity, and conscience set her apart from the Heathers, her cold and
heartless mentors.  And just when her admiration for the Heathers turns to
contempt, Veronica meets J.D., played by Christian Slater who gives a
delicious Jack Nicholsonesque performance as the mysterious, rebellious,
and demented new kid at school.  J.D. has the alarming capacity for turning
Veronica's angry thoughts and urges into reality.  For instance, Veronica
wishes in her diary that Heather number one would die, and the next thing
she knows she and J.D. have killed her.  To escape criminal charges, they
disguise Heather's death as a suicide.  And much to Veronica's surprise,
suicide becomes the latest rage at Westerburg high.
        HEATHERS definitely is not for everyone.  Some viewers inevitably
will be offended by its subject matter.  But if you're looking for a dark
comedy with a biting edge to it, then HEATHERS has a lot to offer.  Daniel
Waters' script is full of hysterical dialogue and great one-liners, and the
teenage slang he creates for the movie is a riot.  The performances are
inspired across the board, especially those by Ryder and Slater who develop
sizzling chemistry in the lead roles.
        My only problem with HEATHERS (and it's a big one) is that after an
hour of great satire, the movie sells out and turns into a full-blown
thriller.  Although the climax is exciting, it's too violent and somber in
comparison to the rest of the film.  After sustaining perfect pitch for
over an hour, HEATHERS finishes on the wrong note.  Nevertheless, HEATHERS
deserves applause for taking risks and daring to be different.

Title
Review for Fletch Lives (1989)
        In FLETCH LIVES, everybody's favorite investigative reporter is
back in action, but unfortunately he's neither better than ever nor new and
improved.  FLETCH LIVES is a disappointing sequel to the 1985 hit comedy
FLETCH, which was a surprisingly engaging Chevy Chase vehicle.  With Chase
returning in the role of Fletch and with Michael Ritchie serving once again
as director, I had hoped that FLETCH LIVES would be better than the average
sequel.  I should have known better.  FLETCH LIVES pales in comparison to
the original; someone should have put this sequel out of its misery.
        After his dismal outing in so-called FUNNY FARM, you'd think that
for the sake of his career, Chase would have learned to avoid the
country-side.  But no, in FLETCH LIVES he inherits a mansion in Louisiana,
which gives him an excuse to quit his crummy job at the paper, pack his
chest, and move to the mid-west.  In Louisiana, Fletch immediately becomes
embroiled in an elaborate and tiresome plot involving the usual mayhem: a
murder, a televangelist, a beautiful blonde, a big brute, and a dastardly
villain.
        Although FLETCH LIVES is genuinely funny at times, more often it
flounders and flails.  None of the blame, however, falls on Chase, who does
his best to evoke laughs in the face of a flat screenplay.  Chase gives his
character that biting sarcasm and quick wit that made the first film so
much fun.  And, as in the original, Chase's disguises are simply amazing
and his impersonations brilliant.  When Chase passes himself off as a faith
healer, for example, he's completely unrecognizable, and the scene proves
to be one of the few in the movie to offer some inspired humor.
        Unfortunately, Chase's efforts are sabotaged by the film's
incredibly uneven script and unnecessarily complicated story line.  While
some of the jokes and gags are effective, most of them fizzle and cater to
the lowest common denominator.  In fact, FLETCH LIVES hits rock bottom when
it commits the unforgivable sin of resorting to nose-picking jokes.  FLETCH
LIVES also suffers from excess plot; the uncompelling story line should
have been merely an excuse for Fletch's irreverent impersonations and
wisecracks.  But the film devotes so much time and energy to its
uncompelling plot that the comic moments often get lost in the shuffle.
        Ultimately, there's very little to recommend in FLETCH LIVES as the
movie fails to give us either sympathetic characters or sufficient laughs.

Title
Review for Heart Condition (1990)
        HEART CONDITION is all over the map; it's a high-concept mess,
suffering from multiple personalities.  Every few minutes, the film changes
genre, switching from buddy movie, to ghost comedy, to dramatic character
study, and to cops and robbers action.  The movie is a case study in
schizophrenia.
        Bob Hoskins plays an overweight cop who smokes and eats greasy
food.  He's a heart attack waiting to happen.  And ten minutes into the
movie, it does happen: Hoskins nearly dies of heart failure.  His life is
saved thanks to a last second transplant; Denzel Washington plays the
donor, a debonair lawyer who's been murdered.  The hook is that Washington
returns as a ghost to haunt Hoskins, pestering him to bring the killers to
justice.
        Writer-director James Parriott seems to be striving for the glossy
mix of comedy and action that raked in big bucks for BEVERLY HILLS COP.
And in Washington, the movie has an actor with enough charisma to blow
Eddie Murphy off the screen.  Unfortunately, thanks to Parriott's inept,
cliche-ridden script, HEART CONDITION never gels.  The running joke is that
Hoskins can see Washington, but no one else can see him.  So you have
countless scenes in which Hoskins argues with Washington in public.  To
everyone else around him, it looks like Hoskins is yelling at himself.
Gee, what will they think of next?!?
        The movie is pretty dumb, but luckily the performances make it
bearable.  Washington is simply captivating; he's an exciting screen
presence, even in a corpse like HEART CONDITION.  Hoskins is a tremendously
gifted comic actor, but regrettably he is betrayed by inferior material.
As Hoskins' ex-girlfriend, Chloe Webb makes her mixed-up character seem
reasonably convincing.  But it IS hard to believe that she's actually
attracted to Hoskins' grungy character.  In fact, when she kissed him at
the screening I attended, someone in the audience responded with a
resounding "Yuck!"
        Perhaps the most amusing aspect of HEART CONDITION is Washington's
wardrobe.  After he dies and becomes a ghost, Washington's clothing
magically changes in every scene to match his environment.  At the beach,
he's in shorts and a T-shirt.  In the hospital, he's in a spiffy blue
bathrobe.  Apparently, ghosts can change their wardrobe at will.  Oh, the
joys of the afterlife...

Title
Review for Mississippi Burning (1988)
        Alan Parker's controversial civil rights drama, MISSISSIPPI
BURNING, is an exciting and gripping drama, but one--alas--marred by
several flaws.
        At the heart of the film is an outstanding performance by Gene
Hackman as Anderson, a former sheriff turned FBI agent.  In his home state
of Mississippi, Anderson finds himself to be both an insider and an
outsider.  He hails from the South and knows its values, attitudes, and
mentality, but personally he has rejected them.  At the same time, however,
he is too much a free spirit and an individual to completely fit within the
FBI.  Hackman's character in MISSISSIPPI BURNING is fascinating and the
most intriguing aspect of the film.
        Under Parker's sensationalistic direction, MISSISSIPPI BURNING is
intense and disturbing.  However, several aspects of the film are
troubling.  MISSISSIPPI BURNING evokes immense hatred towards its villains.
Parker manipulates your emotions such that you want nothing more than the
FBI to kick some butt--in other words, to nail the bad guys.  Although the
FBI's vendetta is extremely rousing, I had to ask myself: isn't this the
function of a Rambo or Charles Bronson movie?
        MISSISSIPPI BURNING is not really about the civil rights movement
at all.  Rather, the film depicts a struggle of wills between two stubborn
FBI men: Hackman and his superior, played by Willem Dafoe.  Dafoe is a
strict, by the books agent who follows FBI procedure to the bone.  Hackman,
who is more familiar with the South, likes to do things his own way, even
if he must bend or break the rules.  MISSISSIPPI BURNING is more concerned
with the conflict between Hackman and Dafoe than it is with the racial
unrest between the blacks and the whites in Mississippi.  Underneath
Hackman and Dafoe's clash and underneath the film's Rambo mentality, the
important issues get lost: those pertaining to the civil rights movement.
        My main problem, then, with MISSISSIPPI BURNING is its historical
setting.  Why did Parker have to set this story of two FBI men in the civil
rights era?  And more importantly, why did he have to base the film on a
true incident?  MISSISSIPPI BURNING's fictionalized historical basis
distracted me.  I constantly wondered which parts were true and which were
fictional.
        MISSISSIPPI BURNING is troubling and thought-provoking.  To be
honest, at the end, I wasn't sure exactly how I felt about it.  Ultimately,
I think it is a worthwhile but challenging and perturbing film.  I applaud
its dramatic intensity, but I have to question the film's light dismissal
of important underlying racial issues.

Title
Review for Dream Team, The (1989)
        THE DREAM TEAM is a thoroughly entertaining comedy featuring four
loveable characters who just happen to be slightly insane.  Billy, played
by Michael Keaton, is an extremely temperamental mental ward patient whose
short fuse and violent tantrums tend to get him in trouble.  Christopher
Lloyd portrays Henry, an obsessive-compulsive who requires that everything
be neat, orderly, on schedule, and by the books.  He thinks he's a doctor
so he walks around wearing a suit and carrying a clipboard on which he
constantly scribbles notes and files reports.  Jack, played by Peter Boyle,
thinks he's Jesus.  And finally, there's Stephen Furst as Albert, a chubby
catatonic who speaks only in baseball and television phrases.
        THE DREAM TEAM follows the misadventures that beset the four-some
when their psychiatrist, Dr. Weitzman, takes them out of the hospital for a
field trip to Yankee Stadium.  During a pit stop, they get separated from
Weitzman and are left to fend for themselves in Manhattan.
        The movie's charm derives mostly from the camaraderie and chemistry
between its delightful cast.  The four leads in the film play off each
other quite effectively; they never miss an opportunity to argue, bicker,
or insult one another.  Henry and Jack, for example, fight over who's going
to get to ride in the front passenger seat on the way to the game.
        The actors in THE DREAM TEAM have a lot of fun with their
characters and with each other.  Michael Keaton is well cast as Billy; he
gives his cynical character considerable complexity.  As the divinely Jack,
Peter Boyle succeeds in keeping his one-dimensional character funny and
fresh.  Although Stephen Furst's catatonic character is cliched, the actor
makes him sympathetic and endearing.
        While Keaton, Boyle, and Furst are good, it's Christopher Lloyd who
really makes the movie special.  Lloyd gives yet another outstanding comic
performance.  His body language (for example, the way he walks) and his
facial expressions are perfectly suited to his compulsive character.
Lloyd's brilliant performance yields a pathetic, moving, and memorable
character.
        THE DREAM TEAM is a solid comedy with more depth and drama than you
might expect from its simple premise.  The characters are so appealing that
you can excuse the film for its often outlandish and unbelievable plot.

Title
Review for Earth Girls Are Easy (1989)
        EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY gives new meaning to the phrase, "leave your
brain at the door."  Although it's silly and fun, EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY is
also mindless, unoriginal, and altogether forgettable.
        The movie arose from the twisted mind of July Brown, the singer and
video star who's responsible for such classic tunes as "The Homecoming
Queen Has a Gun" and "I Like My Men Big and Stupid."  Brown co-wrote EARTH
GIRLS ARE EASY, which takes its name from one of her songs.
        Geena Davis stars as a manicurist from the Valley who catches her
fiance in bed with another woman.  The next day as she's sulking and
sunbathing, a space ship inhabited by three furry and sex-starved aliens
crash lands in her swimming pool.  The aliens, who look kind of like teddy
bears, quickly learn English by watching television--isn't that original?
Davis initially panics in reaction to her unusual house-guests, but then
she comes to her senses and takes them to the "Curl Up & Dye" beauty salon
for electrolysis.  With their fur removed, we can finally recognize the
three aliens as Jeff Goldblum and comedians Jim Carrey and Damon Wayans.
The movie depicts their fish-out-of-water misadventures, which include an
interplanetary love story between Goldblum and Davis.
        EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY is consistently entertaining and engaging.
Director Julian Temple, who's best known for rock videos and the film
ABSOLUTE BEGINNERS, has created a colorful and fast-moving film.  Geena
Davis' talents are well suited to her weird and eccentric, yet sympathetic,
character.  July Brown is extremely appealing in her supporting role as
Davis' air-headed, fun-loving, and boy-crazy boss; she's especially
hilarious in a musical scene at the beach in which she extolls the virtues
of being a dizzy blonde.  And Carrey, Wayans, and Goldblum make the most of
their one-dimensional roles.
        Unfortunately, EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY is too much like a TV sitcom.
The movie's slapstick comedy is reminiscent of shows like "Laverne &
Shirley."  Like most TV sitcoms, EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY is formulaic and
doesn't contain an ounce of originality.  But even so, the movie does
provide a few moments of inspired comedy, such as its satirical barbs at
valley girls.  Most of the time, however, EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY seems like
nothing more than one long July Brown video.  The movie is full of musical
dance numbers which don't advance the story.
        So while EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY is perfect if you're looking for some
harmless and disposable entertainment, it won't give you much food for
thought.  By the end of the closing credits, EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY will have
already slipped from memory.

Title
Review for 'burbs, The (1989)
        Poor Ray Peterson: all he wanted was to spend his vacation quietly
at homerelaxing, mowing the lawn, fixing the barbecue, and watching ball
games on TV.  But then, he met the Klopeks, his new next-door neighbors, in
THE 'BURBS, the horror spoof starring Tom Hanks.  The Klopeks aren't like
us normal folks, and they certainly don't fit into Suburbia, U.S.A.  For
instance, their house is decrepit, their yard has grown out of control, no
one has ever seen them, and strange noises come from their basement late at
night.  As Ray becomes suspicious of his new "neighbors from Hell," his
restful vacation turns into a nightmare of paranoia.  He suspects the
Klopeks of everything from murder to satanic worship.
        THE 'BURBS, directed by Joe Dante (GREMLINS), is an attempt to
lampoon the horror genre on one hand and the American, suburban lifestyle
on the other.  THE 'BURBS wants to be a parody a la AIRPLANE, but a poor
script, uneven direction, and frequent lapses in momentum sabotage the
film.
        Visually and stylistically, however, the movie is stunning thanks
to Dante's imaginative direction.  He employs extreme close-ups,
melodramatic zooms, and quick-fire editing to great comic effect.  And best
of all, Dante gives Ray's neighborhood a real sense of space and place.  In
fact, the most effective part of THE 'BURBS is the first half hour, during
which the film introduces us to Ray's suburban neighborhood and its
eccentric residents.  Tom Hanks is Ray, the only normal person on the
block; he's your average suburbanite and family man.  Next door lives his
slovenly friend, Art, played by Rick Ducommun.  Across the street is Bruce
Dern as Mr. Rumsfield, a wacko Vietnam vet who still dresses in army
fatigues and plays with his war toys.  He lives with a dizzy blonde
bombshell (Wendy Schaal) who likes to prance around in skimpy, revealing
outfits.  At the end of the block lives Walter, an old man who's quite
attached to his poodle, his perfectly groomed lawn, and his toupee.  And
let's not forget Corey Feldman as a radical teenager who gets his kicks by
watching his neighbors from his porch.  Then, of course, there are the
Klopeks who are strange even by the standards of this neighborhood.  Dante
has created a satirical microcosm of America: a block of suburbia that
would make the Cleavers run for their lives.
        Dante demonstrates once again his knack for horror; he brings a
stylish look and a paranoid atmosphere to the screen.  His comedy skills,
however, are not so well honed.  While the humor in THE 'BURBS is sometimes
clever, more often it is mindless, playing to the lowest common
denominator.
        Some scenes ARE hilarious such as when Ray, Art, and Rumsfield dive
into a garbage truck, much to the bewilderment of the garbage men, in order
to rummage through the Klopeks' trash.  In another amusing scene, the
camera manically zooms in and out and in and out as Art and Ray find a
large thigh bone and come to the horrifying realization that it belongs to
their missing neighbor, Walter.
        Most of the time, however, the gags are either too juvenile, too
cheap, or too predictable to produce honest laughs.  Most of the jokes are
so obvious that you can see them coming from miles away.  You don't have to
be psychic to predict that when Art climbs up a telephone pole to cut a
power line, he's going to nearly electrocute himself and then plummet to
the ground.  And yet despite these problems, THE 'BURBS hits the satirical
mark often enough to keep things rolling; the movie seldom fails to
entertain.
        With the exception of Bruce Dern's outrageous tour de force
performance as Rumsfield (which is almost worth the price of admission
alone), the acting in THE 'BURBS is uninspired.  In fact, after his
tremendous success in BIG and PUNCHLINE, I'm surprised that Tom Hanks took
this role.  Ray is one of the least colorful characters Hanks has ever
played.  The actor doesn't get to do anything interesting with his
character until the very end of the film when Ray goes on a rampage; only
then do we finally get some vintage Tom Hanks humor.  During most of THE
'BURBS, another actor would have sufficed in the role, which is a
condemnation not of Hanks but of the movie.  I think it's a safe bet that
THE 'BURBS will not revive Carrie Fisher's sagging film career.  As Ray's
bland wife, Carol, Fisher seems to be going through the motions; the
actress gives a lifeless performance in a thankless role.  At least Wendy
Schaal and Corey Feldman inject some spirit and humor into their supporting
roles.
        THE 'BURBS has its strong points, but it also contains a fatal
excess of unnecessary baggage.  For every well-earned laugh, there is a
groan.  But if you have the patience and don't mind suffering through the
weaknesses of the film, you just may want to visit this very unusual
neighborhood.  But remember, beware of the Klopeks.

Title
Review for Rosencrantz and Guildenstern Are Dead (1990)
     BILL & TED MEET HAMLET just as well could have been the title of
ROSENCRANTZ & GUILDENSTERN ARE DEAD, Tom Stoppard's clever film adaptation
of his popular play.  In the original Shakespearean version of the story,
Rosencrantz and Guildenstern were minor characters (childhood chums of
Hamlet), appearing in only a couple scenes.  Stoppard's gimmick is to
retell HAMLET entirely from their point of view.  These two meandering
medieval misfits take center stage, and their verbal banter and petty
squabbles are a nonstop source of amusement.
     Stoppard imaginatively weaves Rosencrantz and Guildenstern's
misadventures into the general HAMLET story line by having them wander in
and out of scenes lifted directly from Shakespeare.  The result is an
inventive mixture of old and new.  Happily, Stoppard's witty script and
assured direction get first rate support from the cast, especially Gary
Oldman, whose droll performance as Rosencrantz is sublimely entertaining.
Oldman and co-star Tim Roth have created two truly exasperating nitwits ...
who also happen to be irresistibly endearing.

Title
Review for Gokiburi-tachi no tasogare (1987)
        If Disney were to make a movie about a community of loveable
insects, it might look something like TWILIGHT OF THE COCKROACHES, the
animated feature film from Japan.  The movie combines live action with
animation, a la WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT, to tell an unusual story of man
and roach.
        If you are simply dying to know what the world looks like from two
inches off the floor, this is the movie for you (along with HONEY, I SHRUNK
THE KIDS).  If the cockroaches in CREEPSHOW or THE TEMPLE OF DOOM made you
queasy, then TWILIGHT will not be your cup of tea.  The movie is set in an
apartment inhabited by a lonely bachelor, Mr. Saito (Kaoru Kobayashi), and
by several hundred fun-loving roaches (which are animated, thank goodness).
Using extremely low camera angles, director Hiroaki Yoshida presents the
world strictly from a cockroach point of view.  Chairs, tables, and
refrigerators loom overhead like colossal mountains.  Human beings stomp
around like giant dinosaurs.  Ketchup bottles look like skyscrapers.
        The roaches lead an idyllic existence in the apartment because
Saito's depression has made him indifferent to their presence.  In fact, he
has allowed the bugs to take over the apartment; it is as much their home
as his.  They eat his food, watch his television, swim in his toilet, and
play tennis on his tennis racket.  The roaches live in such peaceful
harmony with Saito they have come to believe humans are their friends.
        The central character in the film is Naomi, a pretty 19 year old
roachette who lives on the floor of Saito's closet in a beat up sneaker.
At the start of the film, Naomi is fairly innocent, having never
experienced violence or cruelty.  Everything changes, however, when she
falls in love with Hans, a wounded roach soldier from a neighboring
apartment.  Hans and his fellow roaches live with a woman (Setsuko
Karasumaru) who, unlike Saito, hates cockroaches.  She is hell-bent on
exterminating them by whatever means necessary, including bug traps,
insecticide sprays, and rolled-up newspapers.  When Naomi visits Hans, she
witnesses human-cockroach warfare for the first time; for example, she
almost gets trapped inside a roach motel, which is full of rotting corpses.
True disaster strikes when the roach-killing woman starts to date Saito
and immediately declares war on the cockroaches in his apartment.  Naomi
and her roach friends find themselves fighting for survival as their truce
with Saito abruptly comes to an end.
        With TWILIGHT OF THE COCKROACHES, Yoshida has achieved the
impossible: he has given Man's least favorite insect charisma.  Through the
magic of animation, the roaches in the film have been sanitized and
humanized--or, in a word, "Disneyized."  They wear attractive clothing,
walk upright on their two hind legs, and engage in human activities, such
as dancing.  Yoshida wants us to sympathize with the roaches and making
them mini-humans was probably the only way he could overcome our natural
aversion.  We feel sorry for the roaches but only because the animation has
made us forget that they are disgusting insects.  If you start to associate
the animated cockroaches with the real thing, you get an uneasy feeling in
your stomach.
        On a technical level, TWILIGHT OF THE COCKROACHES is beyond
reproach.  The juxtaposition of animation and live action is smooth and
fluid.  Yoshida has found imaginative ways for the roaches to interact with
the contents of Saito's apartment.  An empty cigarette carton, for example,
becomes a bed.  With a $3 million budget, the movie is no ROGER RABBIT, but
the animation (while not spectacular) easily surpasses what you might find
on a Saturday morning cartoon program.
        On an emotional level, TWILIGHT is both intentionally and
unintentionally disturbing.  The film, despite its Disneyesque look and
absurd premise, is anything but light hearted.  TWILIGHT is part drama,
part adventure, part thriller, and part black comedy.  According to the
press notes, Yoshida intended the film as an allegorical tale reflecting
the fear that Japan's selfish trade practices may cause other countries to
treat the Japanese like cockroaches.
        The problem is that the film sometimes strains our patience with
its somber tone.  Somehow, animated cockroaches and serious spiritual
themes seem incongruous.  The movie tries to be profound, but much of the
time it ends up feeling pretentious, particularly in the scenes where Naomi
and her grandfather pray to a porcelain bunny rabbit in Saito's back yard,
a concept which is not nearly as funny as it sounds.  Another problem is
that no matter how hard you try, you can never completely identify with the
cockroaches, especially when they make pompous speeches like, "We have
never killed a single human.  So why does man try to annihilate us?  He
fears what he can't understand.  God chose us to inherit the earth."  It
makes you want to stomp on them.
        You will likely appreciate the creativity and originality of this
animated curiosity, but you may leave the theater scratching your head and
reaching for the bug spray.

Title
Review for RoboCop (1987)
     ROBOCOP is an intelligent science fiction thriller and social
satire, one with class and style.  The film, set in Old Detroit in the year
1991, stars Peter Weller as Murphy, a lieutenant on the city's police
force.  1991's Detroit suffers from rampant crime and a police department
run by a private contractor (Security Concepts Inc.) whose employees (the
cops) are threatening to strike.  To make matters worse, a savage group of
cop-killers has been terrorizing the city.  On Murphy's first day of duty,
after his transfer from another precinct, these cop-killers brutally murder
him by shooting off his limbs one by one.  (Orion Pictures had to edit this
extremely graphic scene in order to get an R rating from the M.P.A.A.)
     After the emergency room staff at the hospital cannot save Murphy
and declare him clinically dead, S.C.I. recruits his remains for their new
"Robocop" program.  Using the remains of Murphy's body as a foundation,
their scientists build a cyborg, made of both flesh and metal.  The cyborg
(Robocop) is half human (Murphy) and half robot; the S.C.I. engineers have
erased Murphy's memory and replaced it with a computer program (or so they
think).  With his lightning quick reflexes, immense strength, and
impenetrable armor, S.C.I. envisions Robocop as an indestructible
super-cop: the solution to Detroit's problems.  The remainder of the plot
follows Robocop's crime-foiling and vengeance on his murderers.
     As a science fiction action-thriller, ROBOCOP is extremely
effective.  Dutch director Paul Verhoeven combines gritty action with
suspense, shocking gore, and spectacular special effects.  Several
sequences in the film, such as the one in which Robocop employs his
extremely precise aim to stop a rapist, are destined to become
cult-classics.  Because ROBOCOP is so visually and emotionally rousing, it
demands to be seen on a large screen with an audience--in other words, in a
movie theater.
     Although the special effects and action are exciting, they do not
by themselves set ROBOCOP apart from other films in the genre.  Rather,
ROBOCOP stands out for its accurate and biting satire of American society.
The movie makes a mockery of The Star Wars Defense Initiative, terrorism,
board games, and television news broadcasts with air-headed anchors.  These
news broadcasts, which are exceptionally clever, recur periodically
throughout the movie and help to provide comic relief from the intense
action and gore.  The satire in ROBOCOP, however, is almost as frightening
in its own way as the suspense and blood.  1990's America, as portrayed in
the film, may seem far fetched but is in actuality (I think) only a slight
exaggeration of the current state of American society.  The humorous satire
in Robocop is simultaneously credible and absurd.  Verhoeven adroitly
balances the satirical comedy with the gory action to create an
entertaining and enlightening piece of science fiction/social commentary.
     Unfortunately, ROBOCOP possesses several flaws which prevent it
from qualifying as a classic within the genre.  The movie lacks the lasting
impact of such films as THE ROAD WARRIOR, THE TERMINATOR, and ALIENS.
ROBOCOP's main problem, aside from its dumb title, is that it does not
sufficiently develop Murphy's character.  We never learn the degree to
which Murphy (as Robocop) is human and the degree to which he is a robot.
Does Murphy have any human spirit or free will left, or is he merely a
computer following a program?  The script halfheartedly raises these issues
but then abandons them in its climactic flurry of gory action.  Moreover,
it almost completely ignores the question (and tragedy) of denying a man
his right to die in favor of turning him into a machine.  ROBOCOP also
contains several bothersome loose-ends.
     As you watch ROBOCOP, you experience deja vu; you feel as if you
have seen the film before.  In many respects, ROBOCOP is reminiscent of
several other films, including THE TERMINATOR, RETURN OF THE JEDI, and even
DEATH WISH.  However, to its credit, ROBOCOP easily has enough originality
and unique personality to avoid becoming a cheap rip-off.

Title
Review for Vital Signs (1990)
        VITAL SIGNS is a fascinating look at five students during one of
the most grueling and exciting periods of their lives: the legendary third
year of medical school.  It's time to sink or swim: the students must leave
behind the security of the classroom and plunge into the life and death
reality of practicing medicine in a bona fide hospital.
        A true ensemble film, VITAL SIGNS skillfully juggles half a dozen
plot strands.  It follows each of the five students as they proceed through
the year--working 30 hours a day and fiercely competing with one another to
earn honors, an achievement which can make or break their careers.  For the
first time in their education, the students are getting hands-on
experience--iscovering the joy of saving lives and the heartbreak of losing
them.
        Most of the cast members are unknowns, but their performances are
surprisingly vibrant and self-assured.  Adrian Pasdar is outstanding as
Michael, the son of a famous surgeon who is trying to live up to his
father's sterling reputation.  Michael is an exceptionally good student,
but he doesn't become a good doctor until he learns from a cancer patient
(Norma Aleandro) that people are as important as facts.
        Diane Lane plays Michael's love-interest, a fellow student whom he
finds attractive both for her extraordinary beauty and for her sensitivity.
Lane began her film career in 1979 as a young girl (in A LITTLE ROMANCE);
she has blossomed into a lovely young woman and a fine actress.  Lane is
integral to the movie's most heart-breaking sequence; unfortunately, she's
also integral to the film's most serious blunder: an altogether gratuitous
love scene which goes on and on and on...
        Jack Gwaltney is effective as Kenny, an ambitious student who is
more committed to his career than to his marriage to Laura San Giacomo
(whose character is amazingly subdued and restrained compared to the
over-the-top characters she plays in PRETTY WOMAN and SEX, LIES, AND
VIDEOTAPE).  Kenny is Michael's main competition for the coveted surgery
internship; in fact, their ferocious rivalry is really the blood and guts
of the film, the conflict which drives the story forward.
        Another sub-plot, which is less fully-developed (but no less
compelling), involves Jane Adams and Tim Ransom as a WHEN HARRY MET
SALLY-like couple: best friends who jeopardize their friendship by sleeping
together.  Adams and Ranson have precious little screen time, but they make
it count by creating lovably goofy characters.  Finally, Jimmy Smits (from
"L.A. Law") is on board as the hospital's head surgeon, an educator who
mixes stern authority and light-hearted humor to command respect and
admiration from his students.
        VITAL SIGNS stands out because it absorbs us so deeply into its
characters and because it conveys so vividly the intensity of medical
school.  The movie offers an intimate glimpse into the lives and loves of
five genuinely compelling characters; as they change and mature, we
celebrate their victories and grieve over their defeats.
        The film convinces us that we are witnessing the real thing.  In
fact, the surgery scenes are uncomfortably realistic and incredibly
riveting.  Director Marisa Silver wisely silences the soundtrack and allows
the operations to generate their own drama and suspense.  Only the ending
seems a little Hollywood, a bit too neat and tidy; everything else in VITAL
SIGNS seems brutally authentic and vital.

Title
Review for Harlem Nights (1989)
        Eddie Murphy has a lot riding on HARLEM NIGHTS.  As the movie's
writer, director, executive producer, and star, Murphy will shoulder all of
the blame if HARLEM NIGHTS fails.  But at the same time, he'll receive all
of the credit if it succeeds.  Should you sacrifice your hard-earned cash
to support Murphy's risky gamble?  Well, that depends on whom you trust
more: me or Eddie Murphy.
        Here's what Murphy thinks:  "I think the audience is expecting a
good time.  They gonna get sexy.  They gonna get funny.  They gonna get
drama.  They gonna get all of that.  I think it's the best movie I've done"
(Paramount Radio Network).
        Here's what  I think: HARLEM NIGHTS is charmless, unoriginal,
disappointing, and almost without question, the worst film of the actor's
career (I haven't seen Best Defense).  And guess who's to blame?!
        The movie's problem is not Murphy's direction: HARLEM NIGHTS is a
fairly good looking film.  No, the project was probably doomed even before
the cameras rolled.  Murphy's awful script is the culprit.  Let's count the
mistakes he makes in his first attempt at screenwriting:
        (1) Murphy shatters the record for the most profanity in a motion
picture.  Yes, he even outdoes his own work in RAW.  Practically every line
of dialogue in HARLEM NIGHTS contains at least one four letter word.  And
after 15 minutes, it gets irritating.
        (2) Murphy wastes the talents of his fine cast.  Richard Pryor,
Redd Foxx, Michael Lerner, and Della Reese face the impossible task of
carving out credible characters from a script riddled with stereotypes.
Each of them shines occasionally, but basically what we have are good
performers stuck in a bad vehicle.
        (3) The movie demeans women by depicting them solely as sexual
objects and as pawns in power struggles between men.  Murphy has admitted
in interviews that he is weary of women in his private life, which is
really neither here nor there.  But when Murphy puts his bitter feelings on
3,000 movie screens across the country, it's another matter altogether.
You're forced to swallow some pretty gruesome stuff.  For instance, Murphy
punches Della Reese in the stomach.  And he shoots Jasmine Guy in the head.
This is a mean-spirited movie, folks!  Lovely newcomer Lela Rochon gets
off easy in her role as a common whore, but only because she doesn't have
any scenes with Murphy.  Thank God: he might have run her over with a
bulldozer.
        (4) Murphy has written for himself perhaps his blandest role to
date.  The loveable Eddie Murphy charisma emerges only once or twice during
the film.  Murphy would rather give his character a spiffy wardrobe than a
spiffy personality.  Sometimes it seems as if Murphy made HARLEM NIGHTS
just so he could wear fancy suits and look debonair.
        (5) The plot is a shameless rip-off of THE STING.  If you're going
to make another sting movie, you've got to do something original.  Murphy's
tale of warring nightclub owners in Harlem (circa 1938) fails to add
anything new to the formula.
        (6) To get laughs, Murphy makes fun of stuttering.  You know a
comedy is digging deep when it resorts to ridiculing the handicapped.
        (7) Murphy's idea of drama is a scene in which his character
apologizes for the first time in his life.  For what?  For shooting Reese's
little toe off!
        Needless to say, Murphy shows little, if any, promise or
imagination as a screenwriter.
        In all fairness, however, a few rays of sunshine do manage to break
through the gloomy cloud surrounding the movie.  Danny Aiello is fun to
watch as a dirty cop on the take.  Aiello stands out in the large, ensemble
cast: he obviously relishes the opportunity to play such a nasty character
(a racist detective with mob ties).  Aiello's zesty performance gives
HARLEM NIGHTS some much needed spice.
        Another bright spot is Arsenio Hall, who has a hilarious,
show-stopping cameo as a cry-baby gangster; Hall virtually steals the
spotlight from Murphy.  In fact, Hall's ten minutes on screen are the
funniest ten minutes in the movie.  Unfortunately, his character is
completely irrelevant to the plot; Murphy should have given Hall a much
bigger role.
        Of course, I've already mentioned that I didn't care for Murphy's
character, but I have to admit that I did love his neckties.  They are
simply spectacular--almost worth the price of admission.

Title
Review for Quick Change (1990)
     Actors and directors will often tell you that it's a lot harder to
make a successful comedy than it is to make an effective drama--that it's
easier to draw a tear than to earn a laugh.  But I'm beginning to wonder
whether this is really true.  In movies which try to combine drama and
comedy, usually it's the comedy which carries the film and the drama which
drags it down.  The latest offender is Bill Murray's new film QUICK CHANGE,
an engaging, fast-moving comedy which comes to a grinding halt whenever it
attempts to stir up some dramatic substance.
     Often, movies like this have snappy characters stuck in a dumb
plot.  QUICK CHANGE has the opposite problem: its clever plot is riddled
with lousy characters.  The movie is set in New York and involves an
elaborate bank robbery, masterminded by Bill Murray with the help of Geena
Davis and Randy Quaid.  The gimmick is: all they have to do is get to the
airport and they're home free, but the entire city seems to be conspiring
against them.  Their obstacles include a foreign cab driver, a slow
shopping line, an anal retentive bus driver, confusing road signs and
homicidal mobsters--not to mention the cops who are hot on their trail.
The movie offers a cynical and satirical depiction of New York City as a
crumbling metropolis.
     The film's biggest crime is that it squanders Davis' comic talents.
Davis is one of Hollywood's funniest comediennes, and she excels at
playing goofy eccentrics, like the dog trainer in THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST.
But QUICK CHANGE short changes Davis by giving her a disappointingly
pedestrian character.
     Quaid gets the movie's biggest laughs as a world-class dunce, a
large, burly guy who deep down is nothing more than a big, blubbering cry
baby.  The character is a kick in the pants, but the film never explains
why Murray and Davis would put up with Quaid's sheer stupidity and costly
blunders.
     Fortunately, for Murray fans, QUICK CHANGE is an improvement over
his last two pictures, SCROOGED and GHOSTBUSTERS 2.  Murray's role in QUICK
CHANGE reminds me of Eddie Murphy's character in BEVERLY HILLS COP.  Like
COP, QUICK CHANGE repeatedly puts its protagonist into touchy situations
that require him to negotiate his way out of trouble.  Murray's sardonic
demeanor electrifies the comic scenes, but sadly, he isn't the least bit
convincing during the serious moments.
     The odd thing about QUICK CHANGE is that despite its inadequacies,
it's surprisingly entertaining, thanks to the plot's imaginative twists and
turns.  The episodic story line is really just a series of vignettes which
rely on Murphy's Law, or in this case Murray's law: everything that can go
wrong will go wrong, as the crooks painfully learn on their way to the
airport.  Murray, who co-directed the film, smoothly orchestrates a
symphony of mayhem and misfortune that's hard to resist.

Title
Review for Men Don't Leave (1990)
        In 1983, Paul Brickman took the world by storm with his directorial
debut, RISKY BUSINESS.  Seven years later, the director finally has a new
movie to unleash on the world, and after a 7 year wait, it had better be
good.  And MEN DON'T LEAVE is pretty good, or at least sort of pretty good.
The movie is exceptionally funny: it's funny when it's supposed to be
funny and, unfortunately, it's also funny when it's not supposed to be
funny.
        Jessica Lange plays a plain housewife whose husband dies in an
accident, leaving her with two sons to raise and a $63,000 debt to pay off.
What is a single, unskilled mother to do?  The answer: sell the pickup
truck, sell her beautiful country home, and move to Baltimore where she has
been offered a job in a gourmet food shop.  Lange quickly discovers that
life in the big, bad city is no picnic.  First of all, her apartment is
small and stuffy.  Second, she has an incredibly bitchy boss.  Third, her
temperamental 17-year-old son is having an affair with a nurse who is in
her 20's.  Fourth, she is growing apart from her 10-year-old son; he would
rather sleep at his friend's house than at home.  It's enough to make a
struggling mother depressed and lethargic; it's enough to make her stay in
bed for five days straight.  It's enough, at times, to make you laugh when
you're not supposed to.  In fact, the audience at the preview screening
came down with a collective case of the giggles, due in part to Lange's
histrionics and in part to some strategically timed sneezing by someone in
the fifth row.
        If I seem to be mocking the film, it's because, however
well-intentioned, it simply asks you to swallow too much melodrama.  The
script, by Brickman and Barbara "Big Chill" Benedek, tries to emulate TERMS
OF ENDEARMENT, but it never quite makes it.  The humor is right on target,
but the drama is slightly off-kilter.  Part of the problem is that Lange
isn't always convincing as the somber, dysfunctional mother, and you
sometimes have trouble feeling sorry for her.
        Fortunately, the supporting cast is magnificent and keeps the film
from crumbling.  Joan Cusack is delightfully goofy (as usual) as the nurse
who likes to "help people."  Cusack is quickly becoming Hollywood's
definitive eccentric and one of its best character actors.  Arliss Howard
gains our sympathy as Lange's persistent suitor, a sensitive musician who
sees past her melancholy exterior.  The real stand-outs, however, are Chris
O'Donnell and Charlie Korsmo.  The two young actors are deeply moving as
Lange's sons, Chris and Matt, who are having a tough time grappling with
their father's death and with the culture shock of moving to Baltimore.
Korsmo, as 10-year-old Matt, will simply break your heart.  He falls under
the influence of a tough city kid and becomes a burglar, stealing VCRs to
raise money for lottery tickets.  The film is extremely effective when it
shifts its attention from Lange to the two boys.  In fact, the powerful
finale strikes an emotional chord and turns the audience into a symphony of
sniffles.  MEN DON'T LEAVE is a solid, entertaining melodrama, but it's not
the profoundly moving masterpiece it wants to be.

Title
Review for Robocop 2 (1990)
     For a while, ROBOCOP 2 promises to live up to its predecessor, the
inventive tale of a murdered cop brought back to life as a cyborg, part man
and part machine.  Under Paul Verhoeven's stylish direction, ROBOCOP was a
novel combination of comic book heroics, gory action, and black humor.
     The sequel begins with a brutally funny television commercial in
which John Glover pitches a high-tech car alarm.  In fact, the entire first
hour is fairly satisfying.  The movie picks up several loose ends which
were not adequately resolved in the original, such as whether Robocop,
played again by Peter Weller, is simply a machine following a computer
program or whether he is still human, with emotions, thoughts, and
memories.  Unfortunately, half-way through, ROBOCOP 2 drops these plot
strands and degenerates into a senseless barrage of explosions, gunfights,
and special effects.
     Like TOTAL RECALL, ROBOCOP 2 assaults you with so much violence
that you become numb and apathetic.  The difference is that in TOTAL RECALL
you become apathetic only to the violence itself, whereas in ROBOCOP 2 you
just become apathetic in general.
     ROBOCOP 2 was co-written by Frank Miller, the author of several
graphic novels, including BATMAN: THE DARK KNIGHT RETURNS.  As a comic book
writer with a talent for telling sophisticated stories, Miller was an
intriguing choice to write ROBOCOP 2.  Regrettably, Miller's first attempt
at screenwriting is a major disappointment.  The sequel's plot is feeble
and fragmented.  In fact, it really contains two story lines, both of which
are woefully half-baked.
     Miller attempts to recreate the intelligent social satire which
made the first film intriguing and entertaining.  Like the original, the
sequel uses TV newscasts and commercials to spoof society.  Unfortunately,
the television parodies generally seem tacked on; the humor is not only
forced, but also awkwardly incorporated into the movie.  ROBOCOP 2 is a
victim of sloppy editing.
     About all the movie has to offer is some remarkable stop-motion
animation, but the film's hollow story line makes its technical
achievements seem pointless.  The net result is a movie as cold and
mechanical as the robots it depicts.

Title
Review for Steel Magnolias (1989)
        STEEL MAGNOLIAS must have been a casting director's wet dream!  Try
this on for size: Sally Fields, Shirley MacLaine, Olympia Dukakis, Daryl
Hannah, Dolly Parton, and Julia Roberts all together in one movie.
Collectively, these actresses have so much charisma that STEEL MAGNOLIAS
manages to escape without serious injury from a potentially fatal case of
tear-jerking.
        The movie clicks thanks to the warm camaraderie between the cast
members.  The story revolves around Roberts as a diabetic who decides to
risk her life by getting pregnant.  Fields is Roberts' over-protective
mother in a flashy role which requires the actress to pour on the pathos.
MacLaine is a riot as a cranky eccentric who claims to have been in a bad
mood for 40 years.  Dukakis is the fun-loving widow who enjoys exchanging
insults with MacLaine.  They all hang out and gossip at Dolly Parton's
beauty salon.
        The actresses are working with an exceptionally clever script,
which contains some of the year's funniest one-liners.  In fact, Gene
Siskel has dismissed the film as "Southern Belles doing stand-up."  But
when you're rolling in the aisles, who cares if the dialogue is
unrealistic?  Robert Harling's script revels in the absurd idiosyncrasies
of life in a small town.
        STEEL MAGNOLIAS is a movie of minor miracles, not the least of
which is a shockingly good performance by Daryl Hannah, who is usually my
least favorite actress on the planet.  Hannah plays the new girl in town,
and her schizophrenic character starts out as a timid nerd with funny
glasses and evolves into a kooky, born-again, religious fanatic with funny
glasses.  Maybe Hollywood executives will now finally realize that they've
been miscasting Hannah all these years.  Forget the glamor roles; give this
babe the weirdo parts!
        Regrettably, Hannah and her "sisters" are merely caricatures.  You
don't know them intimately, and consequently, the dramatic moments just
don't ring true.  The tear-jerking gets completely out of hand during the
climactic funeral scene: the emotions seem forced as Fields alternates
between gushing tears and hysterical laughter.  Fortunately, the movie's
comic undercurrent resurfaces just in time to rescue us from the jaws of
melodrama.

Title
Review for What About Bob? (1991)
        WHAT ABOUT BOB? serves up Bill Murray's most delectable character,
and performance, in a long, long time.  Murray is both funny and tender in
the role of an obsessive-compulsive agoraphobe coming out of his shell.
Unfortunately, the rest of the cast doesn't measure up: Richard Dreyfuss,
as Bob's put-upon psychiatrist, is untypically uninspired--and Jill Hagerty
(who plays Dreyfuss' cookie cutter wife) gives what will probably end up
being the worst performance of the decade.
        The first of the movie half zips along smoothly, but then,
frustratingly, the film takes a disastrous nose dive.  Tom (DEAD POETS
SOCIETY) Schulman's disappointing script becomes more and more contrived
until--THUD--the movie ends with a painful belly flop.

Title
Review for Chances Are (1989)
        When I learned that the plot of CHANCES ARE involves reincarnation,
my reaction was: oh great, another contrived fantasy.  Much to my delight,
however, I was dead wrong.  CHANCES ARE is a spirited and good natured
romantic comedy in the tradition of BACK TO THE FUTURE and PEGGY SUE GOT
MARRIED.
        In the film,  Alex--played  by Robert Downey Jr.--makes a shocking
discovery about himself when he meets Philip, played by Ryan O'Neal.
Philip invites Alex to join him for dinner at the home of his friend
Corinne and her daughter Miranda.  Cybill Shepherd plays Corinne, a widow
who lost her husband, Louie, 23 years ago and still hasn't overcome his
death.  Blind to Philip's love for her, Corinne lives completely in the
past, posting pictures of Louie all over her house, office, and car.  While
dining with these new acquaintances, Alex experiences the startling
revelation that he is Corinne's late husband, Louie--or at least he was in
his past life.  In short, with his restored memory, Alex/Louie realizes
that Corinne is his wife, Philip his best friend, and Miranda his daughter.
        Given its outlandish premise, CHANCES ARE is a surprisingly good
film.  Although the movie may sound inane, its execution is anything but
gimmicky.  Rather than exploiting Louie's reincarnation as an excuse to
milk easy laughs, CHANCES ARE explores the complications and conflicts that
arise from this unusual situation.  The movie's premise is merely a vehicle
for developing intriguing relationships between sympathetic characters.
For instance, Miranda falls in love with Alex and literally throws herself
at him, which puts him in an awkward spot since he sees her as his
daughter.  Although CHANCES ARE is by no means stingy with its laughs, its
primary emphasis is always on character.  By the end of the movie, Corinne,
Miranda, Philip, and Alex/Louie have all matured; they are wiser about
themselves and each other than they were at the start of the film.
        As much as I liked these characters and their conflicts, I can't
say that CHANCES ARE is terribly profound.  The movie is utterly
predictable, and it fails to leave a lasting impression.  And although the
performances are good, they aren't inspired.  Only Mary Stuart Masterson as
Miranda gives her character an extra spark.  However, these are mostly
minor quibbles in an otherwise charming and emotionally-satisfying comedy.

Title
Review for Miss Firecracker (1989)
        MISS FIRECRACKER is a dramatic comedy in which the comedy works
like a charm but the drama fizzles and never catches fire; in short, MISS
FIRECRACKER is a dramatic dud.  The movie represents Beth Henley's
adaptation of her 1984 off-Broadway play "The Miss Firecracker Contest."
Henley won the Pulitzer Prize in 1981 for "Crimes of the Heart," which she
also adapted for the big screen (her screenplay earned her an Oscar
nomination in 1986).
        The film is set (and was filmed on location) in Yazoo City,
Mississippi, a small town which celebrates the Fourth of the July each year
with its annual "Miss Firecracker" beauty pageant.  Holly Hunter stars as
Carnelle, one of the five finalists in the contest.  Carnelle is a flaky,
hyperactive, and spunky young woman who is desperately in need of
self-validation and social acceptance.  Carnelle's fragile self-esteem is
riding on the "Miss Firecracker" contest; she thinks winning it would not
only lift her reputation as "Miss Hot Tamale," the town trollop, but also
make her a respectable person.  And who knows?  Maybe it would even be her
ticket out of town.  Hunter gives a heartfelt and outrageously manic
performance as Carnelle, showing once again her ability to completely sink
into a character.
        MISS FIRECRACKER is full of strange and eccentric small town
characters, not the least of whom is Carnelle herself.  Carnelle's role
model is her prim, proper, and unbearably ostentatious cousin Elain, played
by Mary Steenburgen.  Elain won the Miss Firecracker Contest in 1972, and
life has been anticlimactic for her ever since.  She has returned to Yazoo
City for the 1988 pageant in order to deliver the keynote speech, "My Life
as a Beauty."  Steenburgen's performance as Elain is adequate, but her
character is so nauseating that you don't feel the least bit of sympathy
for her.
        In contrast, Tim Robbins' character is far more endearing.  He
gives a strong comic performance as Delmount, Elain's tormented and
short-tempered younger brother, who recently has been released from an
insane asylum.  He has returned home to Yazoo City to sell the old and
decrepit family homestead.  The most original character in MISS FIRECRACKER
is Popeye Jackson, Delmount's romantic interest and Carnelle's seamstress.
Popeye is an amateur dressmaker who sews clothing for bullfrogs and who
claims to hear voices through her eyeballs.  Alfre Woodard gives a
whimsical, tour de force performance as the cheerful and sweetly naive
seamstress.
        The eccentric characters in MISS FIRECRACKER are the prime reason
the film works as a comedy; in every scene an off-beat character does or
says something strange.  MISS FIRECRACKER revels in its weirdness, and as
the movie progresses, the weirdness escalates until it finally reaches a
peak during the beauty contest.  In the talent portion of the pageant, for
instance, a contestant with yellow teeth reenacts a scene from GONE WITH
THE WIND, and her atrocious acting evokes tears from the judges and
onlookers.
        Unfortunately, MISS FIRECRACKER falls flat on its face during its
attempts at drama.  The movie takes itself much too seriously, and its
credibility is sabotaged by Thomas Schlamme's heavy-handed direction, David
Mansfield's overbearing score, and Beth Henley's corny dialogue.  To make
matters worse, you really don't care about the characters, despite the
charming performances.
        MISS FIRECRACKER tries too hard and tries to do too much, and as a
result it winds up doing too little.  The film's moments of comic
inspiration are just not enough to compensate for the stale melodrama it
inflicts on us.  So unless you are a die-hard Holly Hunter fan (like
myself), you may be better off skipping MISS FIRECRACKER altogether and
getting your laughs from the real thing, the Miss America Beauty Pageant.

Title
Review for Terminator 2: Judgment Day (1991)
        1984's THE TERMINATOR is generally regarded as one of the most
influential films of the '80s, which gives its sequel, TERMINATOR 2:
JUDGEMENT DAY, gigantic shoes to fill.  T2 could have simply been a rehash
of the first film, but, happily, writer-director James Cameron has come up
with an inventive story line which cleverly continues the plot of part one.
Given the sorry state of most sequels, T2 is 100 times more creative--and
more satisfying--than we had any right to expect.  The movie has all the
ingredients of a classic sci-fi thriller, and Cameron combines and seasons
them to near perfection.
        His recipe starts with 215 pounds of prime Schwarzenegger, who
returns triumphantly to his breakthrough role as a devastatingly lethal
cyborg.  Arnold's T-800 model Terminator is back and battle-ready, but this
time he has new programming--a plot twist which breathes new life into the
character and allows Schwarzenegger to give a surprisingly rich
performance.
        Linda Hamilton's character has also undergone radical changes since
the first film, in which she was fairly helpless against the Terminator's
vicious attacks.  It has been ten years since Hamilton first encountered
the cyborg, and in that time she has become tough as nails, amassing
muscles and an arms supply in anticipation of his return.  Hamilton is
remarkably convincing in the gritty role of a disturbed woman desperately
fighting for her life and for her sanity.
        The new spice in the mix is Edward Furlong, who shows natural
charisma as Hamilton's son, the disturbed 12-year-old juvenile-delinquent
who is the assassination target in T2.  Furlong's interactions with
Schwarzenegger give the movie heart, soul and--most
impressively--psychological depth.
        Of course, Cameron's concoction wouldn't be complete without his
special sauce: whirlwind action and new technology.  The movie's amazing
state-of-the-art special effects (which feature the most advanced computer
animation ever captured on celluloid) boggle the mind and dazzle the
senses.  And with his vigorous direction, Cameron clearly reestablishes
himself as the one and only true master of action, even if the tumult is
not quite as intense as it was in the original.
        More than anything, however, it's T2's riveting story line and
unexpected humanity which make it not only a smashing piece of science
fiction, but also one of the year's best films.

Title
Review for Ours, L' (1988)
        Director Jean-Jacques Annaud must not think very highly of
dialogue.  His third film, QUEST FOR FIRE, chronicled the adventures of
some primitive cavemen who never said anything because they hadn't yet
developed a language.  His fourth film, NAME OF THE ROSE, was set in a
Monastery.  And now his fifth effort, THE BEAR, continues this tradition of
minimal dialogue; its two main characters are a 2,000 pound Kodiak bear and
his adopted cub.  And guess what?  They don't speak English, or Japanese,
or Swahili.  They speak in Bear talk, which consists of roars, growls, and
yelps.
        The film is based on the 1916 novel "The Grizzly King," about a
couple of bear hunters in British Columbia circa 1885.  Unlike the book,
which adopts the hunters' point of view, the movie assumes the bears'
perspective.  The film milks this gimmick for all it's worth.  Not only do
the two bear actors get top billing in the credits, they also get more
screen time and give better performances than do their human counterparts.
The plot is pure and simple: hunters shoot adult bear.  Bear gets away.
Orphaned cub licks the wound.  Adult adopts cub.  Hunters track them with
dogs.  It's your basic man versus beast scenario, except in this case we're
rooting for the beasts.
        THE BEAR has already grossed over $100 million in Europe so any
business it generates in America is merely icing on the cake.  The movie
arrives on our shores with a ton of advance hype.  It's being hailed as the
E.T. of the '90s and as one of the greatest adventure films of all time.
But let me tell you, unless you're an animal lover or a nature-freak, the
movie is nothing to phone home about.  Don't get me wrong: THE BEAR is
exhilarating and heartwarming, but it's just not the ground breaking wonder
it's hyped to be.
        The gimmick of using the bears as protagonists is the film's main
strength and also its main weakness.  The animals certainly make loveable
heroes.  The young cub is so cuddly and playful you want to lift him right
off the screen and take him home.  The little orphan is played with great
aplomb by Douce, who may give Beasley (Hooch in TURNER & HOOCH) some Oscar
competition.  The adult male, played by Bart, is so majestic you're
overwhelmed by feelings of respect and awe.  The two bears should be a
dream-team for movie tie-in merchandise; don't be surprised if they show up
on theme cups at Mcdonald's.
        Unfortunately, the movie gets carried away with showing us the
cub's psychological point of view.  In one scene he's chasing a frog and in
the next he's dreaming about frogs!  The movie includes two surrealistic
dream sequences, and that's two too many.  In the middle of the film, the
cub receives a lesson in sex education, but he gets bored so he wanders off
and eats some wild mushrooms.  Then, believe it or not, you get to see the
psychedelic images that float through his head as he trips out.  Now, the
last time I checked there was no way of knowing what goes on inside a
bear's head when he's dreaming or doing 'shrooms.  Maybe there is something
about the director I don't know.  Annaud goes to great lengths to create a
sense of authenticity; he tries to fool you into thinking you're watching
the real thing.  But whenever he tries to take us into the cub's head, THE
BEAR just seems like science fiction.
        Annaud also sometimes shows poor judgment in making the bears seem
too much like humans.  It's hard to stay absorbed into the film when you're
constantly asking yourself whether the bears' behavior is realistic and
natural.
        Still, for all its flaws, THE BEAR wows you with its breathtaking
wilderness setting and its powerful condemnation of hunting.  Maybe we can
learn something from these two magnificent bears who display more nobility
and honor than do many humans.

Title
Review for My Girl (1991)
        MY GIRL ultimately takes you on a road to nowhere, but at least the
ride there is reasonably pleasant.  Anna Chlumsky plays a precocious
11-year-old who's obsessed with death: her mother died in childbirth and
her father is a mortician--their house doubles as a funeral home.  Chlumsky
spends her time hanging out with best pal Macaulay Culkin (HOME ALONE),
while her inattentive father (Dan Aykroyd) embarks on an unlikely romance
with beautician Jamie Lee Curtis.  Over the course of the movie, Chlumsky
comes to terms with death and learns to accept Curtis as a mother figure.
        Unfortunately, this paper-thin premise doesn't lead to anything
meaningful.  For starters, the performances are perfunctory.  It's hard to
blame the actors, however, when their characters are so underwritten.  The
movie fails to harvest the talents of Curtis and Culkin, though Griffin
Dunne is appealing as Chlumsky's English teacher.  A bigger problem: the
dramatic scenes, which should have been sensitive and heartfelt, are
heavy-handed and cliched.  MY GIRL does eventually wear you down with its
histrionics, but you feel resentful for having your tears jerked so
violently from you.

Title
Review for Black Rain (1989)
        BLACK RAIN has all the trappings of a hit movie.  Its director is
Ridley Scott, best known for ALIEN and BLADE RUNNER.  The movie was
produced by the red hot team of Stanley Jaffe and Sherry Lansing, who gave
us THE ACCUSED and FATAL ATTRACTION.  The lead role is played by Michael
Douglas, a proven box office draw.  With this line-up, it should come as no
surprise that BLACK RAIN is as slick as the beaches in Alaska.  But
unfortunately, while it looks great on the surface, BLACK RAIN is empty at
the core.
        Douglas plays Nick Conklin, a street-smart New York detective.
Andy Garcia plays his partner, Charlie.  Together, they're assigned to
deliver a vicious killer to the police in Osaka, Japan.  But at the
airport, their prisoner escapes, and they're forced to stay in Osaka to
recapture him.  The movie offers loads of gritty and gory action, while
also exploring the culture clash between the American detectives and their
Japanese counterparts.
        Conklin is your generic, macho tough guy.  He drives a big
motorcycle, wears black leather, and doesn't like to play by the rules.
And therein lies a major problem with BLACK RAIN: the main character is not
only unlikable, but also an uninspired regurgitation of Dirty Harry and his
imitators.
        Andy Garcia is appealing as Charlie, but unfortunately his
character is woefully underdeveloped.  Kate Capshaw provides unnecessary
window-dressing in a small supporting role.  The stand-out is Ken Takakura,
a Japanese superstar appearing in his first high-profile American film.  He
plays the conservative, Japanese detective assigned to baby-sit the
American cops.  Takakura showers his character with depth and conviction,
but there's only so much he can do with the limited screenplay.  The movie
invests far too much energy into its cops and robbers plot and far too
little into character development.
        The real stars of BLACK RAIN are the stunning direction and exotic
setting.  BLACK RAIN is the first American production to be filmed in
Osaka, Japan's third largest metropolis.  The city streets are crowded and
bustling with life.  The night-time is pierced by more neon than you'd find
in Las Vegas and Times Square combined.  Ridley Scott captures Osaka's
excitement and intensity with a strong eye for composition.  His lighting
and shadow effects are exquisite and live up to the finest film noir.
        The movie's problem is that it asks us to take it seriously as a
character study and as a cross-cultural comparison.  But on those levels,
BLACK RAIN is a washout.

Title
Review for Cry-Baby (1990)
        CRY-BABY is bursting with energy and style.  But, sadly, the
tongue-in-cheek comedy is bereft of originality.  Director John Waters has
his creative juices flowing, but they're not flowing into anything
substantial.
        CRY-BABY is a musical parody of '50s culture, but it lacks the
satirical edge which allowed HAIRSPRAY to gel as a send-up of the early
'60s.  Who needs yet another '50s musical, especially when it has nothing
new to add to the worn-out genre?  CRY-BABY is essentially a noisy and
pointless GREASE rip-off.
        Johnny Depp plays the John Travolta character, a bad boy rock 'n
roll greaser.  Amy Locane plays the Olivia Newton John character, a
goody-two-shoes who falls in love with Depp.  The crisp performances by
Depp and Locane help to compensate for the dated characters, who are as
soggy as corn flakes floating in a swimming pool.
        Waters just doesn't have a compelling story to tell.  The recycled
plot pits snobby squares against ultra-hip juvenile delinquents, an idea
which went sour eight years ago with the release of GREASE 2.  But
fortunately, Waters has assembled a stellar cast.  One off-beat actor after
another parades across the screen.  Ricki Lake co-stars as Depp's very
pregnant sister, who believes a woman's breasts are her best weapon.
Former porn queen Traci Lords plays an oversexed slut; she struts around in
tight, revealing outfits, looking like she stepped straight out of a Russ
Meyer movie.  Patty Hearst, of all people, has a lot of fun playing Lords'
chipper, bright-eyed mother.  Willem Dafoe pops up unexpectedly as a
Juvenile Hall security guard.  Also on hand are Iggy Pop, Troy Donahue,
Joey Heatherton, David Nelson, Mink Stole, Joe Dallesandro, and Polly
Bergen, a cast to end all casts.  The real standout in terms of shock
value, however, is Kim McGuire as Hatchet-Face, a girl so ugly she makes
the mutt in TURNER & HOOCH look like Miss America.
        CRY-BABY is surprisingly tame and restrained for a John Waters
movie, which is one reason it's a let down.  The plot is so light-weight
you kind of hope the director will do something tasteless just to spice
things up.  In CRY-BABY, Waters has replaced outrageous and offensive with
mindless and moronic.

Title
Review for Say Anything... (1989)
        In many ways, the romantic comedy SAY ANYTHING is a generic teenage
love story--one we've seen countless times before.  It tells the
all-too-familiar story of young love between two recent high school
graduates.  Ione Skye plays Diane Court, the intellectual and socially
reserved valedictorian of her high school class.  She has just been awarded
an extremely prestigious scholarship to attend college in England.  John
Cusack plays Diane's suitor, Lloyd Dobler, an amateur kick-boxer who's
unsure of his future.  He does know one thing, however: he'd like to spend
his summer with Diane.
        Lloyd and Diane are the classic mismatch or odd couple.  He is your
average Joe, unexceptional but for his sensitivity, chivalry, and boyish
charm.  And she, on the other hand, is one of a kind--someone definitely
destined for success.  However, despite their differences, Diane and Lloyd
click as a couple.  He can make her laugh, and she gives him
self-confidence.  They start dating, and the movie follows their tumultuous
on-again-off-again relationship.
        If SAY ANYTHING's premise sounds formulaic and unoriginal, that's
because it is.  The movie doesn't break any new ground, but it's
surprisingly effective nevertheless.  After so many brain-dead treatments
of this material, SAY ANYTHING stands out for its intelligence,
sophistication, and sharp wit.  The movie also adds a unique twist to its
story: namely, one of the most sensitively and touchingly portrayed
father-daughter relationships in recent memory.  Diane is unusually close
to her father; he's her very best friend and confidante.  John Mahoney is
outstanding as Diane's loving and understanding father, a man who
desperately wants only the best for his daughter.  In fact, he's even
willing to cheat the Internal Revenue Service in order to better support
Diane.
        In SAY ANYTHING, Cusack demonstrates once again that he makes an
extraordinarily appealing romantic lead.  His sense of vulnerability,
insecurity, and humility make him seem far more authentic than his brat
pack colleagues, such as Rob Lowe and Tom Cruise.  Cusack is always at his
best when he plays the underdog, as he does in SAY ANYTHING and as he did
in such films as BETTER OFF DEAD and EIGHT MEN OUT.
        Skye, who received considerable attention three years ago for her
role in RIVER'S EDGE, gives a compelling performance as Diane, the troubled
young woman torn between her love for Lloyd and her loyalty to her father
who is under criminal investigation by the IRS.  Skye poignantly conveys
the painful confusion and emotional anguish Diane feels as she falls in
love and asserts her independence from her father.
        SAY ANYTHING pushes the limits of its tired and worn-out
boy-meets-girl, boy-loses-girl, boy-gets-girl-back story.  But
unfortunately, SAY ANYTHING fails to say anything terribly new or profound
about young love.  Most of us already know all too well from our own
experience just how exhilarating, terrifying, and painful first love can
be.  However, as I mentioned before, SAY ANYTHING is special not so much
for WHAT it says, but for HOW it says it.

Title
Review for Driving Miss Daisy (1989)
        DRIVING MISS DAISY takes its sweet time to tell a small, intimate
story.  It's a quiet film, a slow film, a deliberate film.  But if you're
patient with it, the movie offers innumerable rewards, such as a pair of
self-assured performances by Morgan Freeman and Jessica Tandy.
        DRIVING MISS DAISY is based on Alfred Uhry's Pulitzer-prize winning
play of the same name, which first opened in New York four years ago.  The
play has garnered international acclaim with productions in Chicago, Los
Angeles, London, Vienna, Norway, and the Soviet Union.  Uhry himself wrote
the screenplay for the film adaptation of DRIVING MISS DAISY; he also
penned the wonderful sleeper, MYSTIC PIZZA.
        The film, like the play, is set in Atlanta, Georgia, and it
revolves around two people in their twilight years: a cranky, 70-something
Jewish widow who feels guilty about her wealth and a 60-something black man
who becomes her chauffeur.  The movie relies on character, rather than
plot, to propel the action.  In fact, the movie has no discernible plot in
the traditional sense; it doesn't present a linear story in which all the
scenes flow together.  Rather, DRIVING MISS DAISY is made up of the routine
activities of everyday life: shopping, listening to the radio, visiting the
cemetery, eating fried chicken, and so on.  The film also incorporates into
the story line actual events in Atlanta's history, including the 1958
bombing of The Temple (the city's oldest Jewish congregation) and a 1965
ceremony honoring the Reverend Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.
        The story begins in 1948 with Daisy (Tandy) crashing and wrecking
her Packard as she pulls out of her driveway.  The insurance company
cancels her insurance, and her son, Boolie, decides to hire her a
chauffeur.  Freeman, reprising his role from the play, plays the chauffeur,
Hoke.  The film chronicles the warm friendship that slowly but surely
blossoms between the chauffeur and his reluctant passenger.  DRIVING MISS
DAISY is a movie about human nature, aging, prejudice, and a great many
other things, but more than anything it's about a relationship: one that
spans 25 years, 4 cars, the advent of civil rights, and one gravely
important 33 cent can of salmon.
        Daisy is strong-willed and set in her ways, and, from the outset,
she is utterly opposed to the idea of having a chauffeur.  Initially, she
treats Hoke with contempt, refusing to let him drive her anywhere.  Once
she does get in the car, Daisy is the ultimate back-seat driver.  To make
matters worse, she is extremely self-conscious about what others might
think if they were to see her being escorted around town by a hired hand.
Eventually, however, Daisy is worn down by Hoke's good-natured charm and
infectious cheer; she softens and opens up to him.
        Tandy plays the part of Daisy exceedingly well, but unfortunately
this feisty, cantankerous character is just a smidgen too commonplace.
We've seen this woman countless times before in other incarnations, from ON
GOLDEN POND to COCOON.  Nevertheless, Tandy manages to put enough of a
personal stamp on the familiar character to make it her own.
        Freeman, as Hoke, on the other hand, gives the more distinctive of
the two performances.  There is something profoundly moving about the way
Hoke maintains his pride and dignity in a society which forbids him from
using public rest rooms because of his skin color.  Hoke is uneducated and
illiterate, but Freeman always suggests that there is something more to
this man, an inner strength beneath the simpleton exterior.
        Both Freeman and Tandy seem to be in their element, in full command
of their natural charisma.  They flirt with the camera and dominate scenes
without overtly calling attention to themselves.  They bring a light touch
to their humorous banter and to the movie's gentle humor.  At the same
time, Tandy and Freeman provide more than a few moments of truly poignant
drama.
        In his first dramatic role, Dan Aykroyd is surprisingly chubby and
unexpectedly effective as Boolie, Tandy's loving and patient son.  Drama
seems to agree with Aykroyd; taking a break from comedy seems like a good
move for the actor, especially when you consider the wretched comedies he
has made recently (GHOSTBUSTERS II, THE GREAT OUTDOORS, MY STEPMOTHER IS AN
ALIEN).  The only other significant characters in the film are Daisy's
housekeeper, Idella, marvelously played by Esther Rolle ("Good Times"), and
Boolie's pretentious wife, played by Patti LuPone.
        Under the direction of Bruce Beresford (CRIMES OF THE HEART, TENDER
MERCIES), DRIVING MISS DAISY seems a bit stagey now and again.  But
fortunately, Beresford never forgets he's shooting a movie, and
accordingly, he offers plenty of striking cinematic touches, such as
gorgeous shots of flowers, trees, and tomatoes.
        In adapting DRIVING MISS DAISY from the stage to the screen, the
filmmakers have achieved a delicate subtlety.  Uhry understands that what
his characters do not say can be just as important as what they do say.
Beresford wisely exercises restraint in the film's dramatic moments.  The
movie tugs at your heart, but it never goes for the jugular.  The only sap
in DRIVING MISS DAISY is in the trees.

Title
Review for Glory (1989)
        GLORY--starring Matthew Broderick, Denzel Washington, and Morgan
Freeman--is the true story of the 54th Regiment of Massachusetts, the first
black fighting unit recruited by the North during the Civil War.  Broderick
plays Robert Gould Shaw, the young white officer who led the black soldiers
into battle.  Shaw, the son of well-to-do abolitionists, hailed from Boston
high society.  The letters he wrote home to his parents during the war are
on display at Harvard, and were, evidently, the inspiration for GLORY.
        As the film begins in 1862, Shaw is a Captain in the Northern
forces.  Like Private Eriksson (Michael J. Fox) in CASUALTIES OF WAR, Shaw
initially is naive and idealistic about the war--that is, until his company
is attacked by enemy forces.  Shaw experiences first hand the horror and
chaos of battle, witnessing mass slaughter and receiving a minor wound
himself when a bullet grazes his neck.  Soon after his recovery, Shaw is
promoted to Colonel and assigned to enlist and train blacks in the war
effort.
        GLORY is the story not only of Colonel Shaw, but also of the black
soldiers who laid down their lives to free their brothers from slavery.
The film periodically jumps between Shaw's point of view and the
perspective of the black soldiers.  The movie introduces us to a handful of
black recruits, and we follow them from their enlistment through basic
training and finally into action.
        The large black cast is uniformly outstanding, especially
Washington who is electrifying as a runaway slave with a big mouth.  He is
brash and pushy, always getting into trouble and always looking for a
fight.  His bitter, tough guy facade is really just a mask for his
loneliness and vulnerability.  Washington provides much of the film's
intensity and emotional power.  In one heartbreaking scene, he is whipped
for allegedly deserting the army.  When he removes his shirt to receive the
punishment, you cringe at the sight of his back, which is riddled with ugly
scars from his days as a slave.  It makes your blood boil.  The humiliation
of the beating is far more traumatic than the actual physical pain it
brings; a tear rolls down Washington's cheek--and will probably run down
your cheek as well.  The episode becomes even more tragic when we learn
that Washington wasn't deserting the army at all; he left camp to look for
shoes because his feet were covered with oozing sores.
        Freeman is, as usual, a strong presence, even in a small supporting
role.  He plays a grave digger who has buried more white soldiers than he
cares to remember.  He quickly becomes a leader among the black soldiers,
holding the group together and serving as a liaison to the white officers.
Colonel Shaw recognizes Freeman's leadership ability and promotes him to
sergeant major, making him the first black officer in the army.
        Andre Braugher makes an impressive film debut in the role of Thomas
Searles, a free black who is one of Shaw's close childhood friends.
Searles is educated and refined, like a white man, prompting Washington to
nickname him "Snow Flake."  The burning question is whether Searles is
tough enough to survive basic training and to kill in combat.
        The road from marching drills to battle action is a bumpy one for
the black regiment.  The soldiers suffer innumerable hardships, but somehow
they never lose their morale.  The army treats the black soldiers like
second class citizens, subjecting them to racism and discrimination.  They
are paid only $10 a month, whereas their white counterparts earn thirteen,
and, for a long time, they have to go without shoes, guns, or uniforms.  To
make matters worse, the white military hierarchy is extremely reluctant to
allow the blacks into action, preferring instead to use them for manual
labor.  Eventually, however, the regiment receives its boots, uniforms,
rifles, and right to fight, thanks to the stubborn resolve of Colonel Shaw.
Shaw has absolute faith in his soldiers, and he fights tooth and nail to
get them what they deserve, even if it means threatening a general with
blackmail.
        Broderick, in fact, is most convincing in the scenes where Shaw
stands up for the regiment.  Unfortunately, however, Broderick's uneven
performance is, in many respects, the weak link in the movie.  In an effort
to look more mature, Broderick sports a mustache and a goatee, and
throughout the film he slips in and out of a phony Boston accent.  He is
never altogether convincing as Shaw since much of the time his emotions
seem forced.  The film places too much weight on Broderick's character and
not enough on the black soldiers, who are more intriguing.
        GLORY regains lost ground with its harrowing depiction of war.  The
movie shows the devastation of war without resorting to the unnecessarily
graphic gore which marred BORN ON THE FOURTH OF JULY.  GLORY does not try
to rattle you with nauseating blood and guts.  Except for a few bullet
wounds and one exploding head, the film, for the most part, leaves the gore
to your imagination, which is not to say that the battle scenes in GLORY
are timid.  To the contrary, they are chaotic and horrifying; it's just
that director Edward Zwick (the co-creator of "thirtysomething") films them
with far more subtlety and restraint than Oliver Stone could ever muster.
        The key to GLORY is the group dynamic among the black soldiers.
The movie depicts some of (but not enough of) their customs and rituals.
In one scene, for example, the soldiers motivate themselves by singing
prayers around the campfire.  Each man has a chance to relay a few words of
inspiration.  A couple of the movie's most touching moments involve young
black children looking up to the black soldiers with awe, disbelief and
pride.  The regiment's greatest triumph comes when the soldiers distinguish
themselves in battle, thereby earning the respect of their white peers and
earning the honor of leading the climactic assault on Fort Wagner.
        Like any war film, GLORY has its share of gloom and despair, but
ultimately it proves to be a truly uplifting experience and an important
history lesson, a valuable reminder that despite what the history books say
(or, more precisely, what they do not say), blacks played a critically
important role in the North's victory over the South--forever changing the
evolution of America.

Title
Review for Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves (1991)
        ROBIN HOOD: PRINCE OF THIEVES--you have to wonder if the critics
and the public saw the same movie.  The critics generally regarded the film
as a dreary waste of two hours, while the movie-going public found the
classic Robin Hood legend irresistible.  Who was right?  If you ask me, the
truth lies somewhere in between.
        Without question, the film falls victim to numerous plagues, the
most lethal of which is an unusually shaky performance by Kevin Costner,
who is tragically miscast in the title role.  Additionally, the movie
suffers from a wildly inconsistent tone, which is somber one minute and
airy the next.
        But somehow, warts and all, the film manages to offer a rollicking
good time.  PRINCE OF THIEVES is an undeniably entertaining crowd-pleaser,
thanks to rousing action scenes and robust performances from Morgan Freeman
and Alan Rickman.  Be careful not to confuse the movie with the inept 20th
Century Fox version starring Patrick Bergin and Uma Thurman, which truly is
an appalling waste of time.

Title
Review for Barton Fink (1991)
        Hollywood movies, good or bad, tend to be fairly predictable, since
they almost always conform to the conventions of a genre.  A successful
movie can overcome this limitation in a number of ways.  It may add a novel
twist to an otherwise familiar story line.  Or it may, for example, make
you worry about the protagonist even though you KNOW he or she will triumph
in the end.  And then, there's BARTON FINK, which favors breaking the mold
over bending the rules.
        Written, directed, and produced by brothers Joel and Ethan Coen
(BLOOD SIMPLE, RAISING ARIZONA, MILLER'S CROSSING), BARTON FINK is a
shockingly original vision, that rare Hollywood production which strays
from the pack to create its own unique universe.  Remarkably, the Coens
have made a film which is virtually impossible to pigeon hole into any one
particular genre (or any three for that matter), and it is precisely this
elusive quality which makes BARTON FINK such a rewarding experience.  The
Coens offer the viewer genuine suspense, the kind where you don't have a
clue what's going to happen next.  It's a strange and wonderful sensation.
        Set in 1941, the movie stars John Turturro in the title role as an
idealistic playwright whose burning desire is to convey the plight of the
common man.  When his latest play becomes a hit on Broadway, Fink's agent
talks him into moving to Hollywood, where he can make good money writing
movies.  In L.A., Fink encounters a cornucopia of oddballs, starting with
the bossy studio chief (Michael Lerner), who assigns him to write a
B-wrestling picture.  In his flea-bag hotel, Fink strikes up a friendship
with his down-to-earth next door neighbor, Charlie Meadows, a door-to-door
insurance salesman played by John Goodman.  Suffering from writer's block,
Fink finds himself spending more time shooting the breeze with Charlie than
he does writing.  So he seeks the advice of W.P. Mayhew, an alcoholic
novelist who is modelled after William Faulkner and played with verve by
John Mahoney.  Mayhew isn't much help, but Fink hits it off with the famed
writer's secretary/lover (Judy Davis).  And there you have the key players
in a bizarre tale which has minimal plot but plenty of atmosphere and
off-beat humor.
        The movie plunges you into Fink's psyche and creates a dream-like
mood which is reminiscent (but not derivative) of David Lynch's best work.
The Coens demand absolute creative control over their films, and you can
clearly see the results in BARTON FINK.  Their idiosyncratic perspective
hasn't been diluted by script doctors or meddling studio executives, and
consequently, the style and tone of BARTON FINK are exceptionally
consistent and assured.  Dripping with metaphors, the movie revels in
ambiguity and offers heaping portions of food for thought.
        The Coen brothers are widely respected in Hollywood for their
writing, especially for their sharp, intelligent dialogue.  But they are
also masters of visual storytelling, and BARTON FINK finds them at the top
of their game.  Joel's fluid direction, Roger Deakins' mesmerizing
cinematography, and Dennis Gassner's surrealistic production design come
together to cast a hypnotic spell, transfixing you to the screen.  The
haunting film lingers in memory long after the credits roll and the lights
come up.
        Of course, directing also involves working with the actors, and
Joel has elicited inspired performances from his cast.  Turturro, who
masterfully conveys Fink's self-absorption, plays an unappealing character.
But when he's on the screen, you can't take your eyes off of him; he's
simply riveting.  Goodman, who has a near-perfect batting average in
supporting roles, convincingly plays Charlie Meadows as the ultimate common
man, but it's not until the film's finale that you realize just how
effective the performance has been.  As the hyperactive studio mogul,
Lerner is hilarious; his animated delivery is deliciously energetic and
deserves an Oscar nomination.  The movie stumbles only in the casting of
Davis, who seems wrong for her small but important role as Fink's romantic
interest.
        BARTON FINK has other pleasures as well, including Carter Burwell's
musical score, the recreation of 1940s Hollywood, and a wickedly macabre
sense of humor.  This rich, unconventional fable may be too much for some
viewers to swallow, but one thing is certain: the movie won't go in one ear
and out the other.  Don't leave your brain at the door; you're going to
need it for this one.

Title
Review for Mystic Pizza (1988)
        If you have a hearty appetite for a warm and sentimental slice of
life, then MYSTIC PIZZA should be just your cup of tea.  The movie centers
on three young women, two of whom are sisters.  The three friends live in
Mystic, a small coastal fishing town on the Eastern Seaboard, and they work
together in the local pizzeria.  The movie follows the trials and
tribulations of their respective love lives, alternating between the
viewpoint of each character.
        Kat, having just graduated from high school, is working to raise
money toward her tuition at Yale.  Her romantic interest is a 30-year-old
architect who hires her to baby-sit his daughter while his wife is in
Europe.  Kat, who is sexually-inexperienced, develops a strong crush on
him.
        Daisy--Kat's stunning and shapely, but less intellectual, older
sister--attracts the attention of a rich, high society law student.  They
have that classic problem of being from opposite sides of the tracks.  Jo
Jo is involved with Bill, a local fisherman who desperately wants her to
marry him.  Although Jo Jo truly loves Bill, she is not ready to make such
a big commitment.
        At the heart of MYSTIC PIZZA are three fine performances by three
relatively unknown, but extremely well cast, actresses who seem very
natural in their roles.  Kat is the most compelling character in the film;
Annabeth Gish gives her just the right touch of vulnerability and
innocence.  Her heartache as she comes of age is touching and painful.
Lily Taylor and Julia Roberts are equally moving as Jo Jo and Daisy.
MYSTIC PIZZA's supporting cast also delivers the goods.  Vincent D'Onofrio,
William Moses, and Adam Storke play the three romantic interests; each
actor gives his character a sufficient sense of depth.
        MYSTIC PIZZA successfully integrates the three characters and story
lines into one thematic whole.  The movie is filled with moments of comic
yet poignant drama, such as the scene in which Daisy spills buckets of fish
over her boyfriend's Porsche because she thinks he is cheating on her.
MYSTIC PIZZA's impact lasts well beyond its 90 minute duration.  The movie
has lingered in my mind, and my appreciation for it has grown with time.
Gish, Taylor, and Roberts have created in MYSTIC PIZZA three characters who
are quite memorable and endearing; in fact, I want to know what has
happened to Kat, Jo Jo, and Daisy since the end of the film.  Hopefully,
there will be a sequel entitled MYSTERIOUS PASTA that will satisfy my
curiosity.

Title
Review for Crimes and Misdemeanors (1989)
   A new Woody Allen movie is usually a cause for celebration.  But in
recent years, the director's forays into straight drama and his absence
from the screen have been a cause for trepidation more than anything
else.  Happily, Allen fans everywhere can break out the champagne: CRIMES
AND MISDEMEANORS (his 19th film) is a gem!
   The movie is one of the few I've seen where the two main characters
don't even meet until the final scene.  CRIMES is composed of two almost
entirely unrelated story lines, and each has its own unique flavor.  The
weaker of the two involves Martin Landau as a philandering husband who
decides to call it quits with his mistress of two years (Angelica
Houston).  The problem is she won't accept his decision and threatens to
expose their affair.  Landau is faced with a moral crisis when his mafioso
brother suggests they solve his dilemma by liquidating the troublesome
mistress.  Landau doesn't think he is capable of such evil, but at the
same time he feels like he's backed into a corner.
   Straight drama has never been Allen's strength; just watch INTERIORS or
ANOTHER WOMAN and you'll know what I mean.  But surprisingly, the dramatic
story line in CRIMES is anything but impotent.  Landau, coming off his
Oscar-nominated performance in TUCKER, strikes gold again in CRIMES. 
Allen gives the actor a profound role, and Landau does it justice.  He
brings out the character's desperation, making him sympathetic in an odd
sort of way.
   Houston is a revelation as the neurotic lover.  I'll never understand
why her performance in PRIZZI9S HONOR received so much hoopla.  However,
there's no denying that Houston is simply phenomenal in CRIMES as a woman
grasping at straws, composed at one minute and a basket case at the next. 
Houston's performance is worthy of an Oscar.
   Allen juxtaposes the somber and humorless story of marital infidelity
with a comic tale of romantic angst.  And, thankfully, this half of CRIMES
AND MISDEMEANORS is vintage Woody Allen.  To borrow a line from a beer
commercial: it just doesn't get any better than this!  The icing on the
cake is Allen's participation in front of the camera as well as behind it.
   Allen plays a struggling documentary filmmaker who falls in love with a
TV-producer played by who else but Mia Farrow.  Somehow, after 10 films,
the on-screen chemistry between the real-life couple is as fresh and
magical as ever.  But Allen is not Farrow's only suitor in the film.  His
brother-in-law, a rich and powerful TV-executive played by Alan Alda, is
also courting her.  And once you mix in Allen's wife, sister, and niece,
you have a flood of characters--and I've only mentioned half of them.
   Fortunately, Allen has always been a master at juggling large ensemble
casts--for example, HANNAH AND HER SISTERS.  With CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS,
he once again demonstrates his knack for letting each cast-member shine no
matter how small the part.  Alda, always a welcome presence, is playing
against type in his role as the egomaniacal TV-sitcom creator.  He pulls
out all the stops in a tour de force performance.  Something about his
arrogance is irresistibly charming.
   As the strong-willed, sharp-tongued, and upwardly mobile TV-producer,
Mia Farrow is, as usual, both alluring and beguiling.  If you think Farrow
has been missing out in any way by appearing only in Allen's films,
consider the diversity of the characters she has been able to play. 
Farrow is convincing whether she is a shy, timid mental case (SEPTEMBER),
a loudmouth mob-girl (BROADWAY DANNY ROSE), or a no-nonsense, career woman
(CRIMES).
   And let's not forget Allen himself, who never fails to astonish me as
actor, let alone as a director.  His humor is still razor sharp and his
vulnerability touchingly poignant.  Even his smallest facial expressions
can send you into tears or into hysterical laughter depending on the
scene.  Allen is a joy to behold, whether he is schmoozing with his niece
or bickering with his wife and brother-in-law.
   Amidst all the talk about the performances, I've neglected to mention
how thematically rich the film is.  CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS is chock full
of existential quandaries about life, death, God, religion, morality, and
blowing off work to go to the movies.  At times, Allen goes too far and
hits you over the head with his philosophical conundrums.  In any case,
it's probably better if I leave these deeper issues to the English majors
and the Philosophers.
   I don't want to give the impression that CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS is
cold and analytical.  Yes, the film is deadly serious, but not at the
expense of fun.  Whenever the dramatic tension builds to a crescendo,
Allen cuts away for some comic relief.  The movie is overflowing with
hilarious one-liners and comic performances.
   CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS is truly a return to form for Allen.  The
effective fusion of comedy and drama makes the film one of his best to
date, and certainly one of 1989's finest.

Title
Review for Innocent Man, An (1989)
        AN INNOCENT MAN is not a great film; in fact, I'm about to
criticize the hell out of it.  But the funny thing is, the movie left me
satisfied.  Although it is sometimes laughably unbelievable, AN INNOCENT
MAN packs a powerful emotional punch.
        Tom Selleck plays Jimmie Rainwood, an airline mechanic who's
wrongfully sent to prison for three years when two dirty vice cops frame
him.  David Rasche and Richard Young play the corrupt detectives as kind of
a Crockett and Tubbs gone haywire.  They're so sleazy they give dirt a bad
name.
        While Jimmie serves his time behind bars, he has to abandon
everything he's ever known and conform to a prison society where it's kill
or be killed.  The movie depicts prison life with all the usual cliches:
uptight guards, racial tensions, beatings, and murders.  Nothing new
here--just recycled material from countless other prison movies.
        Jimmie Rainwood is Selleck's most challenging film role to date,
one which calls for much more than just making googley-eyes at a baby.
Unfortunately, Selleck isn't quite up to the task; he's somewhat stiff.  He
gets the surface gestures right, but he never digs deep enough to reveal
Jimmie's underlying rage and vulnerability.  However, Selleck does have
enough charisma to get by in the role.  Jimmie seems like a decent man, and
we feel sorry for him.
        Unlike Selleck, who's in over his head, F. Murray Abraham is in his
element.  He is dazzling as the seasoned inmate who takes Rainwood under
his wing and shows him the ropes, teaching him how to survive prison
politics.  Abraham is good enough to make you forget he's playing a stock
character.  Newcomer Laila Robins plays Jimmie's loyal wife Kate, who
tirelessly works to prove her husband's innocence while he's incarcerated.
Robins is effective in the role.  Even when her lines sound artificial, her
emotions come across as sincere.
        Selleck, Robins, and the rest of the cast get little help from
ex-convict Larry Brothers who wrote the script.  Apparently, Brothers
dropped out of college in the '60s to pursue his main interests: drugs and
crime.  Eventually, he wound up in Los Angeles and began working in the
film industry.  The screenwriting classes in prison must not be so great
because Brothers' dialogue is often unbearably phony.  For instance, Robins
has to deliver this classic line: "I'm not a theory!  I'm a real human
being, and so is Jimmie!"  And try this one on for size: Jimmie and Kate
are about to have sex for the first time in three years...
Kate: "We have all the time in the world."
If you think the dialogue is bad, wait until you hear the gushing musical
score; you could pour it over pancakes.
        The saving grace of AN INNOCENT MAN is its emotional charge and
dramatic intensity.  The movie is superficial in many respects, but it
pushes all the right buttons to arouse our emotions.  We're infuriated by
the two arrogant cops who think they're untouchable.  We're distressed by
the actions Jimmie is forced to take while he's in prison.  Selleck and
Robins are a little too cutesy as husband and wife, but there is a
genuinely moving tenderness between them.  The scene in which she first
visits him in prison is heartbreaking; at least, I had a lump in my throat.
        Director Peter Yates shot AN INNOCENT MAN on location in two
prisons and used actual inmates as extras.  The bleak locations and tough
convicts give the film a sense of gritty reality, which helps to distract
us from the weaknesses of the script.  It's a close call, but I think the
good in AN INNOCENT MAN outweighs the bad.

Title
Review for Sea of Love (1989)
Thanks in large part to an intelligent script and a talented cast, the
movie SEA OF LOVE breathe new life into a tired genre: the serial murder
thriller.
        Al Pacino plays a 40-something New York detective going through a
mid-life crisis.  To complicate matters, he's also in the midst of
investigating a series of gruesome homicides.  One of the suspects is a
sexually-charged single mother, played by Ellen Barkin.  And what do you
know: before you can say JAGGED EDGE, they're immersed in a passionate love
affair.
        SEA OF LOVE easily absorbs you into a web of psychological
intrigue.  Barkin is truly enigmatic but not at the cost of her character's
authenticity.  The movie takes great joy in playing mind games with you,
and it keeps you guessing as to whether Barkin is in fact the killer.  As
usual, Barkin brings to the screen her own unique brand of sexual energy.
She's as alluring and ravishing as ever; and, oh yes, her performance is
outstanding.
        For the first time this decade, Pacino has a role worthy of his
talents.  His character is on one hand sensitive and vulnerable and on the
other alcoholic and self-destructive.  The high strung detective is no
saint, but at the same time he's a decent bloke if you get past his rough
edges.  Pacino's strong performance should allow him to reclaim his stature
as one of Hollywood's premier leading men.  John Goodman of the hit TV
sitcom "Roseanne" plays Pacino's partner, bringing to the role considerable
charm and charisma.
        The individual whom we should really thank for this highly
entertaining and superbly crafted thriller is screenwriter Richard Price.
He furnishes the movie with a rich mixture of mystery, character, erotic
tension, and, most surprisingly, laughs--big ones.  Sure the writer commits
a few errors and stumbles a little at the end, but in the balance his
dialogue and story line are right on the mark.
        I guess SEA OF LOVE is fairly suspenseful since the capacity crowd
jumped at least three times.  But I wouldn't really know because I was so
busy trying to outguess the movie and solve the mystery that I barely
noticed the suspense.  Did she do it or didn't she?

Title
Review for Staying Together (1989)
        STAYING TOGETHER reminds me of another small-town-slice-of-life
movie: MYSTIC PIZZA.  STAYING TOGETHER is sort of the flip side of that far
superior film: instead of depicting three young women and their boyfriends,
STAYING TOGETHER follows three young men and their girlfriends.  The movie
also mixes in a strong dose of father-son conflict to stir things up.
Dramatically, STAYING TOGETHER is a mess, but thankfully it partially
redeems itself with its off-beat humor.
        The movie is set in Ridgeway, South Carolina, where three brothers
help their father run the family restaurant, McDermott's Famous Chicken.
The early portion of the film captures the charm and flavor of the town's
leisurely life-style.  The brothers lounge around, get drunk, work a
little, smoke some pot, and generally goof off.  Life is easy and simple.
That is, until their father turns their lives upside down by abruptly
selling the family business.
        STAYING TOGETHER suffers from a wildly inconsistent and sometimes
incoherent script by playwright Monte Merrick.  Merrick definitely has a
knack for creating comic situations.  For example, in one scene, the oldest
brother, played by Tim Quill, makes love to Stockard Channing while she is
on the phone.  Somehow, the movie manages to squeeze laughs out of this
tired gag.
        Unfortunately, STAYING TOGETHER falls apart whenever it shifts
gears from comedy to drama.  The film really lays an egg during the "Big
Emotional Moments," which come fast and furious.  After the uptight father
suffers a heart attack, every twist and turn in the story seems to bring
about an emotional crisis.  None of these scenes rings true because the
characters sound like they are delivering speeches rather than speaking
naturally.  The supposedly touching moments have all the emotional impact
of a calculus lecture.
        Neither director Lee Grant nor the cast is really to blame; the
weak script is just too much for them to overcome.  As far as the
performances go, the real bright spot is Sean Astin, who plays the youngest
brother--a rambunctious 17-year-old.  Astin steals every scene he's in with
his flamboyant charisma.  Melinda Dillon also stands out as the hip
housewife and mother.
        For a movie that leaves you so cold emotionally, STAYING TOGETHER
provides more entertainment than you might expect, but whether it's worth 6
bucks plus parking is another matter altogether.

Title
Review for Naked Gun: From the Files of Police Squad!, The (1988)
        A powerful business tycoon dreams up an ingenious scheme to
assassinate the Queen of England at a baseball game.  And only one man can
stop him.  James Bond?  Guess again.  The Equalizer?  Nope!  Give up?  Try
Leslie Nielsen, a.k.a. Frank Drebin, the bumbling cop from the short-lived
TV series "Police Squad."  That's right, "Police Squad" is back and ready
for action, this time as a movie from the team that brought us AIRPLANE,
TOP SECRET, RUTHLESS PEOPLE, and--of course--"Police Squad."  Their movie
THE NAKED GUN: FROM THE FILES OF POLICE SQUAD! reunites most of the
original cast from the TV series and features the type of madcap, slapstick
humor we've come to expect from Jerry Zucker, Jim Abrahams, and David
Zucker.
        Although THE NAKED GUN has more laughs than most comedies would
dream of, it fails to duplicate the magic of the team's previous efforts.
Since AIRPLANE, Abrahams and the Zucker brothers have used the same formula
so many times now that it has lost its novelty and become cliched.  Many of
the jokes in THE NAKED GUN not only lack originality, but also get repeated
over and over and over again.  The first time Leslie Nielsen pulls up to
the curb and crashes into something is mildly amusing, if uninspired; by
the seventh time, the gag has grown so stale it makes you want to ... gag.
        The first half of the movie strings together a series of non-stop
gags one after another, half of which fizzle.  The second half, to its
credit, slows down and has some extremely inventive and hysterical
sequences.
        The actors in THE NAKED GUN deserve credit for their solid comic
performances in the face of an uneven script.  Leslie ("Don't call me
Shirley") Nielsen is as loveable and inept as ever as Officer Drebin,
Ricardo Montalban is appropriately despicable as the conniving tycoon, and
Priscilla Presley as Nielsen's love-interest lights up the screen with her
humor and sex appeal.  The movie's clever cameos also keep things rolling.
        Although it may pale in comparison to a masterpiece such as
AIRPLANE, THE NAKED GUN is by no means a failure.  The movie easily has
enough successful gags and honest laughs for me to recommend it to any fan
of the Zuckers/Abrahams sense of humor.

Title
Review for Working Girl (1988)
        In director Mike Nichols' WORKING GIRL, Melanie Griffith plays a
secretary in Manhattan, the type who wears running shoes and socks over her
nylons as she commutes to work and then changes into high heals once she
gets there.  Her greatest desire is to be respected for her mind as well as
for her pretty face and shapely body.  She has big ideas but no one will
listen to them.  And to top it off, her macho chauvinistic boyfriend,
played by Alec Baldwin, is cheating on her.
        But Griffith's fortunes turn when her new boss has a skiing
accident and is laid up in the hospital for two weeks.  Griffith uses her
boss' absence as an opportunity to implement her own innovative business
scheme.  She joins forces professionally and romantically with Harrison
Ford, who plays a struggling investment broker.  Ford is outstanding in his
role as a bumbling and ruffled, but charming, bachelor.  He demonstrates
once again his unheralded versatility.
        WORKING GIRL is a contemporary Cinderella story, but one with a
corporate twist.  Instead of a ball, we get a board room.  Mr. Charming is
not a prince, but a broker.  And the evil stepmother is an executive in
"Mergers and Acquisitions" who is happy to steal an idea and call it her
own.  Although the movie may not generate much in the way of deep drama or
high comedy, it succeeds beautifully as a fairy tale.
        WORKING GIRL is a showcase for Melanie Griffith.  Nichols takes
every opportunity to show off her cleavage, her curves, and her captivating
blue eyes.  But Griffith's role calls for much more than mere sex-appeal,
and there is more to her character than meets the eye.  Griffith gives a
solid, even impressive, performance as the intelligent, ambitious, and
resourceful secretary who wants to raise her social stock.  Whereas
Griffith's character is someone we can root for, Sigourney Weaver's is
someone we can love to hate.  Weaver turns in a bravura performance as
Griffith's cool, calculating, and back-stabbing boss.
        The secret to WORKING GIRL's success lies in its inspired casting.
Griffith, Weaver, and even Ford--who is playing against type--are perfect
in their roles.  And Joan Cusack is weird and wacky in yet another small
supporting part.  I bought into this simple Cinderella story primarily
because the characters and performances captured me hook, line, and sinker.

Title
Review for Cadillac Man (1990)
        CADILLAC MAN is not the first movie to revolve around a hostage
situation, and it certainly won't be the last.  Screenwriter Ken Friedman,
however, has constructed a hostage crisis which transcends the usual
Hollywood formulas and cliches.  CADILLAC MAN puts a new spin on an old
wheel by being the first hostage movie I can think of to feature a confused
terrorist who doesn't know what he wants--a terrorist whose only demand is
that the police "go away."  The movie also adds the new twist of having its
hero, Robin Williams, try to TALK his way out of the crisis rather than
SHOOT his way out.
        CADILLAC MAN has an overly long set-up, but once the movie kicks
into gear, it gets a lot of mileage out of an intriguing premise.  Williams
plays a car salesman whose personal life is in shambles.  He has serious
female trouble with not only his girlfriend (Lori Petty) but also his
ex-wife (Pamela Reed) and his money-draining mistress, splendidly played by
Fran Drescher.  At first, the movie seems kind of forced, especially
Williams' voice-over narration, which is meant to establish his character.
But just when you start to get impatient and begin wondering what the point
is, Tim Robbins literally comes crashing into the movie, and the story
quickly comes into focus.
        How does Robbins fit into the picture?  His wife (Annabella
Sciorra) and Robin Williams work at the same auto show-room.  Robbins is
crazed with the idea that she is having an affair with any or all of the
salesmen so he gets an AK-47, drives his motorcycle through the show-room
window and takes the entire dealership hostage, including Williams and all
of the customers.
        Williams gives a fascinating performance as the fast talking
salesman who must use all of his wheeling and dealing skills to gain
Robbins' trust and talk him into releasing the hostages.  A true team
player, Williams never tries to steal the spotlight from the other actors,
all of whom give zesty performances.  Tim Robbins, in particular, is
dazzling as the manic terrorist who isn't playing with a full deck.
Williams and Robbins reportedly improvised many of their scenes, and it's
exhilarating to see them flying by the seats of their pants as they play
off one another.
        CADILLAC MAN is impossible to pigeon-hole: it's not exactly a drama
and not exactly a comedy.  The movie lies in that grey area somewhere in
between, gracefully mixing humor and drama.  Director Roger Donaldson
extracts ample comic relief from a Chinese restaurant close to the hostage
site, where a rude waitress, deliciously played by Lauren Tom, abuses
customers by telling them what and how much to order.
        Unfortunately, CADILLAC MAN sometimes stalls and breaks down; it
could use a major tune up in the editing room.  The movie takes much too
long to get to the hostage crisis, and, even worse, Lori Petty's role as
Williams' fashion conscious girlfriend is virtually irrelevant to the story
line.  Her scenes are unforgivably awkward and unnecessary; they should
have been left on the cutting room floor.
        "The Salesman, The Terrorist, His Wife, and Her Lover" earns extra
brownie points, however, for not being a sequel and for not being a buddy,
police, ghost, or mind-switching movie.  Originality is a rare commodity in
Hollywood; thankfully, CADILLAC MAN has a full tank.

Title
Review for Batman (1989)
        What surprises me most about the long-awaited BATMAN is that the
movie centers not on the Caped Crusader but on the Joker.  The Dark Knight
actually has less screen time than his homicidal arch nemesis!  I can hear
Batfans everywhere protesting: "First they had the nerve to cast Michael
Keaton as Batman, and now they think they can get away with making him
second banana to the Joker!!"  And, indeed, this situation would have been
altogether inappropriate and intolerable were it not for the fact that
someone at Warner Brothers had the savvy to cast Jack Nicholson in the role
he was born to play.
        Nicholson deserves the top billing he is receiving in the posters
and opening credits since his astounding, Oscar-worthy performance as the
Joker is the highlight of BATMAN.  Nicholson shows no inhibition or shame
as he pulls out all the stops to create a Joker that makes Cesar Romero
look like Bozo the Clown (Romero played the Joker in the '60s TV series).
On one hand, Nicholson's Joker is extremely funny.  His murderous escapades
and manic outbursts (which include defacing paintings in an art museum and
invading the television airwaves with hilarious pirate broadcasts) bring
humor and laughter into an otherwise dark film.  But on the other hand, his
outwardly jovial disposition is only a mask for his intense contempt for
all of mankind.  The Joker's cruelty and demented, diabolical nature are
truly frightening and sinister.  This guy is off his rocker, and he not
only knows it, he flaunts it!
        But enough about Nicholson as the Joker: I'm sure most people are
wondering about Michael Keaton as Batman.  Like many, I was outraged when
Warner Brothers announced that Keaton had been cast as the Caped Crusader.
But Batfans need not worry becauseholy unconventional casting!Keaton
delivers.  He is convincing as the tormented millionaire, Bruce Wayne, and
beneath his hard, black body armor, he is mysterious and formidable as the
Batman.  Even though the screenplay only halfheartedly attempts to develop
the character, Keaton manages to give hints of the inner turmoil and
emotional rage that drive Wayne to don his Bat gear and battle the low life
scum of Gotham City.
        Visually, BATMAN is a knockoutnothing short of a triumph for
director Tim Burton and his production team.  The movie successfully
captures the film noir look and bleak, gloomy atmosphere of such Batman
comic books as "The Dark Knight Returns" and "The Killing Joke."  Burton's
film is a feast for the eyes; the $35 million budget is definitely on the
screen.  The sets, costumes, and make-up are stunning and worthy of Oscar
nominations.  Nicholson isn't joking when he boasts, "Wait 'till they get a
load of me!"  His grimacing smile, green hair, and purple suits over orange
shirts are colorful and outrageous.  Keaton's wardrobe is equally
appropriate.  Batman's cape, mask, and body armor make him look
threatening, frightening, and invinciblebringing to mind not Adam West's
campy costume in the TV series but Peter Weir's outfit in ROBOCOP.
        Production designer Anton Furst's sets are a wonder.  Gotham City
is dark and foreboding, almost as if it were an expressionist vision of New
York.  The Batcave is cold, bare, and desolate.  The world that Burton and
Furst have created in BATMAN is a melancholy nightmare of violence and
corruption.  The movie's gritty BLADERUNNER/ROBOCOP look is a joy to
behold.
        The plot, on the other hand, is not as rousing.  The screenplay is
not up to snuff in comparison to the  stylized sets and superb acting.  It
takes forever for what little story there is to finally kick into gear.
BATMAN tries to walk a thin line between action and character psychology,
but it fails to give us enough of either one.  As I mentioned earlier, the
screenplay gives us plenty of the Joker, but it never fully establishes
Batman's psychological motives and underpinnings.  In terms of action,
BATMAN is not as thrilling as you might expect.  Burton seems more
concerned with the visual and dramatic elements of the story.  More than
anything, BATMAN is a mood film.
        While BATMAN may not completely absorb and excite you, it will
likely impress you with its success at bringing to life the style and
spirit of the Batman comic books.  Thanks to its distinctive look, the
movielike a good comic booktransports us to another world.

Title
Review for Abyss, The (1989)
Review written in 1989  (original theatrical release reviewed)
   Mix together 2001, CLOSE ENCOUNTERS, ALIENS, and THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE
and you have THE ABYSS, director James Cameron's incredibly ambitious
underwater adventure.  Cameron has gone for broke in his attempt to chart
new cinematic territory--to boldly go where no director has gone before. 
He has created a sci-fi love story of epic proportions, one that is
surprisingly provocative.  Despite flaws in the film's execution, one has
to be impressed by the scope and scale of Cameron's vision.
   In one of the most grueling shoots in film history, THE ABYSS was
filmed 30 feet underwater in a 7.5 million gallon concrete tank.  The
movie is set aboard Deepcore, a submersible, commercial oil rig which is
commandeered by the Navy to investigate a crashed nuclear submarine.  The
Navy sends a team of SEAL (Sea, Air, and Land) divers down to the rig to
lead its civilian crew on a search expedition.
   In the lead roles, Ed Harris and Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio hold their
own against the hardware and special effects--playing, respectively, Bud
Brigman, the foreman in charge of Deepcore's crew, and his estranged wife
Lindsey, a self-described "cast-iron bitch" who designed the revolutionary
oil rig.  The two characters rekindle their love while all hell is
breaking loose on the ocean floor; they find themselves contending with a
hurricane, some mysterious alien sea creatures, and a Navy officer who is
suffering from water pressure-induced psychosis.
   Technically, THE ABYSS is dazzling--a cinematic knockout.  The movie's
budget is rumored to have exceeded $50 million, and it's a good bet that
nearly every penny is on the screen.  Perhaps most startling and
awe-inspiring is the sound; THE ABYSS offers the most dramatic utilization
of Dolby stereo surround I've ever heard.  The movie is a triumph of sound
editing, especially when blasted through a state of the art THX sound
system.  Clinking chains, whirring motors, and gasping breaths engulf the
audience from every direction.
   Visually, THE ABYSS is no less stunning.  Cameron's direction--as well
as the movie's cinematography, underwater sets, and special effects--are
spectacular.  One particularly gripping moment comes when Cameron shoots
from inside a diver's helmet; the tension and claustrophobia are almost
unbearable.  THE ABYSS passes its most important test: it creates the
illusion that the action is actually unfolding half a mile beneath the
ocean's surface.  Cameron's film is beautifully and lovingly crafted and
so overwhelmingly massive that it leaves you in a state of sensory
overload.
   Cameron also wrote THE ABYSS, but unfortunately his spiritual story of
the unknown is full of leaks.  First, it's riddled with too many loose
ends, holes, and above all, implausibilities.  The movie strains its
credibility at every twist and turn to the point where it sometimes even
unintentionally draws laughter from the audience.  The characters seem to
rely on luck more often than their own resources to get themselves out of
sticky situations.  For example, a crew member awakens from a coma at just
the right moment to save his comrades.  Second, except for the two leads,
the members of the rescue team are forgettable, stock characters.  When
three crew members drown early in the film, their deaths have no emotional
impact whatsoever.  None of the supporting actors leaves a lasting
impression, except for Michael Biehn (TERMINATOR, ALIENS) as the deranged
SEAL officer; Biehn deserves credit for trying to flesh out his cardboard
character.  Third, the movie takes itself so seriously that it often
borders on pretentious melodrama. 
   For the above reasons, THE ABYSS is often difficult to swallow at face
value, and you never totally buy the situation.  Unlike THE TERMINATOR and
ALIENS, Cameron's two previous films, THE ABYSS fails to completely absorb
you into its fantasy world.  The movie hit the theaters over a month
behind schedule because of production and special effects delays, which
perhaps explains its unfinished feel.  It almost seems as if Cameron
hurried his final cut, in which case the holes and loose-ends may be
rooted in the editing room rather than in the screenplay.
   At two hours and twenty minutes, THE ABYSS is about half an hour too
long.  Cameron spends too much time setting up the conflict, and he also
tries to cram too many themes into the film.  The alien subplot, while
providing an excuse for some nifty special effects, is ultimately no more
than a recycled Hollywood cliche.  The movie also superficially
introduces, and then fails to explore, the political undercurrents
surrounding the issue of nuclear weapons (the sunken sub houses warheads
with 5 times the power of Hiroshima).  THE ABYSS tries to tread through so
much water that everything seems half-baked, except for the touching love
story between Bud and Lindsey.
   In Cameron's capable hands, however, the cup is definitely half-full
rather than half-empty.  Once all the plot strands are in place, the movie
kicks into high gear and offers the intense, riveting action that is
Cameron's forte.  One of the most nerve-wracking scenes has Bud and
Lindsey stranded in a flooding capsule with only one oxygen suit between
them in which to swim back to the oil rig.  Panic sets in as they (and we)
realize that only one of them can escape alive.  While THE ABYSS doesn't
match the breakneck pace of ALIENS or the frightening suspense of THE
TERMINATOR, it contains enough nail-biting tension to leave you without
finger nails.
   THE ABYSS will undoubtedly spark heated debates between its fans and
its foes, like two other recent big-budget extravaganzas with lofty
aspirations: BATMAN and THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN.  Visually, all
three films are astonishing.  They differ considerably, however, in the
strength of their scripts.  In BATMAN, director Tim Burton complements the
film's dramatic film noir look with a story that, while not fully
developed, is absorbing and compelling.  BARON MUNCHAUSEN, on the other
hand, is all flash and no substance; it leaves you altogether indifferent
to the characters and plot.  THE ABYSS, by comparison, falls somewhere in
between these two extremes.  The blossoming love between Bud and Lindsey
and their desperate battle for survival on the ocean floor provide enough
human drama to make THE ABYSS more than just a technical achievement.
   After all is said and done, THE ABYSS is not Cameron's strongest work. 
The film really doesn't break that much new ground.  Its mystical feeling
is too reminiscent of 2001, and its climax makes me wonder if THE ABYSS
should have been called "Close Encounters of the Sub-Oceanic Kind." 
Without the spiritual and extraterrestrial nonsense, THE ABYSS would have
worked splendidly as a straightforward survival thriller.  Even so, it
remains a complex, challenging must-see for adventure fans, one that will
leave your ears ringing, your heart pumping, and your head spinning.
NOTE:  THE ABYSS (1993 Special Edition):  ***1/2

Title
Review for Running on Empty (1988)
     Imagine moving to a new town and assuming a new identity every year
because you are on the run from the F.B.I. for a crime you did not commit.
Now imagine having these problems at 17, that difficult age of college
applications, first love, and transition from adolescence to adulthood.  In
director Sidney Lumet's RUNNING ON EMPTY, River Phoenix finds himself in
just this predicament.
     His parents are Arthur and Annie Pope, left wing radicals who blew
up a napalm factory in 1971 as part of the war protest; the explosion
blinded and paralyzed a janitor who was not scheduled to be in the building
at the time.  To avoid imprisonment, the Popes went underground with their
then two year old son and cut off all ties to family and friends.  RUNNING
ON EMPTY is set 15 years later; their son, played by Phoenix, is now a high
school senior who has lived underground for as long as he can remember.
     RUNNING ON EMPTY opens with the Pope family fleeing from their
current home because the FBI is on the verge of discovering their
whereabouts.  The Popes assume new identities and move to a new town.  As
they settle in, Phoenix's character is the focal point of the story.  The
music teacher at the local high school takes interest in Phoenix's piano
playing and encourages him to apply to Julliard.  In the mean time, Phoenix
falls in love with, and bares his soul to, his teacher's daughter--a
rebellious free spirit played by Martha Plimpton.
     RUNNING ON EMPTY examines the conflict that arises when the time
comes for the Pope family to move on once again.  Phoenix does not want to
leave his family, but staying with them means separating from Plimpton and
abandoning his plans to attend college and study music.  On the other hand,
if Phoenix does leave his family, he may never see them again.  Phoenix's
father, played by Judd Hirsch, opposes his college plans.  Arthur Pope is a
stubborn man deeply committed to his family, which he views as an
inseparable unit; he cringes at the idea of it breaking apart.  In
contrast, Phoenix's mother, Annie, sees gross injustice in making Phoenix
give up his future for the crime she and Arthur committed.  One of the most
underrated actresses in the business, Christine Lahti--who was last seen in
the unjustly neglected HOUSEKEEPING--plays Annie Pope.
     Lumet's portrayal of the Pope family packs a powerful emotional
punch.  In fact, I recommend bringing a large supply of Kleenex since
RUNNING ON EMPTY is likely to bring you to tears several times.  For
example, the scene of Lahti visiting her father for the first time since
going underground is excruciatingly painful to watch.  Under Lumet's
sensitive direction, Lahti, Hirsch, Plimpton, and the rest of the cast give
first-rate performances, but RUNNING ON EMPTY really belongs to Phoenix.
As the conflicted young pianist, Phoenix is riveting in an Oscar-calibre
performance.  It's hard to believe that this is the same actor who just two
years ago played one of the young boys in STAND BY ME.  With his
performance in RUNNING ON EMPTY, Phoenix has successfully bridged the
transition from child acting to adult roles.  This heartbreaking drama is
one of the year's best films.

Title
Review for Doors, The (1991)
        After Oliver Stone's hit-you-over-the-head antics in BORN ON THE
FOURTH OF JULY, I was skeptical about THE DOORS, fearing he would ruin
another fertile subject with sledgehammer direction.  To my great delight,
however, I found THE DOORS to be an extraordinary technical and artistic
achievement, from Stone's direction to the cinematography, set design, and
sound editing--not to mention Val Kilmer's mind blowing performance as Jim
Morrison.
        Granted, there are some things the movie does NOT do particularly
well.  For example, it gives Meg Ryan (who plays Morrison's common-law
wife, Pamela Courson) far too little screen time.  Further, Stone is so
obsessed with Morrison that he fails to shine any light on the other Doors
members.  But these deficiencies are inconsequential blemishes on an
otherwise striking canvas.  Stone's recreations of the Doors' concerts are
breathtaking, and he chronicles Morrison's self-destructive descent with a
chilling sense of claustrophobia.  THE DOORS also provides an extremely
vivid sense of the era, perfectly capturing the essence of the late '60s
and early '70s.  The psychedelic, drugged-out point of view makes this a
film for the time capsule.
        In short, all of the qualities that I hated about BORN ON THE
FOURTH OF JULY I admired in THE DOORS.  In this case, Stone's over-the-top
direction is appropriate to the subject matter--even integrated with it.  A
counter example is GREAT BALLS OF FIRE, in which the light comic tone is
completely at odds with the controversial nature of Jerry Lee Lewis' life.
Stone's flamboyant and portentous visual style, on the other hand,
perfectly suits Morrison's excessive personality and his group's foreboding
music.
        If THE DOORS is a stylistic victory for Stone, then it's a
monumental triumph for Val Kilmer.  After playing bubble gum heroes in
forgettable movies, such as TOP SECRET, WILLOW and KILL ME AGAIN, Kilmer
has stepped into the major leagues with his seamless performance as the
Doors' tormented, death-obsessed lead singer.  You forget that it's Kilmer
you're watching; all you see on the screen is Jim Morrison.  Kilmer has
completely transformed his image as an actor; there's nothing lightweight
about him.
        You may also get a kick out of seeing Kyle MacLachlan shed his
clean-cut Dale Cooper persona from "Twin Peaks" to play Ray Manzarek, the
laid back hippy who became the Doors' keyboardist.  And in a priceless
cameo as Andy Warhol, Crispin Glover is not to be missed.
        The icing on the cake is the wall-to-wall soundtrack of classic
Doors songs.  The group's evocative music and Stone's potent visuals
combine to form a wild ride--for your eyes AND ears.

Title
Review for Swing Shift (1984)
        I rented SWING SHIFT with mixed expectations since the movie opened
theatrically to mediocre reviews.  However, my admiration for the film's
star, Goldie Hawn, and its director, Jonathan Demme, were more than enough
to overcome my hesitation.
        SWING SHIFT is a fairly good, but somewhat unsubstantial, stateside
World War II drama.  On one level, the film concerns the invasion of women
into the work force during the war.  On another level, SWING SHIFT is a
simple and sweet love story.  Unfortunately, the film does not fully
realize either of these two themes, as it treats both rather superficially.
        Hawn stars as an unambitious housewife whose husband enlists in the
navy after the bombing of Pearl Harbor.  To make ends meet and to fill her
time, Hawn goes to work for an airplane factory, where she is subject to
relentless courtship from her foreman, played by Kurt Russell.  Hawn gives
a strong and credible performance as a woman who is torn between her
devotion to her husband on the one hand and her loneliness and attraction
to her suitor on the other.  Hawn's character in SWING SHIFT is much deeper
than the cutesy, air-headed roles she usually plays.  As she matures from a
naive and subservient housewife to a confident and assertive factory
forewoman, Hawn's performance always rings true.
        As Hawn's suitor and eventual lover, Kurt Russell is charming and
sympathetic in perhaps the most convincing performance of his career.
Russell seems like a real person in SWING SHIFT, whereas in other
movies--such as BIG TROUBLE IN LITTLE CHINA and OVERBOARD--he has seemed
one dimensional.  Moreover, the chemistry between Hawn and Russell in SWING
SHIFT is much more potent than it was in OVERBOARD, a film in which they
were hampered by an uneven script.  In fact, Hawn and Russell reportedly
fell in love while making SWING SHIFT and have been an off-screen couple
ever since, which suggests that their romance in this film may not be
entirely a performance.
        SWING SHIFT is not especially plot-intensive so it must succeed or
fail on the strength of its characters and acting.  I think it does so on
both accounts.  All the characters, including the supporting ones, seem
genuine.  The strong World War II flavor and atmosphere that Demme brings
to the screen is also noteworthy.  Unfortunately, SWING SHIFT is not
terribly profound.  The movie does not provide any fresh insights into the
predicament of working women during and after the war.  Nor does it shed
any light onto illicit and adulterous love, the other major theme of SWING
SHIFT.  Nevertheless, I was able to enjoy SWING SHIFT for what it is: a
film with memorable and sympathetic characters, but one lacking in
substance and lasting emotional impact.
        Most critics, despite their lukewarm response to SWING SHIFT,
highly praised Christine Lahti's performance--as Hawn's strong willed
friend--and singled her out as the main reason to see the film.  Her
acclaimed performance, however, did not particularly impress me.  She plays
the character well enough, but I don't think she is any more effective than
is Hawn, Russell, or the rest of the fine cast.  A final noteworthy bit of
trivia about SWING SHIFT is that then-unknown Holly Hunter has about a
minute of screen time as one of the women in Hawn's circle of co-workers.
Needless to say, any movie featuring both Goldie Hawn AND Holly Hunter
cannot be without its merits.

Title
Review for Little Murders (1971)
        Cable channels like Bravo earn their keep by offering cinematic
gems which have been buried under pounds of blockbusters and sequels--for
instance, LITTLE MURDERS, the 1971 film adaptation of Jules Feiffer's
off-Broadway play.  Until it popped up on Bravo's schedule, I had never
heard of LITTLE MURDERS, which is strange because the movie definitely
deserves attention.
        Directed by Alan Arkin, LITTLE MURDERS is an utterly unforgettable
and provocative pitch-black satire.  The movie is set within the violent
confines of New York City, and it presents a grim world of neurosis and
paranoia.
        LITTLE MURDERS chronicles an unusual romance between the
unlikeliest couple.  Marcia Rodd is a high strung, head-strong interior
decorator; Elliott Gould is an apathetic, socially-withdrawn photographer
(who specializes in shooting dung).  Gould is a social misfit of the
highest order--painfully passive and shy.  The two meet when Rodd rescues
Gould from some thugs who are beating him to a pulp outside her apartment
window.  Gould is too indifferent to fight off his assailants so Rodd jumps
in and knocks them away with her purse.  It's not quite love at first
sight, but it IS the beginning of a turbulent relationship.
        Rodd sees Gould as someone whom she can mold into her ideal mate.
She starts by forcing him to have fun: they golf, play tennis, go bowling,
and ride horses.  Love is in the air.  Well, sort of...  Rodd falls in love
with Gould, and Gould ... well, Gould doesn't know what love is, but he
finds Rodd "comfortable."  And before you know it, she has brought him home
to meet her parents, despite his protestations that he doesn't like
families.
        The dinner with Rodd's family is hysterical beyond belief--the
movie's piece de resistance.  Rodd's mother, father, and brother make for
one of the strangest families ever captured on film.  Vincent Gardenia is
priceless as Rodd's conservative father.  Her dense mother, played by
Elizabeth Wilson, is a walking cliche who is constantly spewing platitudes,
like "It's always darkest before the dawn" and "How far better it is to
strike a match than curse the darkness."  Jon Korkes is weird enough to
give you the creeps as Rodd's off-the-wall brother.  I couldn't figure out
if he was supposed to be retarded or just incredibly immature: he looks 25,
but he has the mentality of Bart Simpson.
        LITTLE MURDERS is bursting at the seams with the grotesquely
absurd.  Every character is weirder than the one before.  Donald
Sutherland, for example, has a small but juicy role as the radical preacher
who marries Gould and Rodd in a decidedly unorthodox ceremony.  Sutherland,
sporting a hippy-look with long hair and beard, comes across as a demented,
modern-day Jesus-figure--one who gleefully denounces marriage and mocks
love.  The actors perform their roles with obvious relish and gusto,
especially director Alan Arkin, who briefly appears on the scene as a mad
detective.
        It's tempting to praise each performance in LITTLE MURDERS as a
tour de force, but it's really more accurate to say that the entire movie
is a tour de force--of writing, directing, AND acting.  The laughs pile up
on top of one another, but just when you least expect it, LITTLE MURDERS
does an about face and turns serious, deadly serious, with some shocking
plot twists.  As a result, the film is both brutally funny and brutally
disturbing.

Title
Review for Q & A (1990)
     Director Sydney Lumet has made dozens of exceptional films over the
years; FAMILY BUSINESS was not one of them.  The limp caper comedy was
altogether forgettable, especially in comparison to Lumet's prior film, the
gut-wrenching drama RUNNING ON EMPTY.  But one mark of a great filmmaker is
the ability to bounce back from a misfire like FAMILY BUSINESS with a
bulls-eye like Q & A.
     In Q & A, Lumet offers a powerful and provocative look at New York
City's police force and judicial system; it's not a pretty sight.  The film
(based on the book by New York State Supreme Court Justice and former D.A.
Edwin Torres) exposes the city's ugly underbelly--the dirty cops, the
cheesy lawyers, and above all, the racist "old boy" network.  In some
respects, the movie is a routine story of police corruption.  But in other
respects, it's a bold and fiery outcry against racism, as incendiary and
infuriating as DO THE RIGHT THING or MISSISSIPPI BURNING.
     The film features Nick Nolte in his tough-guy mode, playing a
hot-shot detective on the N.Y.P.D. who is rotten to the core.  The movie
begins in a dark alley with Nolte blowing a guy's brains out for no
apparent reason and then claiming it was in self-defense.  Timothy Hutton
plays the young, idealistic assistant D.A. assigned to investigate the
shooting.
     Hutton's superior (Patrick O'Neal) assures him that the case is cut
and dried, a clear instance of self-defense.  But Hutton realizes that
there's something rotten in the state of New York when witnesses start
giving conflicting testimonies in the Q & A (the official record of what
happened).  The key witness is a drug lord (Armand Assante) who's married
to Hutton's ex-girlfriend, played by Lumet's daughter, Jenny.  Q & A
seethes with suspense and reeks of impending doom as Hutton's investigation
takes him further and further in over his head.  The inexperienced D.A.
stumbles upon a gigantic white supremacist conspiracy in which Nolte is
only a minor player.
     Like DO THE RIGHT THING and MISSISSIPPI BURNING, Q & A is as apt to
stimulate your mind as it is to arouse your emotions.  Few films depict raw
racial hostility so openly or so potently.  The relationships between the
characters in Q & A are complex and uneasy, sometimes explosive; there's an
undercurrent of animosity which always threatens to bubble over.  Even the
two detectives who are assisting Hutton barely get along; one is black
(Charles Dutton) and the other Puerto Rican (Luis Guzman)--an ethnic
division which ignites conflict between them.  Q & A measures up admirably
against DO THE RIGHT THING and MISSISSIPPI BURNING.  The characters seem
more credible than those in Spike Lee's troubling film, and Lumet avoids
the sensationalism which tainted Alan Parker's controversial movie.
     Q & A never loosens its powerful stranglehold over you, thanks to
vital performances, which remain steady even when Lumet's script starts to
wobble.  Nolte, in particular, stands out, both literally and figuratively.
Nolte tends to play either loveable lunks (DOWN AND OUT IN BEVERLY HILLS)
or gruff ruffians (EXTREME PREJUDICE).  In Q & A, he is the epitome of
nastiness: vulgar, violent, bigoted, and as dirty as they come.  The
detective's twisted, racist values have sent him straight over the edge and
turned him into a monster.  At the same time, however, the corrupt cop has
a seductive charm about him.  Nolte is unrestrained in a truly riveting
performance.
     In the central role, Hutton also stands tall.  Every time I see
Hutton, he surprises me.  He looks light-weight, but he is actually a fine
dramatic actor.  Unlike Michael J. Fox, Hutton has dramatic conviction to
back up his soft, pretty-boy looks.  Hutton always gives you the feeling
that the wheels are turning behind his baby blue eyes.  He would have done
well with Fox's role in CASUALTIES OF WAR.
     The supporting actors in the film carry their weight and then some.
Assante, as the drug dealer looking to go straight, and Jenny Lumet, as
his wife, are to the human eye what magnets are to metal.  Fyvush Finkel
has minimal screen time, but he warrants mention for his two priceless
appearances as Preston Pearlstein, a low-life Jewish lawyer.
     Q & A is far from perfect.  The film has a hopelessly complicated
story line which expects you to keep track of just too many names.  You
often have to strain to keep up with all the twists and turns.
Furthermore, Lumet embeds these intriguing characters into a plot which is
all too familiar to anyone who regularly watched "Miami Vice."  You get
this nagging feeling that Crockett and Tubbs are going to show up at any
minute and save Hutton's butt.
     To his credit, however, Lumet doesn't offer any easy answers to the
problems he raises in the film, and unlike most screenwriters, he avoids a
conventional ending as if it were the plague.  Lumet clearly is not afraid
to leave plot strands dangling and loose ends hanging.  The movie may end,
but life goes on--and not with everyone living happily ever after.  Q & A
is a sophisticated drama from a filmmaker still very much in his prime.

Title
Review for Adventures in Babysitting (1987)
   ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING is mindless, formulaic, unsophisticated, and
disposable ... and I thoroughly enjoyed it.  We've seen the premise of the
movie before, most recently in FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF.  On a Friday
night, four suburban youngsters venture out into the unfamiliar city (in
this case, Chicago) and suffer through an exhausting series of
misadventures.  Elizabeth Shue plays a beautiful baby-sitter who is
responsible for looking after a little girl (who idolizes the superhero
Thor), her 15-year-old brother (who is smitten by Shue), and his wild
friend.
   ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING wants us to believe that during the course of
their escapades, these four youngsters come to better understand
themselves and each other.  By the end of the movie, they are supposed to
be wiser and more mature than they were at the beginning.  However, the
plot situations in ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING, as well as the relationships
between the characters and the lessons they learn, are altogether
unoriginal.  The movie does not balance its extreme fantasy with a strong
enough dose of reality.  The fantasy is amusing but sometimes so
exaggerated that first-time director Chris Columbus undermines his own
attempts to generate any real dramatic credibility; a case in point is the
scene in which the little girl gets stranded on a window ledge 40 stories
high.  And yet despite these considerations, ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING is
irresistibly entertaining, thanks to its charming cast and keen sense of
humor.
   As in the film STAND BY ME, the success of ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING
lies primarily on the shoulders of four young and unproven actors.  These
four newcomers appear in nearly every frame of the film, and consequently
the strength of their performances determines whether the movie floats or
sinks.  ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING not only floats, it sails.  The young
actors save the film from its limitations and make it a worthwhile
endeavor.
   Elizabeth Shue, as the reluctant baby-sitter, is a natural; her
performance is enchanting.  She is a joy to watch from beginning to end
and seems completely comfortable in front of the camera.  With a
mischievous twinkle in her eye, Maia Brewton is cute and convincing as the
Thor-loving little girl who likes to tease her brother, steal eclairs, and
sometimes even climb skyscrapers.  Keith Coogan plays the little girl's
15-year-old brother, Brad, a freshman with a big crush on Shue (a
senior).  Coogan gives his character a delightful balance of awkwardness,
embarrassment, bravado, and charm.  He is particularly effective in the
scenes that deal with his hopeless admiration and growing respect for
Shue.  Although Anthony Rapp's role as Brad's friend is less substantial,
he is appealing nevertheless.
   The movie's loosely-structured plot is merely an excuse to have these
characters come together and interact.  These four young newcomers have
such great chemistry that I grew quite fond of them, even in an uninspired
and cliche-ridden story.  In fact, by the end of the film, I felt as if I
had made four new friends.
   ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING has another thing going for it: a wonderful
sense of humor.  Several scenes in the film are exceptionally clever.  For
example, Shue and her three wards at one point find themselves singing the
blues in an all-black nightclub.  The sequence yields the movie's funniest
one-liner.
   Regrettably,  the movie fails to make a lasting impression.  The
characters don't learn anything new, unusual, or enlightening from their
adventures.  Unlike THE BREAKFAST CLUB, a superior film which successfully
combined comedy and drama, ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING has very little
dramatic intensity or lingering emotional impact.  Columbus introduces
several serious, underlying themes into the movie, but he never fully
develops them.  These shortcomings, however, do not significantly flaw
BABYSITTING because its dramatic aspirations are not as lofty as those of
a film like THE BREAKFAST CLUB.  In any case, ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING
does succeed in fulfilling its primary function, which is to provide
diverting, humorous, and (alas) forgettable summer entertainment.

Title
Review for Laserman, The (1990)
        THE LASERMAN: somehow the title of writer-director-producer Peter
Wang's film conjures up images of superheroes, like UltraMan and Spiderman.
You kind of expect an adventure flick about a crime fighter who can shoot
laser beams from his fingertips.  As it turns out, THE LASERMAN _is_ about
crime and about laser beams, but there aren't any superheroes.  Instead,
Wang's film is populated by a group of refreshingly off-beat characters
living in the ultimate cultural melting pot: New York City.  THE LASERMAN
is a comic brew which celebrates ethnicity, eccentricity, and electricity.
        The film tells the bizarre story of Arthur Weiss (Marc Hayashi), a
Chinese-American laser scientist whose life becomes incredibly hectic after
he accidentally kills his lab assistant in an experiment.  He loses his job
but finds work with a mysterious company which secretly plans to use laser
technology to commit dastardly deeds.  Arthur's professional life is
cluttered with moral dilemmas.  His personal life, on the other hand, is
cluttered with colorful friends and quirky relatives.  In fact, Arthur is
by far the blandest character in the film, despite a charismatic
performance by Hayashi (the San Francisco-based actor whose films include
CHAN IS MISSING and THE KARATE KID II).  It's the auxiliary characters who
give THE LASERMAN its unique spark.
        Arthur's not-so-typical Jewish mother, Ruth, for example, is
convinced that a Chinese Soul is trapped in her Jewish body.  She has dyed
her red hair black, she takes herbal medicine daily, and she is perpetually
cooking up strange delicacies, such as Matzo balls in soy sauce--the
ultimate fusion of Jewish and Chinese cuisine.  Veteran stage actress Joan
Copeland takes the part and runs with it, almost stealing the movie in the
process.  She plays Ruth as a driven woman, determined to overcome her
genetic heritage by immersing herself in Chinese culture.
        Arthur's girlfriend Janet (Maryann Urbano) is a kooky free-spirit
who would rather meditate than copulate; her ultimate goal is orgasm
through Zen meditation.  Arthur's best friend, Joey (Tony Leung), is a
small time thief who hustles everything from microwave ovens to machine
guns.  Joey is married to Arthur's Jewish sister, but he is also having an
affair with a Chinese immigrant who works in a whore house.  Arthur's
11-year-old son, Jimmy, played by the amazingly adorable David Chan,
is--horror of horrors--bad at math!  He finds it impossible to meet his
father's lofty expectations.
        The various people in Arthur's life come together to form a rich
tapestry of humanity.  Like Wang's earlier film, A GREAT WALL (about a San
Francisco family visiting relatives in China), THE LASERMAN revolves around
cultural differences.  Every character in the film is, in some way or
another, trying to find his identity--struggling to negotiate a balance
between his native culture and the American way.
        The movie also offers a provocative look at technology.  Wang
appears in the movie as Lieutenant Lu, a detective who is fed up with
machines, even though he relies on them to do his job.  The film views
technology with a wary eye, acknowledging its necessity while at the same
time realizing its potential dangers.  Wang raises the time-honored
question of whether scientists should be held responsible for their
inventions.  Was Einstein responsible for the A-bomb?  Is Arthur Weiss
responsible for his lasers?  The movie pits spirituality against
technology, man against machine, and the result is a draw.  According to
the film, technology has its place, but we must employ it with great
forethought and caution.
        Ironically, by its very nature, THE LASERMAN is a triumph of
technology--the technology of filmmaking.  Wang's direction is exquisite,
especially during the tense finale in which the director frantically
cross-cuts between the various subplots, perhaps in homage to D.W.
Griffith.   Cinematographer Ernest Dickerson, who has worked on all of
Spike Lee's films, gives THE LASERMAN a distinctive, artistic look.  Mason
Daring's score, which includes a send-up of Bach, is right on target.
        THE LASERMAN is an ambitious endeavor, which is to be applauded,
but it's sometimes ambitious to a fault.  Wang serves up so many slices of
life in the film that it's hard to digest them all.  For instance, one
character (Arthur's sister) has negligible screen time, and consequently we
just don't care about her marital problems.  In weaving his web, Wang has
included a few too many strands.
        Overall, however, THE LASERMAN is a charmingly eclectic concoction.
On the surface, the film is a light and bouncy comedy-thriller,
overflowing with whimsical humor and visual style.  The heavier issues
emerge only when you take a deeper look at the film.  You can ponder the
moral questions or you can just sit back and enjoy the absurdity of life in
China Town.

Title
Review for Erik the Viking (1989)
        As the opening credits rolled for ERIK THE VIKING, my worst fear
was that it would be as boring and charmless as THE ADVENTURES OF BARON
MUNCHAUSEN.  My highest hope was that ERIK THE VIKING would live up to the
lunacy of a Monty Python movie, since its director is Python alum Terry
Jones.  As the closing credits rolled, I was both relieved and frustrated:
ERIK THE VIKING is far more pleasant to sit through than MUNCHAUSEN, but as
Terry Jones puts it: "Anyone expecting a wacky Python movie all the way
through is going to be disappointed." (from the press release)
        Orion Studios, the American distributor for ERIK THE VIKING, dumped
the movie into theaters with very little publicity, and an advertising
campaign which was next to nil.  And probably for good reason--the studio
undoubtedly knew it had a loser on its hands, one which would appeal only
to a very limited audience: people (like myself) who are desperate for any
product even remotely related to "Monty Python's Flying Circus."
        ERIK THE VIKING is set during the Age of Ragnarok, a notorious
period in Norse mythology in which Fenrir the Wolf-God has swallowed the
sun and brought about a Great Winter.  Tim Robbins stars as Erik, a
reluctant Viking.  His peers are violent, wine-swilling barbarians.  Erik,
by contrast, is a gentle soul: raping and pillaging just aren't his style.
A pacifist in a brutal age of swords and battle axes, he would rather see
the Vikings channel their energy into something constructive.
        Erik's village lives in perpetual snow flurries, and--horror of
horrors--he has never seen the sun.  Erik decides to do something about
this depressing predicament by leading his fellow Vikings on a dangerous
expedition.  Their perilous journey involves a bunch of silliness about
traveling to Hy-Brasil to blow the "Horn Resounding" three times.  The
first blow will take Erik and company to the edge of the world, the second
will awaken the Gods, and the third will take them home.  It seems like a
lot of hard work just to see the sun.
        Terry Jones is essentially trying to combine THE HOLY GRAIL and
RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK.  The result, ERIK THE VIKING, is an awkward
hybrid.  The movie misses the boat as an adventure, but as a comedy, it
fares a bit better, at least managing to leave the harbor.
        The loosely-structured plot is really just a collection of
sketches.  About a third of them don't even try to be funny, a third of
them try and fail, and the remaining third are genuinely amusing.  One of
the best scenes involves Erik's futile efforts to come up with a successful
seating arrangement in the Viking rowboat.
        The funniest moments occur in Hy-Brasil, a peaceful kingdom
cheerfully ruled by Jones, who steals the show with his hammy performance.
It's great to see him on the screen again, acting with such relish.  These
scenes in Hy-Brasil almost fooled me into thinking I was watching a
bonafide Monty Python movie.
        Unfortunately, the film stumbles whenever it gets away from comedy.
Jones has more on his mind than producing laughs.  Monty Python movies
never made the mistake of taking themselves seriously--that was their
charm.  ERIK THE VIKING, on the other hand, often abandons comedy and puts
on a straight-face.  Jones actually attempts to infuse into the story line
a profound lesson about man's inhumanity.  I'm sorry, but a campy British
comedy is no place for preachy moralizing.  ERIK THE VIKING would have been
far more appealing as an irreverent, full-blown comedy--in other words, as
a Monty Python film.  This is but a pale imitation.
        Jones is working with a modest $15 million budget, which is one
reason the movie comes up short as an adventure.  The back drops are so
obviously painted they make you cringe.  The menacing sea dragon is one of
the worst effects I've seen this decade: you can hardly see it through all
the fog and what you can see is embarrassingly rubbery.  The poor effects
sometimes make the movie seem even more low-budget than it actually is.
Thankfully, the imagery improves as the picture progresses.  Some of the
effects towards the end are strikingly clever, like the Viking rowboat
perched on edge of a gigantic waterfall.
        Like the special effects, the performances in ERIK THE VIKING are
uneven.  Robbins is adequate as Eric, but the role really calls for someone
like the late Graham Chapman, who succeeded with a similar character in
LIFE OF BRIAN.  If you're interested in Robbins, you'd do well to check him
out in FIVE CORNERS or MISS FIRECRACKER.  ERIK THE VIKING is not the
actor's best work.
        If you're expecting John Cleese to save the day, forget it.
Cleese's role as the film's villain, Halfdan the Black, is nothing more
than a cameo appearance.  What a waste!  Mickey Rooney, on the other hand,
has a hilarious bit part as Erik's grandfather.  The shock value of seeing
Rooney decked out in Viking gear is good for a few laughs.
        For the most part, the supporting cast lives up to the challenge of
playing characters with names like Ivar the Boneless, Sven the Berserker,
and Ragnar the Maddeningly Calm.  Freddie Jones is delightful as the
befuddled, soft-spoken missionary who in 60 years has not converted even
one person to Christianity.  Erik's love-interest is played by Imogen
Stubbs, a blue-eyed beauty with scorching screen presence.  Fans of the
TV-series "Batman" should recognize Eartha Kitt, better known as the
Catwoman, in a small part as a wise, old sage.

Title
Review for When Harry Met Sally... (1989)
        Harry says "tomaytoe."  Sally says "tomahtoe."  Harry says men and
women can't be friends because sex inevitably gets in the way.  Sally says
nonsense!  And that in a nutshell is the premise of WHEN HARRY MET
SALLY..., starring Billy Crystal and Meg Ryan.  Director Rob Reiner has hit
pay dirt with WHEN HARRY MET SALLY...; the movie is a masterpiece, one of
the finest romantic comedies I have ever seen.  Like DEAD POETS SOCIETY,
it's the kind of movie that leaves you high and restores your faith in the
magic of motion pictures.
        Harry Burns and Sally Albright first meet in 1977 after graduating
from college.  They share a car from Chicago to New York and discover they
really don't like each other.  Their feelings haven't changed five years
later when they run into each other on a plane.  However, after another
five years have passed, Harry and Sally meet once again just as Harry's
wife has left him and Sally has broken up with her boyfriend.  This time
they click and a deep platonic relationship blossoms; they become best
friends.  The movie explores their tumultuous relationship as they
unwittingly fall in love.
        Reiner (SPINAL TAP, THE SURE THING, STAND BY ME) frames the story
within a series of recurring pseudo-documentary clips in which old,
long-married couples describe how they met and fell in love.  The people in
the clips are actors, but the stories they tell are real and range from the
absurd to the charming to the compelling.  The funniest husband and wife
talk simultaneously as they tell their love story.  Neither one will shut
up while the other is talking.  The documentary couples and their stories
provide timely commentary on the developments in Harry and Sally's
relationship.
        At the heart of WHEN HARRY MET SALLY..., crucial to its success,
are the exceptional performances by the two leads.  The biggest surprise is
Crystal, whose subtle performance looms head and shoulders above everything
else he has ever done.  For a change, Crystal makes his character much more
than a cardboard cut-out.  In the tradition of Woody Allen, Harry is
self-conscious and sees both the absurdity and tragedy in life.  His dark
side makes him pessimistic and cynical, but it also gives him a biting,
sarcastic sense of humor.  Crystal is extraordinarily adept at conveying
both the pathos and humor within Harry.
        Ryan, also delivering her finest performance to date, is equally
engaging as Sally, whose compulsive, structured personality tends to cut
her off from other people.  Like Harry, Sally is a full of quirks and
idiosyncrasies which make her seem genuine.  For instance, when ordering
from a menu, Sally drives waiters and waitresses crazy with her detailed
instructions about how her food should be prepared.
        Both of these characters are complicated, confused, and also
irresistibly appealing.  Their authenticity is refreshing, their motives
and behavior thought provoking, enough so to inspire inner reflections of
our own.  Watching Harry and Sally grow and mature and their relationship
develop is fascinating and moving.
        WHEN HARRY MET SALLY... is the consummate mix of humor, romance,
and human nature.  The movie is more than the sum of its parts--a true
collaborative effort.  Everyone involved in the film is in top form,
including Carrie Fisher in a supporting role as Sally's best friend.  You
know a movie is great when even Fisher delivers a good performance.  Bruno
Kirby, who plays Harry's best friend, also deserves mention for bringing
depth to his small role.
        Reiner's direction is authoritative and imaginative yet
unobtrusive.  He breathes new life into the technique of splitting the
screen in half during phone conversations; he takes it even one step
further and splits the screen into thirds in one ingenious scene.  The
story of Harry and Sally's relationship spans 11 years, and Reiner uses the
documentary clips to punctuate each chapter of their friendship.  The
passage of time in the film is unusually smooth and fluid.
        The screenplay by Nora Ephron (SILKWOOD, HEARTBURN) is wonderfully
clever.  Her dialogue is witty and frank; the characters talk and behave
like real people.  One small, seemingly insignificant bit of dialogue is to
me indicative of the film's greatness.  Sally starts to tell Harry, "All my
married friends with children say that..." but then she corrects herself,
"Actually, my one friend who has children tells me that..."  We all censor
and edit ourselves in every day conversation, but how many times do you see
a character do it in a movie?  In my mind, this one tiny moment reflects
just how closely the film has captured the human condition.
        Production designer Jane Musky has taken advantage of New York's
picturesque scenery (the browns and reds of autumn, the snowy white of
Christmas) to help Reiner capture the city's beauty.  The movie's
romanticized version of New York is refreshing after the disturbing
depictions we have seen recently in DO THE RIGHT THING, GHOSTBUSTERS II,
and even BATMAN.  The soundtrack of classic jazz standards--featuring Ella
Fitzgerald, Louis Armstrong, and Harry Connick, Jr.--always evokes just the
right mood.
        WHEN HARRY MET SALLY...  is so true to life that it cuts almost too
close to the bone as it shifts effortlessly between uproarious comedy and
poignant drama.  In exploring the possibility for platonic friendship
between men and women, Reiner has hit a nerve.  He has shed light on those
fundamental similarities and differences that unite and divide the sexes.
In case you're wondering, I haven't offered any criticisms of the film
because I don't have any.

Title
Review for Hunt for Red October, The (1990)
        If you're the type of person who goes on the submarine ride every
time you visit Disneyland, you're going to love THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.
You'll also love the film if you enjoy cat and mouse military tactics, or
if you're a Sean Connery or Alec Baldwin fan, or if you admired director
John McTiernan's earlier films, DIE HARD and PREDATOR.  In fact, the only
people likely to be disappointed with THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER are those
who have read the book, since films almost never live up to the novels
which inspired them.
        THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER is an epic thriller, adapted from Tom
Clancy's best selling novel.  Set in an era before Glasnost, the movie
revolves around a top-secret Soviet submarine, called the Red October.  The
nuclear sub has a revolutionary propulsion system, which makes the vessel
silent and allows it to escape sonar detection.  The Red October embarks on
its maiden voyage under the command of Captain Marko Ramius, played by Sean
Connery.  Ramius has strict orders just to test the submarine, but he has
other ideas.  He takes the sub and its crew and disappears into the
Atlantic Ocean.  Is he planning to start World War III?  CIA Analyst Jack
Ryan doesn't think so; he's convinced that Ramius plans to defect to the
U.S.  Ryan, played by Alec Baldwin, is given three days to prove his theory
and find the missing sub.
        The characters in THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER are paper thin, but the
performances, thankfully, are rock solid.  Baldwin and Connery anchor the
film with their customary vigor.  Sam Neil gives a sturdy performance as
Connery's somber first officer.  It's ironic to see Neil and Connery
playing Russians, since they are both best known for their roles as British
agents, Connery as James Bond and Neil as Reilly, "Ace of Spies."  The
large cast also includes Scott Glenn, James Earl Jones, Tim Curry, and Joss
Ackland, plus Richard Jordan as the smooth U.S. national security adviser.
        The special effects are remarkable, but more than anything, THE
HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER is distinguished by its water-tight plot.
Screenwriters Larry Ferguson and Donald Stewart have gracefully navigated
RED OCTOBER through a story line full of twists and turns.  They keep us
involved in the action by unveiling plot strands at just the right moment.
        The movie doesn't get as sweaty or breathless as DIE HARD, because
it would rather tell a good story than hit you over the head with non-stop
action.  The finale is rousing and suspenseful, but essentially, THE HUNT
FOR RED OCTOBER is a superior potboiler.

Title
Review for Package, The (1989)
        As I watched THE PACKAGE slowly unfold, I kept waiting for the
twist.  Well, now it's a week later, and I'm still waiting.  THE PACKAGE
never delivered the goods.
        The movie involves a conspiracy to sabotage Soviet-American peace
talks aimed at ending the arms race.  Gene Hackman stars as Sergeant
Gallagher, an everyday Joe who unwittingly becomes a pawn in the elaborate
scheme.  He gets caught up in a deadly game of cat and mouse in which he
must always stay one step ahead of the villains in order to foil the
conspiracy and clear his name.
        For a film that contains so many layers of deception and intrigue,
THE PACKAGE sure is boring, not to mention convoluted and confusing.  The
problem with this yawner is that it has no fun at all with its premise.
The movie could have had the decency to offer us some character psychology
or stylish direction, anything to compensate for its stale story line.
        The characters in THE PACKAGE play second fiddle to the plot, which
is backwards; plot should always serve character.  Hackman excels at
playing all kinds of roles, but he is usually at his best playing simple,
down-to-earth types.  The role of Sergeant Gallagher should have been right
up Hackman's alley, but the screenplay gives him little, if any, freedom to
embellish the character with subtle nuances.  The role forces him to merely
go through the motions.  Hackman is just too talented to be wasting his
time on such a non-character.  The cast also includes Joanna Cassidy and
Dennis Franz as Gallagher's allies and Tommy Lee Jones and the always
contemptible John Heard as his enemies.  The only stand-out is Jones, who
plays a wickedly devious assassin.
        In all fairness, THE PACKAGE isn't quite as bleak as I've made it
out to be.  The movie is a thriller, and it does have its thrills.  The
well-crafted middle section is extremely taut and tense; you can feel
danger in the air.  You even feel a little fearful for the characters.  But
by the end, the plot has careened so far out of control, that a "who cares?
... let's get this over with!" attitude prevails.  The movie's ludicrous,
overblown climax is the final straw: as Hackman urgently races against time
to save the day, he comes across nearly every car chase cliche in the book.
He gets delayed not only by a crossing train, but also by an
eighteen-wheeler and a rising draw bridge.  Personally, I'd rather see THE
MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE again.

Title
Review for Child's Play (1988)
        Every little kid dreams of having a doll that can walk, talk, and
play with him.  For Andy, the 6-year-old protagonist of the thriller
CHILD'S PLAY, this dream becomes a horrifying reality when his doll,
Chucky, not only comes to life, but also goes on a grisly murder spree.
        CHILD'S PLAY opens in a toy store with a dying serial killer
transferring his soul, via voodoo, into an innocent-looking doll.  A
struggling single mother, played by Catherine Hicks (who was the marine
biologist in STAR TREK IV), buys the possessed doll as a birthday present
for her son, Andy.  Much to his delight, Andy discovers that his new doll,
which he names Chucky, is alive; he can walk, talk, play, and much much
more.
        Trouble starts to brew when Chucky (possessed by the serial
killer's spirit) starts to murder people, and the police suspect that Andy
is responsible for the crimes.  No one will believe Andy, who claims that
his doll Chucky is the real culprit--that is, until Andy's mother discovers
that the doll has been operating without any batteries in it.  But before
she can dispose of Chucky he escapes, and in the remainder of the film,
Hicks and a detective, played by Chris Sarandon, team up to find and
destroy the doll.
        CHILD'S PLAY is fun, campy, not too gory, and at times genuinely
suspenseful.  Several tense sequences in the movie raised the hair on my
back, including the one in which Sarandon, trapped in his overturned car,
must fend off Chucky's attempts to kill him.  Thanks to convincing special
effects, the movie passes its most important test: the mobile and murderous
doll is believable and quite frightening.  Chucky's demented gaze and
sinister smile are haunting and will make you think twice the next time you
see a cabbage patch kid.  I was also impressed by Alex Vincent's
performance as Andy, the cute and gutsy little boy who must overcome his
mother's and the police's skepticism about Chucky's true nature.
        Although I enjoyed the humor, suspense, and premise of CHILD'S
PLAY, the film's lack of originality bothered me.  The gimmick of a doll
coming to life is reminiscent of 1978's MAGIC, which was about a
ventriloquist's homicidal dummy.  Furthermore, Chucky's knife-wielding
antics really aren't all that different from those of Jason in the FRIDAY
THE 13TH series.  My biggest problem with CHILD'S PLAY is its ending which,
although effective, seems lifted directly from THE TERMINATOR.
        Despite these problems, CHILD'S PLAY is certainly above average as
far as horror movies go, and if you're looking for some campy humor and
good suspense, then the movie is worth checking out.

Title
Review for Die Hard 2 (1990)
        DIE HARD 2 is an altogether unfortunate fiasco, inferior to the
original in every respect.  Place the blame squarely on the shoulders of
Steven de Souza and Doug Richardson, who wrote the film's pathetic
screenplay.  Every line of dialogue reeks of either smarmy sap or forced
humor.  The plot is altogether implausible; the convoluted story line
involves a band of terrorists who take over Dulles Airport and shut down
the control tower, leaving a dozen planes stranded in the air waiting to
land.  The film has zero credibility, and all of the characters come off as
cliched, cardboard cut-outs.
        So much for the script.  How about the action?  Well, let's put it
this way: director Renny Harlin could learn a few things from John
McTiernan, who directed the original, as well as THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER
and PREDATOR--all standouts for their hair-raising suspense.  By contrast,
Harlin doesn't have a clue when it comes to choreographing action, and
consequently, DIE HARD 2 never picks up steam.
        DIE HARDER is impossible to take seriously even for a minute.  In
fact, the movie often seems deliberately campy, and it almost reaches the
threshold of being so bad it's good.  You do laugh, but you laugh at the
film, not with it.  DIE HARD 2 should have never been cleared for takeoff.

Title
Review for Getting It Right (1989)
        GETTING IT RIGHT is a far far cry from the teenage sex comedy you
might expect from a summer movie about male virginity.  The film was
directed by Randal Kleiser, who brought us such bubble-gum classics as
GREASE and THE BLUE LAGOON.  But thanks to Kleiser's surprisingly good
direction and an intelligent script, GETTING IT RIGHT is a pleasantly
quiet, moving, and memorable film--one geared strictly toward a
sophisticated, adult audience.
        GETTING IT RIGHT stars Jesse Birdsall (Emily Lloyd's boyfriend in
WISH YOU WERE HERE) as Gavin, a painfully shy 31-year-old hairdresser who
lives at home with his parents and who--gasp--is still a virgin.  Gavin has
no problem whatsoever making small talk with the elderly women who clamor
for his services at the hair salon, but expose him to a single 30-year-old
beauty and he's a mess.  Much to Gavin's surprise, the woman who finally
brings him out of his shell and robs him of his virginity is Joan (Lynn
Redgrave), a rich, married, and lonely 45-year-old.  GETTING IT RIGHT is
the simple story of Gavin's awkward and haphazard efforts to get it right;
that is, to find the right woman to fulfill his life.
        GETTING IT RIGHT is one of those rare movies that devotes itself
entirely to in-depth character development.  Gavin's self-conscious
voice-over narration of his experiences firmly thrusts us into his psyche.
We observe his fascinating metamorphosis from shy and passive introversion
to assertive and self-confident maturity.  Birdsall's superb, understated
performance as Gavin is the real backbone of the film; he seems convincing
and authentic throughout.
        The charm of GETTING IT RIGHT also lies in the wide array of people
who inhabit or invade Gavin's life.  Despite her limited screen time,
Redgrave makes quite a splash in the movie as Gavin's middle-aged seducer.
For a supporting character, Joan is unusually and impressively complex,
thanks in large part to Redgrave's magnificent performance.  Gavin is also
pursued, or perhaps plagued, by Minnie, the totally neurotic daughter of a
rich aristocrat.  After Minnie and Gavin meet at a party, she takes great
pleasure in disrupting his safe and simple life.  Helena Bonham Carter is
delightfully pathetic and kooky in the role, and Sir John Gielgud, with his
tongue in his cheek, embodies the height of arrogance as her father.
Gavin's eventual love-interest is Jenny, the adorable twenty-year-old
single mother who assists him at the beauty salon; London stage actress
Jane Horrocks' fine performance yields a touchingly sweet character.  Peter
Cook, the great British satirist, appears briefly in the film as Gavin's
uptight employer.
        The scenes of Gavin's home life with his parents are also a treat.
Gavin's over-protective mother (Pat Heywood), whom even Woody Allen would
find overbearing, almost steals the movie.  Her life seems limited to just
two activities: treating Gavin like a 10-year-old and preparing exotic but
inedible meals, such as scalding hot curry and baked chicken with chocolate
sauce.  Gavin and his father's attempts to avoid eating her meals are
extremely amusing.
        GETTING IT RIGHT, for the most part, is very well-crafted, except
for two minor shortcomings.  First, the movie is about 15 minutes too long,
and consequently it loses momentum at times.  Second, the film includes an
altogether extraneous subplot about the domestic problems between Gavin's
best friend, Harry, and his unfaithful lover, Winthrop.  Overall, however,
GETTING IT RIGHT is quite memorable for its humor, depth, sophistication,
and outstanding acting.  Director Kleiser and screenwriter Elizabeth Jane
Howard (adapting her own highly acclaimed novel) deserve praise for finding
just the right tone for this tale of growth, maturation, and
self-discovery.

Title
Review for Revenge (1990)
     In several respects, the Kevin Costner movie REVENGE is like his
earlier film NO WAY OUT: each movie is about a military man having an
affair with the wrong woman at the wrong time.  In both films, Costner
finds himself in over his head, tip toeing through a delicate situation.
Both films are charged with sexual energy.  However, there is a key
difference between REVENGE and NO WAY OUT: NO WAY OUT didn't fall apart
until its disappointing conclusion.  REVENGE, on the other hand, starts to
capsize immediately.
     REVENGE tries to pack the emotional wallop of a BODY HEAT or FATAL
ATTRACTION, but the routine story line prevents the film from delivering a
knock-out blow.  Costner plays Jay Cochran, a recently retired navy pilot
who drives down to Puerta Vallarta to visit his friend Tiburon Mendez, a
powerful Mexican millionaire played by Anthony Quinn.  Cochran is
immediately drawn to Mendez's stunningly beautiful wife, Miryea (Madeleine
Stowe), and he finds himself torn between his passion for her and his
loyalty to a longtime friend.  As the title suggests, REVENGE chronicles
the violent repercussions of the inevitable affair.
     REVENGE is a sinking vessel, but it's buoyed by its magnetic crew.
As usual, Costner has that earnest, boy-next-door quality that made him so
appealing in FIELD OF DREAMS.  He seems like someone you'd want your sister
to marry, which makes it hard to buy him as a cold-blooded killer in the
second half of the film.  As Miryea, Stowe exudes a tantalizing aura of
mystery, vulnerability, and raw sex appeal.  Quinn has the thankless task
of playing a rather standard tyrant who's violent, ruthless, and
unforgiving.  Quinn's dynamic presence, however, makes the familiar role
more distinctive than it might have been in someone else's hands.
     The first half of REVENGE is moderately successful.  As Costner and
Stowe fall in love, the film crackles with erotic tension.  The most
sensuous scene has Costner trying to make lemonade as Stowe does her best
to seduce him.  The image of Costner nervously trying to slice lemons is
far more memorable than any of the steamy sex scenes.  The second half of
the film, unfortunately, is unpleasantly brutal and bloody.  To add insult
to injury, REVENGE has a "so what?" quality about it.  Aside from the
gorgeous Mexican scenery, the film is unexceptional.  It plods along
predictably until the pull-out-the-kleenex conclusion.
     Worst of all: the plot depends on the lovers' making really dumb
mistakes.  Costner and Stowe are unbelievably naive when it comes to hiding
their affair, and the screenwriters are unbelievably naive to think that
we'll accept such stupid characters.  If the lovers had any common sense or
discretion, then the plot would crumble, making all the revenge nonsense
unnecessary.  But because the characters are idiots, they have no way out.

Title
Review for Opportunity Knocks (1990/I)
        In OPPORTUNITY KNOCKS, Dana Carvey takes a stale story line and
turns it into an entertaining vehicle for his comic charm.  The movie
relies on the oldest comedy gimmick in the book: the case of mistaken
identity.  Carvey plays a low-life con man who is mistaken for a wealthy,
Harvard-educated business wizard.  It's the perfect opportunity for a major
con.  He suckers manufacturing tycoon Robert Loggia into giving him a job.
He suckers gorgeous Julia Campbell into falling in love with him.  His con
is so good he even suckers himself.  Carvey forgets that he's really a
no-good bum only PRETENDING to be a suave, sophisticated yuppie.
        OPPORTUNITY KNOCKS is altogether cliched and implausible.  But that
doesn't stop the appealing cast from pulling the movie out of the gutter by
its bootstraps.  The film is a showcase for Carvey's comic genius.  It
allows him to be wild and goofy and to do impressions, everyone from George
Bush to a gas company inspector.  Carvey is so endearing and has so much
boyish charm that it's impossible not to root for him during his charades.
        Loggia is as charismatic as ever as the CEO of a company which
markets blow-dryers for public rest rooms.  He hopes that Carvey can revive
the company's sagging sales.  Campbell makes an impressive film debut as
Carvey's love-interest, Loggia's fiercely independent and intellectual
daughter.  Milo O'Shea is in fine form as Carvey's uncle and mentor, a
retired con man.
        In fact, all of the characters and actors in the film are
captivating, with only two notable exceptions.  Todd Graff has the
thankless task of playing Carvey's dumb sidekick, an annoying character who
is totally irrelevant to the story.  James Tolkan, playing a generic
gangster, is part of a distracting subplot involving the mafia.
        OPPORTUNITY KNOCKS falls far short of director Donald Petrie's
previous film, the wonderful sleeper MYSTIC PIZZA.  The difference, not
surprisingly, lies in the writing.  Alfred Uhry's screenplay for PIZZA was
subtle and profound.  Mitchel Katlin and Nat Bernstein lack Uhry's grace;
their screenplay for OPPORTUNITY KNOCKS is sloppy and forced, almost
haphazard.  Thankfully, Carvey is around to turn straw into gold.

Title
Review for Gremlins 2: The New Batch (1990)
        GREMLINS 2: THE NEW BATCH is a noisy, unoriginal, and altogether
unnecessary sequel.  The film tries to fashion itself as an AIRPLANE-style,
no-holds-barred parody.  And to be honest, some of the movie's satire is
surprisingly amusing.  The problem is that the laughs in GREMLINS 2 aren't
consistent enough and don't come often enough to keep the film moving.
About every five or ten minutes, GREMLINS 2 comes up with a clever gag, but
in between you have to suffer through some awfully chaotic and deadly dull
sequences, as the gruesome gremlins belch, bang, and brawl their way
through the movie.
        GREMLINS 2 reunites Zach Galligan and Phoebe Cates, the
protagonists from the original movie.  Galligan is adequate in the lead
role, but Cates proves beyond a shadow of a doubt that her acting lessons
were a terrible waste of time and money.  The sequel also features
Christopher Lee (as a mad genetic scientist), Gedde Watanabe (as a
camera-happy tourist) and John Glover, who gives a savory comic performance
as Daniel Clamp, a wealthy entrepreneur who is the epitome of egotism and a
wonderful take-off on Donald Trump and Ted Turner.  The movie also has fun
with cameos by wrestler Hulk Hogan, film critic Leonard Maltin and director
Paul Bartel.
        In case you care, the plot this time around has the mischievous
little buggers wreaking havoc on Clamp Centre, an automated, ultra-modern,
high-rise office building in Manhattan.  Come to think of it, the movie
could have killed two birds with one stone if it had brought in Bruce
Willis to thwart the monster-terrorists.  Imagine, "Die Hard 2: The Next
Batch."  Now, THAT'S high concept.

Title
Review for UHF (1989)
        It's not often that I laugh so hard at a movie that my head hurts.
But that's just what happened to me at UHF, Weird Al Yankovic's big screen
debut.  UHF is a television parody a la AIRPLANE, and like AIRPLANE, the
movie is extraordinarily stupid.  But it's dumb in the best way a movie can
be dumb: it's so silly and outrageous it's hilarious.
        The movie stars Weird Al as George Newman, a world class nerd with
a hyperactive imagination, the type who fantasizes he's Indiana Jones and
who uses Hostess Twinkies as hot dog buns.  George is basically a loser;
his daydreams and smart-alec attitude perpetually prevent him from holding
onto a job for more than two weeks.  But George finally gets a chance to
funnel his creativity into something productive when his uncle wins Channel
62 in a poker game and makes him the General Manager of the struggling UHF
television station.
        George revives channel 62 with innovative programming: shows like
"Wheel of Fish" and movies like "Conan, the Librarian."  As the station's
ratings rise, it comes into competition with Channel 8, the leading VHF
network-affiliate.  As R.J. Fletcher--Channel 8's ill-natured, hard-nosed
owner--veteran stage and film actor Kevin McCarthy is flamboyantly sleazy;
he really hams it up with his snorts, grimaces, and scowls.
        UHF satirizes anything and everything to do with television,
including game shows, tabloid talk shows, children's shows, dizzy news
women, and movies--everything from RAMBO to CLOSE ENCOUNTERS.  The funniest
scene, the one that made my head spin, is a commercial for spatulas which
has to be seen to be believed.
        Like most movies in its genre, UHF is hit or miss.  For every gag
that works, at least one fizzles.  For instance, Weird Al's mock video of
"Money For Nothing" by Dire Straits is only mildly amusing and brings the
film to a grinding halt (although it does have some nifty computer
animation).  But the funniest bits in UHF are so hysterical that we can
forgive the ones that fail; we know another gut wrencher is on the way.
        In fact, UHF hits the mark often enough to make it the most
effective AIRPLANE-type movie since ... well, since AIRPLANE.  Much of the
credit goes to Weird Al's exceptionally inventive script and to the movie's
winsome cast.  Weird Al seems a little stiff at the beginning, but because
he's not afraid to look silly, he ultimately has a lot of fun with his
character.
        The real standout is Michael Richards as Stanley, the dim-witted
janitor who becomes the host of his own children's show: "Stanley
Spadowski's Playhouse."  Stanley's off-beat, mixed-up personality is a big
hit with the audience and makes him an over-night star.  He is an endearing
mixture of good-natured innocence, high-energy enthusiasm, and puppy-dog
cuteness.  And above all, he's a good janitor who adores his work.  Another
highlight is a vintage cameo by the incomparable Emo Philips.
        The cast also features Gedde Watanabe (the Chinese foreign-exchange
student in SIXTEEN CANDLES) as the Karate master who hosts the hit series,
"Wheel of Fish."  Also aboard for the ride is Fran Drescher, who plays
Pamela Finklestein, Channel 62's roving reporter.  Unfortunately, as Weird
Al's girlfriend, Victoria Jackson is wasted in a role that calls for
nothing but whimpering, whining, and sulking.  Her character is extraneous
and should have been either further integrated into the story or cut from
the script altogether.
        While UHF is not an absolute must-see, it's definitely the ticket
if you're looking for a wild and zany, whacked-out comedy.  The movie is
good enough to see in the theaters, but it may work even better on
television, the very medium at which it pokes fun.

Title
Review for Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade (1989)
        With INDIANA JONES AND THE LAST CRUSADE, Steven Spielberg and
George Lucas have finally fulfilled an informal agreement they made in 1979
to make a trilogy of movies about an adventurous archaeologist modelled in
part after James Bond.  In this alleged final installment of the series,
Professor "Indiana" Jones embarks on a quest for the Holy Grail, an
endeavor that takes him from the United States to Venice, Austria, Berlin,
and the Middle East.  During his adventures, Indy must contend with Nazis,
religious fanatics, rats, a femme fatale, and perhaps most challenging of
all, his father.
        THE LAST CRUSADE begins with an extended flash-back to 1912.  River
Phoenix, doing his best Harrison Ford impersonation, plays Indiana Jones as
a teen in a humorous sequence that establishes the hallmarks of the
character: his fear of snakes, his hat, his whip, his scar, and his love of
adventure.  Then the film shifts to 1938 with Harrison Ford once again
reprising his most famous role.  Actually, THE LAST CRUSADE contains quite
a few familiar faces as LOST ARK alumni Denholm Elliott (as Marcus Brody,
the curator who once got lost in his own museum) and John Rhys-Davies (as
Indy's faithful ally, Sallah) both have returned for Indiana's last
adventure.  The cast also includes Alison Doody as the requisite
love-interest, an Austrian art historian who has nothing in mind but her
own self-interests.
        In many ways, THE LAST CRUSADE is the antithesis of INDIANA JONES
AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM.  In fact, Steven Spielberg claims that he made THE
LAST CRUSADE to apologize for the gloomy, gruesome violence in TEMPLE OF
DOOM.  Where DOOM showed excess, CRUSADE shows surprising restraint;
Spielberg has toned down the violence considerably.  Where DOOM was dark
and mean-spirited, CRUSADE is light-hearted and good-natured.  Spielberg
and company play this one for tongue-in-cheek laughs.  Whereas the
relentless, non-stop action in TEMPLE OF DOOM completely overshadowed and
overwhelmed the characters, the action in LAST CRUSADE takes a back seat to
character development.
        The first third of THE LAST CRUSADE is untypically slow, but the
pace immediately picks up the moment Sean Connery hits the screen.  Connery
is brilliantly cast as Indy's father, Dr. Henry Jones, a professor of
Medieval Literature who has devoted his entire life to locating the Holy
Grail at the expense of estranging himself from his son.  Playing against
type in a tour de force performance, Connery is hilarious.  A far cry from
his days as 007, he's bookish and blundering--making him totally ill-suited
to his son's dangerous lifestyle.  Connery's welcome presence on screen
keeps THE LAST CRUSADE from being just a retread of the first two films.
Connery always seems to inject life into his movies, whether they are good
(THE UNTOUCHABLES) or mediocre (THE PRESIDIO), and THE LAST CRUSADE is no
exception.
        The heart of the movie, making it special, IS the father-son
relationship between Connery and Ford, who play off each other well and
build an amusing rapport.  The movie is at its best when Indy and his
father bicker and nag at each other, especially during their attempts to
foil the Nazis.  The friction between the Jones boys runs especially high
whenever Henry Jones infuriates his son by calling him "Junior."  When he's
around his father, Indy often feels intimidated and defensive, and Harrison
Ford effectively portrays these emotions.  THE LAST CRUSADE is the first
film in the series to grant Ford an opportunity to give Indiana some depth
and humanity.  Eventually, of course, the two men overcome their
estrangement to forge a relationship of warmth, tenderness, and mutual
respect.
        When it comes to action, THE LAST CRUSADE falls short in comparison
to its predecessors.  Although the movie is well-paced, not one of its
action sequences is memorable or terribly original, and the film never
really got my adrenaline pumping.  THE LAST CRUSADE is fun and exciting,
but it's not dazzling or awe-inspiring.  In my mind, nearly every action
sequence in RAIDERS is a classic, and although TEMPLE OF DOOM goes
overboard, the film is undeniably tense and hair-raising.  By contrast,
CRUSADE is too tame and fails to distinguish itself from imitators of the
series, such as ROMANCING THE STONE.
        The plot is also disappointing.  Except for substituting the Grail
for the Ark, the movie is just a regurgitation of the RAIDERS story line,
with Indy once again racing against the Nazis to unearth a powerful
religious artifact.  And unfortunately, THE LAST CRUSADE is the only film
of the trilogy without any lasting impact.  Whereas RAIDERS left us stunned
and awe-struck and DOOM left us disturbed and exhausted, CRUSADE is
memorable mostly for Sean Connery's performance.  The movie also suffers
from being the third in the series; it faces higher audience expectations
and must labor harder to achieve originality and to avoid repetition.
        But perhaps it's unfair to draw so many comparisons between THE
LAST CRUSADE and its predecessors.  While it may not be a classic, THE LAST
CRUSADE is certainly an appealing crowd-pleaser that never fails to provide
old fashioned, larger than life entertainment.  And while I was somewhat
disappointed, I have to admit that I haven't had so much fun being
disappointed since INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM.  I'll definitely
miss Professor Jones and his wild escapades, but I have to admire his good
judgement in knowing when to hang up his hat ... and his whip, for that
matter.

Title
Review for Relentless (1989)
     The newspaper add for RELENTLESS read: "Killers aren't born.
They're made."  Likewise, lousy movies aren't born; they're made--and
director William Lustig has made one.
     In a sense, RELENTLESS is only half bad--the half with Judd Nelson
portraying Buck Taylor, a homicidal maniac who's murdering people selected
at random from the phone book..  Screenwriter Jack Robinson seems to think
he can throw in some flashbacks of Buck's childhood and call it character
psychology; I call it superficial B.S.  We're supposed to sympathize with
Buck because his authoritarian father made him fire guns at age five.  But
as soon as he starts committing the gruesome murders, any sympathy we had
for him immediately flies right out the window.  Buck is despondent because
the police academy has rejected him on the grounds that he's
"psychologically unfit."  Call me an optimist, but there must be a
healthier way to cope with rejection than by killing people.
     According to the production notes, Nelson prepared for the role by
reading books about serial killings.  I would have guessed he prepared by
watching NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD 500 times because all he does in the role
is walk around like a zombie, complete with bags under his eyes and greasy,
disheveled hair.  As a psychological character study, RELENTLESS is about
as fresh and satisfying as moldy bread.
     As a buddy-buddy comedy, on the other hand, RELENTLESS has more to
offer.  The movie is nearly saved by the humorous repartee between Robert
Loggia and Leo Rossi who play the investigating homicide detectives.  Rossi
is an earnest ex-New York patrolman who has been promoted to detective in
L.A.  His new partner, Loggia, is a seasoned veteran preparing to retire.
RELENTLESS has fun with the clash between Rossi's anxious, New York
personality and Loggia's laid back California life-style.  Loggia seems
indifferent to the murder victims, showing more interest in the real estate
value of their condos.  Rossi, on the other hand, is almost too eager to
collect clues; he thinks he's Sherlock Holmes.  To a certain extent, the
movie makes up for its cliched story line with its satirical depiction of
the L.A.P.D.  The clever one-liners sprinkled throughout the film keep the
mood from becoming too somber.
     Ultimately, RELENTLESS is done in by its utter predictability.  At
the climax, for example, Buck Taylor threatens to kill Rossi's family; now
where have you seen that before?  RELENTLESS shows few, if any, signs of
imagination or creativity, but that shouldn't stop you from catching it on
cable some night while you're eating last week's leftovers.

Title
Review for Burglar (1987)
        BURGLAR, as a whole, is boring, confusing, incoherent, and not
particularly funny.  However, two fine comic performances almost salvage
the film and make it somewhat worthwhile.  Whoopi Goldberg is perfectly
cast as a cat burglar whose masculine behavior challenges traditional
sex-role stereotypes.  The film makes good use of Goldberg's talent for
drifting in and out of a wide range of characters.  Goldberg's multiple
personalities provide about half the fun and humor in BURGLAR; the Bobcat
provides the other half.
        Comedian Bob "Bobcat" Goldthwait almost steals the movie with his
hilarious performance.  In his largest film role to date, Goldthwait plays
Goldberg's best friend, a poodle hairdresser.  Goldthwait successfully
incorporates material from his stand-up act into the film.  Nearly every
one of Goldthwait's scenes evokes laughter, which is quite a feat since the
laughs in BURGLAR are few and far between.  Goldthwait's performance is
more restrained than usual, making BURGLAR his best work to date.  Lesley
Ann Warren also stands out as the yuppie dentist who hires Goldberg to
commit a burglary.
        Unfortunately, these amusing performances are BURGLAR's only merit.
The movie's plot is uninspired and muddled, leaving the viewer confused
and ignorant of the mystery's solution.  Goldberg's character, after an
hour of detective work, figures everything out, but she and the film fail
(or forget) to enlighten the audience about her conclusions.
        Perhaps BURGLAR's main problem is its ineffective mixture of
suspense and comedy.  Many films, such as BEVERLY HILLS COP, have
successfully assimilated comedy and action into one package.  BURGLAR, on
the other hand, fails to do so and consequently suffers from a lack of
direction.  The movie would have been more appealing had it committed
itself exclusively to comedy or to suspense.  Given the cast, comedy would
seem to have been the appropriate path to follow.
        Goldberg, Goldthwait, and Warren succeed in giving BURGLAR  a few
genuinely funny moments, but the laughs are just too infrequent to give the
movie any significant momentum.  With a stronger sense of direction
(towards comedy), BURGLAR could have been thoroughly entertaining, but as
is, one's appreciation for the film is limited to the cast's noble efforts
to salvage it.

Title
Review for Star Trek V: The Final Frontier (1989)
        Before I say anything about STAR TREK V, you should know that "Star
Trek" is my favorite TV series and that I love the Star Trek movies,
especially THE WRATH OF KHAN and THE VOYAGE HOME.  So with that in mind
perhaps you can appreciate just how much it pains my heart to report that
STAR TREK V: THE FINAL FRONTIER sucks Dilithium crystals!  THE FINAL
FRONTIER is not only a shockingly poor follow-up to the enormous critical
and popular success of STAR TREK IV, it's also the worst film of the
series.
        As part five begins, the Enterprise is docked for repairs, and its
beloved crew is vacationing in Yosemite, no doubt recovering from their
adventures in the previous film.  But the camping trip abruptly comes to an
end when Star Fleet orders Captain Kirk and company to Paradise City on
Nimbus III, a planet in the neutral zone where a renegade Vulcan has taken
hostages.  Laurence Luckinbill plays Sybok, a Vulcan outcast who has
forsaken logic in favor of base emotions and instincts.  He possesses a
mysterious, spiritual power to relieve people of their emotional anguish,
and he uses this power to assemble a devoted following of worshippers.
With their help, he high-jacks the Enterprise.  Sybok intends to use the
starship to reach Sha Ka Ri, a mythical planet at the center of the galaxy
(beyond the Great Barrier) where no man has gone before.  There he expects
to find enlightenment from God almighty himself.
        During THE FINAL FRONTIER, we learn something new about Captain
Kirk, a.k.a. William Shatner; while his command of a Federation starship is
indeed impressive, he's not so adept at writing and directing movies.
Shatner's hackneyed story and heavy-handed direction make the film far too
self-serious and pretentious.  THE FINAL FRONTIER is as subtle as a sledge
hammer; it hits us over the head with its melodramatic plot and syrupy,
overbearing score.  The movie captures neither the good-natured,
light-hearted whimsy of VOYAGE HOME nor the suspenseful, nerve-wracking
excitement of WRATH OF KHAN.
        The story line in THE FINAL FRONTIER is astonishingly unbelievable.
Sybok's quest for God is so ludicrous it's almost funny--almost so bad
it's good.  Almost, but not quite: I groaned more than I laughed.  Not once
during the movie did I accept the premise or suspend my disbelief.  And how
could I with these embarrassingly cheesy special effects?
        After striking it rich at the box office with STAR TREK IV,
Paramount somehow decided it could no longer afford the services of
Industrial Light and Magic.  I.L.M. (the special effects division of
Lucasfilm) produced the special effects for the last three Trek films, and
it also creates the fine effects in "Star Trek: The Next Generation."
Giving I.L.M. its walking papers was a fatal mistake; the special effects
in THE FINAL FRONTIER are simply atrocious.  They barely look better than
those in the original TV series, which were good for their day but which
look shabby, laughable, and campy on the big screen.  The Enterprise and
the Shuttle Craft look plastic and artificial, almost as if they were
straight out of 2001.  Gone is the high-tech STARS WARS look of WRATH OF
KHAN, SEARCH FOR SPOCK, and VOYAGE HOME.
        STAR TREK V is far too often derivative of other films.  The bar in
Paradise City, for example, immediately brings to mind the Catina Bar in
STAR WARS.  Paradise City itself, with its grungy inhabitants, looks
suspiciously like the city of Bartertown in MAD MAX BEYOND THUNDERDOME.  To
make matters worse, the movie's spiritual, mystical overtones conjure
images of 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY.  THE FINAL FRONTIER tries to cover so much
ground that it fails even to capture the heart, soul, and flavor of Star
Trek.  The movie tastes too much like a potluck dinner of science fiction
leftovers.
        STAR TREK V also suffers from a nagging problem that has plagued
the entire film series; it lies in the way in which the movies have
depicted the Klingons.  In the original TV series, humans and Klingons
differed not in appearance nor in intelligence but in cultural philosophy
and ideology.  Whereas the Federation preached peace and cooperation,
Klingon society was based on warfare, competition, and hatred.  In the
movies, on the other hand, the Klingons have become ugly, gruesome-looking
barbarians devoid of intellect.  They are so crude and one-dimensional that
they fail to make credible adversaries.  We can't take them seriously
because we are too busy laughing at their stupidity.  This problem, which
nearly sunk STAR TREK III, once again rears its ugly head in THE FINAL
FRONTIER.  The idiocy of the Klingon commander in STAR TREK V makes the
movie's already silly plot even harder to swallow.
        The sole salvation of STAR TREK V is the humorous banter and
rapport between the characters, especially between Kirk, Spock, and
McCoy--who else?  In the tradition of the TV series, THE FINAL FRONTIER
contains some vintage Star Trek dialogue.  The characters in Star Trek are
so familiar and so dear to our hearts that it's fun spending time with them
even in the worst of circumstances, such as a disappointingly mediocre
movie.  Even so, unless you're a true die-hard Trekkie, I'd suggest you
skip this one and wait for STAR TREK VI; I hear Checkov and Sulu are
co-directing.

Title
Review for Joe Versus the Volcano (1990)
        JOE VERSUS THE VOLCANO is the most frustrating kind of movie.  You
watch most of it with a dopey grin on your face, loving every minute of it,
but you end up leaving the theater frowning and scratching your head.  The
reason?  The first two thirds of the film are virtually perfect.  But just
when you think the movie can do no wrong, it pulls the rug out from under
you, self-destructs, and dissolves into a sloppy mess.  Writer-director
John Patrick Shanley has created two thirds of a four star classic.
        The movie stars Tom Hanks as Joe Banks, a hypochondriac who always
feels miserable.  Joe works as an advertising librarian in a hideous
office, which is located deep in the bowels of a surgical parts factory.
His boss is a dunce, the work is boring, the coffee is putrid, and the
fluorescent lights create a blinding glare.  In short, Joe's life is
incredibly grim, and it goes from bad to worse when a doctor tells him he
has a "brain cloud"--a rare condition which will kill him within six
months.  Joe quits his crummy job, and the very next day a rich tycoon,
played by Lloyd Bridges, comes a knockin' on his door with an unusual
offer.  He wants to hire Joe to jump into a volcano on a small island in
the Caribbean.  Joe has nothing to lose so he accepts the offer.
        After Hanks' dismal outings in THE BURBS and TURNER & HOOCH, JOE
VERSUS THE VOLCANO comes as a breath of fresh air.  Like PUNCHLINE, VOLCANO
taps into Hanks' somber side and offers him a substantial character:
someone who has lost his spirit and who comes to life only after he learns
that he's dying.  Joe is one of Hanks' more intriguing roles, and
consequently VOLCANO is easily one of the actor's better films.
        VOLCANO, however, really belongs to Meg Ryan, who seems more and
more polished with each movie.  Ryan plays three vastly different
characters, and she is enchanting in each one.  First, wearing a brown wig
and brown lenses, she plays DeDe, a dizzy secretary who works with Joe.
Second, sporting a red wig and red lipstick, she plays Angelica, Lloyd
Bridges' snobby, neurotic daughter.  Third, she plays Angelica's
half-sister, Patricia, a blond blue-eyed beauty.  First, Ryan looks like
Ally Sheedy, then like Molly Ringwald, and finally like herself.  But it's
not just Ryan's make-up that changes: it's her mannerisms, her body
language, and the way she talks.  Ryan plays each part with flair and
conviction.
        Until the disappointing finale, VOLCANO brings to mind films like
AFTER HOURS and SOMETHING WILD.  It shares with those movies a timeless,
otherworldly quality and a pungent satirical tone.  As in any great black
comedy, every character is colorful; every actor seems perfectly cast.  For
example, Ossie Davis turns up as a sophisticated limo driver who takes Joe
on a massive shopping spree in Manhattan.  The grave luggage salesman they
encounter is a riot.
        VOLCANO is most memorable, however, not for its performances but
for its production design.  The opening sequence, which takes us into Joe's
work-place, is a masterpiece of surrealism.  The surgical parts factory is
a nightmarish dungeon, complete with endless stairs, clunky machines, and
glaring fluorescent lights.  VOLCANO is Shanley's directorial debut (he
previously wrote MOONSTRUCK, FIVE CORNERS, and THE JANUARY MAN), and his
direction is surprisingly confident and stylish.
        The problem is that an hour into the film, the bottom falls out of
Shanley's script, and the movie takes a nose dive.  VOLCANO begins as an
intelligent satire and ends as a silly comic book.  The movie really falls
apart once Joe reaches the volcanic island, which is inhabited by natives
who worship Orange Soda; their chief is played by Abe Vigoda of all people.
It's as if Shanley didn't know how to end the story; the tacky finale
seems as if it were written by someone else, by a hack.  It just doesn't
feel right.  How can a movie so extraordinarily good become so exceedingly
awkward?  Blame Shanley: he rows the movie up a creek and then throws away
the paddle.

Title
Review for Naked Gun 2 1/2: The Smell of Fear, The (1991)
NAKED GUN 2-1/2 is more of the same from the Zucker brothers.  And while
the same is still sufficiently funny, it's hard not to yearn for some new
tricks from these old comedy dogs.  David and Jerry Zucker are just
coasting on their proven Airplane formula of piling silliness upon
stupidity.  The laughs are still there, but considering that these guys
could make 100 of these films in their sleep, you can't help wondering what
the point is.  Where's the challenge?  Where's the film's creative spark?
A few of the sight gags are extremely creative, including a hilarious pot
shot at Michael Dukakis.  But, for the most part, the sameness of the
moronic humor has made the jokes bland.  The result: 2-1/2 is difficult to
distinguish from the Zuckers' previous efforts, including the original
NAKED GUN.  And yet, when a movie makes you laugh about once every 30
seconds, it's hard, and unfair, to complain too strenuously.

Title
Review for Tales from the Darkside: The Movie (1990)
        Taken on its own merits, TALES FROM THE DARK SIDE: THE MOVIE is not
a masterpiece, but it is a decent collection of horror stories, a la
CREEPSHOW and CAT'S EYE.
        TALES FROM THE DARK SIDE: THE MOVIE takes its name from George
Romero's low-budget TV series.  The film version features three ghoulish
tales plus a wrap-around story which connects everything together.  Three
of the four stories are worth checking out, including the wrap-around which
stars Deborah Harry as a housewife preparing for a dinner party.  For the
main course, Harry plans to bake a ten-year-old boy, whom she has locked up
in her kitchen dungeon.  As she preheats the oven and chops up the
vegetables, the boy tries to distract her by reading horrifying stories
from a book called "Tales From the Dark Side."
        The first tale, "Lot 249" (*1/2), is based on a story by Sir Arthur
Conan Doyle, and it's easily the weakest in the movie.  Screenwriter
Michael McDowell has prepared a woefully bland revenge thriller featuring a
rotting mummy, who murders his victims by mummifying them.  "Lot 249" is
essentially a third rate FRIDAY THE 13TH-style slasher movie.
        The second tale, "Cat From Hell" (***)--written by George Romero
and based on a story by Stephen King--is the most stylish and rousing.
William Hickey plays a grouchy old millionaire who pays mafia hit man David
Johansen $100,000 to ice an evil black cat.  Johansen is wonderfully greasy
as the overconfident thug who soon discovers he's no match for THIS cat.
        The third tale, "Lover's Vow" (**1/2) is notable mostly for its
dazzling special effects.  Written by McDowell, "Lover's Vow" stars James
Remar and Rae Dawn Chong in a gruesome and gory love story involving a
monstrous gargoyle.  The transformation scene seems kind of passe coming on
the heels of last decade's werewolf and fly movies, but fortunately, the
spectacular effects compensate for the lack of originality.
        Taken as a whole, TALES FROM THE DARK SIDE is fun but frivolous;
like the television series, it goes in one ear and out the other.

Title
Review for Johnny Handsome (1989)
        If you plan to check out JOHNNY HANDSOME, I'd suggest that you
leave after an hour.  You'll enjoy the movie more that way.  The first half
of JOHNNY HANDSOME carefully sets up an intriguing situation; then, the
second half squanders it away on a cliched finale.
        The movie offers a character study of John Sedley, a two-bit
criminal who was born with a horribly deformed face.  His gruesome
appearance has ruined his life.  Then, he has state-of-the-art
reconstructive surgery, and lo and behold, he emerges from the bandages
looking just like Mickey Rourke.  Sedley's new and improved appearance (if
you consider looking like Rourke an improvement) gives him the opportunity
to start his life anew.  For the first time ever, he has a chance to be
normal.  The catch is that Sedley's one friend in the world, Mikey, has
been murdered, and Sedley is torn between becoming a law-abiding citizen
and seeking bloody revenge on the murderers.  Will he go straight or will
he blow it and return to his criminal ways?
        Well, Sedley blows it, but he's not the only one--so do director
Walter Hill and screenwriter Ken Friedman.  They establish Sedley's inner
psychology so well in the first half that you expect them to follow through
with it in the second half.  But no: they turn their effective little
character study into a simple-minded revenge thriller.  Sedley becomes
almost impossible to root for because it's established so quickly that
he'll never reform.  To make matters worse, his vendetta against Mikey's
killers is repulsively violent and gory.
        The movie is so frustrating because of what's not on the screen,
because of the missed dramatic opportunities.  What IS on the screen isn't
half-bad.  Hill's specialty is action, and as a thriller, the movie has
more than enough energy and style.  Rourke's specialty is disturbing movies
(like ANGEL HEART) that leave you with a headache.  Actually, Rourke does
an admirable job of conveying Sedley's emotional turmoil and confusion.
Ellen Barkin stands out as one of Mikey's killers, but only because her
role is so different from the uptight D.A. she played in THE BIG EASY.
